[narrator] The Aleutian Islands are situated in the North Pacific Ocean, forming a chain which extends about 1,200 miles west-southwest from
Alaska's peninsula towards Siberia to form the southern boundary of the Bering Sea.
The Aleutians comprise four groups, the Fox, Andreanof,
Rat, and Near islands, and constitute part of the territory of Alaska, USA.
Of volcanic origin, there are numerous cones on the chain, many of them still active.
The coasts are rocky and surf-worn, rising immediately from the water in sleek, bold mountains.
The Aleutians are the storm pod of the western world.
A permanent low pressure area prevails there.
Cold air masses from the polar region flow with a shearing effect against the warm, moisture-laden air masses over the Japanese current to form cyclonic disturbances.
Because of the Earth's rotation, these disturbances move from west to east, and this meteorological phenomenon constitutes one of the most dangerous weapons in the arsenal of our enemy, for it enables the Japanese to operate behind the moving curtain of a storm.
In the early days of June 1942, they employed this advantage in an all-out attempt to secure absolute domination of the entire Pacific Ocean.
Behind eastward-moving storms, they dispatched two invasion fleets against two widely separated objectives--
Midway Island and Dutch Harbor, an operation designed to break the American line of sea defense upon which the security of the Pacific coast depends.
Both attempts failed.
American air forces engaged the enemy task force at Midway, achieving a historic victory.
And at Dutch Harbor,
American land-based planes from secret American airfields swarmed down, seemingly out of nowhere, to knock out one, two, troop-filled transports, three heavy cruisers, two destroyers, and one aircraft carrier.
In pursuit of the enemy, our Army and Navy airmen flew through storm and fog and hurricane, one-fifth on instruments, four-fifths on luck.
Twenty hours out of 24 sometimes.
Through blind passes, by uncharted peaks, down through zero ceilings, not knowing whether the enemy fleet or a mountain lay below.
Sweating it out for hour after blind hour of continuous flight, and home without benefit of directional beam, to land on an unlighted runway to refuel and take off in a gray, blind hell.
There is no monument to the many who went out and did not return.
They fought and patrolled, in many instances, until their fuel was gone, knowing they would be forced down at sea, but unwilling to break off contact they had made with enemy forces.
Few are alive of those that flew against the Japs in the Battle of Dutch Harbor.
If you wish to see their monument, you Americans here at home, look around you.
In retiring, the remnants of the defeated
Japanese task force landed troops on the undefended islands of Attu, Agattu, and Kiska.
We immediately undertook the offensive.
So commenced our march out along the bridge toward Asia.
In late August of 1942, a large detachment of our troops landed on an island several hundred miles out along the chain, and under two hours by bomber from Kiska.
The name of this island is Adak, and it is closer to Japan than any other American outpost.
Typical of the Aleutian chain, it is windswept, treeless, rain-soaked, carpeted with sphagnum, a flat, spongy vegetation like undersea growth which oozes water at every step.
The only bird life on the island is scavenger ravens, big, black, wind-guzzled.
Remote as the moon and hardly more fertile,
Adak is next to worthless in terms of human existence.
Its sole value is that of a pin on a staff officer's map, and that value is measurement.
Strategically, Adak is one of the most important locations in the world.
Eleven days after the occupation, an airfield was completed, and the first U.S. bomber sat down.
Three days later, flights took off on a bombing mission to Kiska with complete fighter protection.
Since that time, missions over Kiska have become a daily affair.
The airfield is the heart of the island, beating with a half-million horsepower of heavy and medium bombers, Navy amphibians, pursuit ships, transports.
The sound of the engines warming up starts before dawn, echoing back from the mountains that flank the field.
[engines warming up]
Every day, weather permitting, the bombers take off on at least one mission.
Often, on good days, a first flight takes off on the sunrise, others following at regular intervals, so that Kiska's under bombardment every hour until nightfall.
Equal in importance to the airfield, and without which the airfield could not exist, is Adak's excellent harbor.
Landlocked on three sides with a natural island breakwater, it enables heavy draft vessels to come inshore and unload by lighter under almost any weather conditions.
If the airfield is the heart of Adak, the harbor is its hungry mouth.
Its demands are ever on the increase.
By day and by night, freighters, tankers, transports, deposit munitions, supplies, men, up on the beach.
Standing guard over all, the defense installations-- coastal batteries, anti-aircraft emplacements, machine gun posts.
There is nothing vulnerable about Adak any longer.
The skies are constantly circled by aerial patrols in never-ending relays.
PT boats, those sea-going infighters, stand by in readiness for surprise landing attempts.
Offshore destroyers keep endless vigil, slipping like ghosts through the fog, challenging terra-bound specs an approaching vessel on the horizon.
Listening with their undersea ears for the beat of an engine.
Scanning the seas for the plume of a periscope.
Standing rugged duty on the Bering patrol, or slipping into port on the flank of a convoy.
Although the sea lanes to
Adak are constantly traveled by convoys and contact with enemy submarines is a daily occurrence, sinkings in these waters have been few and far between.
Contact with an enemy submarine may continue on and off for hours, during which the undersea craft maneuvers into position to attack, venturing within the radius of the convoy's undersea detectors, only to crash dive, then kill engines, and lie silent on the bottom as our destroyers bear down and release depth charges.
Our destroyers and Navy reconnaissance have held the undersea enemy well in check.
The flow of men, munitions, and supplies flows ceaselessly on.
The gigantic task of furnishing every American expeditionary force with the materials needed in carrying the fight to the enemy falls to the Army Service Forces.
ASF is the bloodstream of our whole military body, maintaining its every organ and muscle.
Adak presents a special problem, as the darn island furnishes nothing toward human needs save drinking water.
Everything else must be brought here.
Food, fuel for men and motors, machinery, munitions, shelter material, raise these basic requirements to the Nth power, add parts and replacements for everything from caterpillar tractors to can openers, plus the operations of estimating, purchasing, assembling, transporting, delivering, and it becomes apparent why the job of supplying a military force is now dignified by a $12 word like logistics.
Since the original landing, the manpower of Adak has been constantly augmented.
Where before it was hundreds, now it is thousands.
Troops arrive after a voyage that may take anywhere from a week to a month, depending on the sea route.
But it took more than a single month to land them here.
The months of training, to toughen them to rigors of wind and weather, that taught them to handle their weapons that made them into soldiers.
Add those months to the period of the voyage from the States.
On Adak, down eastern accents mix with Texas drawls, middle western twangs and Brooklynese.
Bookkeepers, grocery clerks, college men, and dirt farmers.
That is, of course, ex-dirt farmers, ex-bookkeepers, ex-college men, soldiers now, as though all their lives they've been nothing but.
Orders for the day, special orders and news, appear on the bulletin board.
Since newspapers and magazines are usually a month to three months out of date, these radioed news flashes are the only means by which the soldier knows what's going on outside.
No fresh meat, no green vegetables, powdered eggs, tinned bully beef, potatoes, canned tomatoes, peanut butter, canned fruit, and coffee make up the basic diet.
And biscuits, barrels full of biscuits.
Appetites are huge.
Officers and men attend the same mess, as often as not, an officer doesn't display the insignia of his rank.
The soldiers reserve for rare occasions, but discipline does not suffer.
Customary military formality is relaxed, plain, civil necessity taking its place.
After months in an outpost like Adak, there's a tendency on the part of the soldier to think and live only in terms of the present.
That faraway world from which he came begins to seem like a dream to him.
A letter in his hand is proof of the reality of that world-- of Saturday night dances, of jalopies, of ice cream sodas, of sport pages and shaving in the same mirror with the old man.
A letter means more than his paycheck to the soldier.
If he happens to be in the Air Corps, he'd gladly make an extra flight over Kiska for one more letter.
No moving pictures, no stage-door canteens or USO.
No girls, pretty or otherwise.
Nothing to drink, not even a Coke.
Candy bars, cigarettes, and chewing gum are rationed.
But you never hear any bellyaching.
The extraordinary fact is that morale actually gets stronger the closer troops come to the enemy.
On Adak proper, morale is first rate.
[harmonica playing]
The site of the airfield was originally a shallow tidal lagoon.
Army engineers diked up its inlet and drained off its waters by means of a channel to the sea.
It was very resourceful to be exploiting a natural formation, which made possible the completion of the field in ten days and eleven nights, but the work never ceased.
Bulldozers shifted thousands of tons of the lava ash which composed the bed of the lagoon.
Not a new game to the corps that built the Panama Canal.
As the waters receded, grading crews followed, leveling and impacting the area in preparation for the final surface.
This surface was not to be the usual concrete runway of an airport, but a steel one, whose sections had been prefabricated in American mills.
It was put down by the infantry, of course, in 36 hours.
A million and a half square feet of it.
From then on, only the severest weather kept our planes grounded.
Local storms materialize, deluge the island, and pass on or dissipate, all within a few short minutes.
It's a land of cloud bursts and rainbows.
"If you don't like the weather, wait a minute," the soldier says.
Everything the weatherman has to offer can be had in a single day.
Downpours, hurricane winds, hail, snow, fog, sleet, and sunshine.
It is not so much bad weather as changing weather that makes flying hazardous to the uninitiated there.
A new pilot must learn to side slip through local squalls and set her down in a field rimmed by mountains and under a half foot of water.
The greater percentage of casualties, however, occur in the anti-aircraft fire over Kiska.
As a rule, our bombers make it back, but often, they are sorely crippled and with wounded or dead aboard.
[priest] "In my Father's house are many mansions: if it were not so,
I would have told you.
I go to prepare a place for you.
And if I go and prepare a place for you, I will come again, and receive you unto Myself; that where I am, there ye may be also.
And whither I go ye know, and the way ye know."
["Taps" playing]
End of day's mission is the highlight of each 24 hours.
Eyes turn skyward and ears strain for the faint beat of approaching engines.
At the first sound, an alert is flashed to the ground defenses.
Units clear for action.
Anti-aircraft machine guns are stripped, ammunition broken out, and everything is put in readiness for an enemy who may be tailing our flights home.
Six bombers went out, and six are coming back.
[plane engines]
A first ship lands; the remainder circle the field, another coming to earth each time around, those damaged or with wounded aboard taking priority.
It's a revelation how much punishment one of these big bombers can take and still navigate.
Unless both sets of controls are shot away, or an explosive shell finds the gas tank, the odds are all in her making it safely home.
Anyone who's been over will tell you that the most wonderful ride in the world is the ride back from Kiska.
No matter if two engines have conked out, and daylight is pouring through the wings.
There's just something about the scenery on the way home.
The crews proceed to the field operations tent at the bomber command, where they will be questioned as to results and observations.
Their jigsaw reports taken singly are compared and cross-checked until a complete and accurate record of the operation has been assembled.
Thereafter, they're dismissed, with nothing to do till tomorrow but eat, drink, and be merry.
♪ I've got sixpence ♪
♪ Jolly, jolly sixpence ♪
♪ I've got sixpence to last me all my life ♪
♪ I've got twopence to spend ♪
♪ And twopence to lend ♪
♪ And twopence to send home to my wife ♪
♪ No cares have I to grieve me ♪
♪ No pretty little girls to deceive me ♪
♪ I'm as happy as a king, believe me ♪
♪ As we go rolling home ♪
♪ Rolling home, rolling home ♪
♪ Rolling home, rolling home ♪
♪ By the light of the silvery moon ♪
♪ Happy is the day when the airman gets his pay ♪
♪ As we go rolling home ♪
But Adak's tomorrow begins today, with a directive from Kodiak island.
A photographic ship accompanies missions to Kiska, its task to follow the bombers over their target, recording immediate results of the bombardment.
Also enemy defense activity, new installations, camouflage.
These photographs are studied by specialist interpreters, and submitted with comments to the general, and his staff officers,
Colonel William Prince, and Colonel C. M. McCorkle.
Here's Kiska, her camp area, with steel huts, her hangars, her underground railway, her gun installations.
Kiska, one of the hottest spots on the Earth or above.
[officer] The main objectives in any mission from Adak are the destruction of enemy shipping en route to Kiska, the destruction of installations on the island, harassing of enemy personnel.
[narrator] When the broader aspects of the operation have been decided upon, the senior officers of the bomber and fighter units work out its details.
Among considerations in planning a mission are the type of aircraft to be employed, the weight and type of bomb, the time, altitude, and direction of the attack.
All of these are interrelated, a change of one influencing all the others.
The overall determining factor is weather.
For this reason, a Navy meteorologist plots his charts up to the very time of takeoff.
A change of weather at the last moment may mean a complete revision of tomorrow's plans.
Tomorrow is Sunday.
At their outpost on the island,
Catholic, Protestant, and Jewish chaplains, not priests, ministers, or rabbis, but chaplains, all, are leading fighting men in their devotions.
Under the snows of an Aleutian mountain, these defenders of the faith exercise the first of their four freedoms.
But so far as the business of war is concerned,
Sunday on Adak is like any other day.
There's a mission going out at 13 o'clock.
Bombs must be brought down to the field from their camouflaged dumps.
A heavy bomber carries either 16 250-pounders, twelve 500-pounders, or eight 1,000-pounders.
The size of the bomb to be employed depends upon the nature of the target, since, if the target is small, there's a better chance of hitting it with a salvo of 250-pounders than with a single large bomb.
On the other hand, in a congested area such as a camp site of Kiska, a blockbuster comes into its own.
Tail fins and fuses are put on directly before the assembled bomb is hoisted into the bomb bay.
When the time comes, bombs can be released either individually, in sticks, or in salvos.
Belts of ammunition are brought to machine guns and fed into receivers ready for firing.
The rounds are put onto the belt in successions of three-- red-tipped tracers, yellow incendiaries, and black regulation.
Each moving part of each gun has been tended with a watchmaker's care, and every belt of ammunition is cleaned, oiled, and checked before the takeoff.
It is 1240 o'clock, and the pilots who are going to fly the mission receive final instructions.
[officer] Three flights, two of
B-24's and one of B-17's, are to go over the target.
The first flight at 1,100 feet to drop 500-pounders on anti-aircraft installations at North Hale.
Then to proceed along the coastline, strafing to the western limits of the camp area.
The second flight at 7,500 feet to drop 1,000-pound bombs on the camp area.
A third flight at 4,500 feet to destroy hangars with 500-pound bombs.
Second and third flights to follow at intervals of 45 seconds.
Three fighters to precede each bomber flight at 600 feet, and three fighters to afford overhead protection from enemy aircraft.
[narrator] Crews begin to assemble around the ships, awaiting the appearance of their officers.
A bomber crew is a team, and the longer it's together, the better the teamwork.
Theirs is a mutual responsibility.
The safety of the ship and the lives of all the others may depend on any single member.
Trust, respect are implicit in such a relationship if it is to endure.
Maybe in the beginning, you don't like the color of a guy's hair, but if he's all there at his job, you'll get to like it fine.
Enlisted men eat, sleep, fly together.
Their voices on the intercom become familiar, easy to understand when understanding is vital.
Every gunner knows the quality of every other's marksmanship and courage.
The navigator can plot a thousand-mile course over open sea and make a landfall, eight men can testify.
Trust and respect for the bombardier, the radio operator, the engineer, copilot, and trust and respect for the ship they fly.
A monument ought to be put up to that pre-war fraternity of high school speed maniacs, for out of their ranks, our fighter pilots are largely drawn.
They bring to their hazardous undertaking split-second judgment, inspiration, daring.
Lieutenant George I. Riddell,
12 strafing missions over Kiska.
Lieutenant Harley P. Nill,
14 missions.
Lieutenant Lyle A. Bean,
13 missions.
Major Milton Ashkins,
15 missions.
Lieutenant Henry J. Strankopfsky,
11 missions.
Colonel Jack Chennault, son of General Chennault of the Flying Tigers.
Colonel Jack has a zero and a submarine to his credit.
A last-minute weather observation is made.
The word is given to go.
It's good luck and over the hill.
The aerial camera goes aboard.
The bomber pilot informs his crew of the exact part their ship is to play in the mission.
The bomber pilot is of a different breed to your fighter.
Where the fighter is reckless and inspired, the bomber pilot is responsible, determined.
Because of the size and imponderability of his ship, there are no last-moment decisions for him.
And besides the big, intricate, costly piece of machinery that a heavy bomber is, he has the lives of six or eight others to think about.
One hundred men, nine bombers, 12 fighters are setting out to attack and immobilize 10,000 men behind naval and military defenses.
This is the significance of aerial supremacy.
But behind this supremacy lies the enormous system which makes it possible for the ships to take off.
ASF, naval convoy,
Army Air Transport, the Corps of Engineers,
Army and Navy intelligence,
Signal Corps, Ordnance, and ground forces.
These have done their part for today.
The stage is set.
Rehearsals are over.
The actors are ready.
The curtain is going up.
But this is no make-believe camera.
They will be playing for keeps.
Colonel William O. Erickson, who sat the first bomber down on Adak and led the original mission over Kiska.
The thunder of engines makes the earth tremble, and the ravens rise.
The echelon proceeds toward Kiska.
It's about an hour and three-quarters from Adak to Kiska.
One of the most hotly defended of enemy-held areas,
Kiska's also one of the most strongly fortified.
The Japs have dug in like so many moles.
An estimated force of
10,000 goes underground at the sound of our approaching engines.
We cannot, by air attack, hope to annihilate.
We can only harass the force on Kiska.
Cripple the island's defenses, keep the enemy from adding to its resources, while we build our own fighting strength to the day and the hour when we shall undertake a landing operation.
Radio contact is maintained between the bombers and Adak throughout the flight, which proceeds at military speed, 165 MPH.
During the first part of the journey, the waist guns are swing into position, turret mechanisms tested, and trial rounds fired.
[gunfire]
Time moves slowly going after the target.
Crew members have even been known to play stud poker.
The route is quite familiar by now.
Many pilots and crews have made the flight 25, 30 times.
Along about the time
Amchitka's sighted, they begin to look out for enemy planes.
The men whose regular job it is say no matter how often a fellow's gone over, he always feels funny up there over Kiska.
At a signal from the squadron leader, the pilots will open throttle, and the planes will go into the bombing run.
For a minute and a half to two minutes, they will proceed at level flight in an absolutely straight line toward the target, thereby enabling the bombardier to make his computations-- wind velocities, speed, temperature, altitude, drift.
There can be no deviation whatever in the flight if the bombs are to find the target.
[radio] Ten miles and three minutes from the objective.
[narrator] Before Kiska volcano, the mission deploys, each flight going to its designated altitude in preparation for the run.
The enemy will endeavor to throw the flights off their runs.
And to this, he will bring all his firepower to bear.
The earth below will blaze with hatred.
Our ships will heave and rock in the ack-ack.
Machine gun bullets may make a filigree of their wings.
High explosives may open up holes big enough for a man to crawl through.
Little Kiska.
Outer defense of Kiska Harbor.
[radio] Bomb bay doors open.
[radio] Bomb bay doors open, six degrees right on course.
[officer] The object is to hit the target, not to avoid anti-aircraft.
Remember this: You're just as liable to run into it as away from it.
The best way is to forget what's happening outside and make the run by instruments.
That way, if it comes, well, you just look over your shoulder and you see a man with a long beard, and you say, "Good morning,
Father Abraham."
[radio] I want every man to stick by his gun until I say he can leave.
Use every round of ammunition on this ship.
Fire straight at the gun flashes until they stop.
If we're hit and have to bail out, there'll be plenty of
Navy around to pick us up.
Okay, should we give it to 'em?
[narrator] Kiska.
[radio] Bombs away.
[radio] Bunker's out.
Great hit.
Enemy aircraft at 3 o'clock.
[gunfire]
[narrator] Second flight, low altitude.
[radio] On target.
Let 'em have it.
[bombs whistling, explosions]
[narrator] Third flight, at 4,500 feet.
[radio] Bombs away.
[radio] Here goes.
Bombs away.
[explosions]
[radio] -Check in, Timber.
-Okay.
-Waist gunner
-Okay.
-Radio man
-Okay.
Top turret.
I got a slug in my arm, but I'm okay.
-Belly turret.
-Okay.
-Nose
-Okay.
[narrator] Kiska's hangars are destroyed, burning.
Our bombs found the target.
Nine bombers came out, and nine are going home.
♪ Rolling home, rolling home ♪
♪ Rolling home, rolling home ♪
♪ By the light of the silvery moon ♪
♪ Happy is the day when the airman gets his pay ♪
♪ As we go rolling home ♪
♪ I've got sixpence ♪
♪ Jolly, jolly sixpence ♪
♪ I've got sixpence to last me all my life ♪
♪ I've got twopence to spend ♪
♪ And twopence to lend ♪
♪ And twopence to send home to my wife ♪
♪ No cares have
I to grieve me ♪
♪ No pretty little girls to deceive me ♪
♪ I'm happy as a king, believe me ♪
♪ As we go rolling, rolling home ♪
♪ Rolling home, rolling home ♪
♪ Rolling home, rolling home ♪
♪ By the light of the silvery moon ♪
♪ Happy is the day when the airmen gets his pay ♪
♪ As we go rolling home ♪
[patriotic music]
♪ Floods of joy o'er my soul ♪
♪ Like the sea billows roll ♪
♪ Since Jesus ♪
♪ Came into my heart ♪
Thank you, soldier.
My prepared text today was to have been make thy name be remembered in all generations.
Well I think I'm going to depart from my prepared sermon.
While I was listening to the sergeant's solo
I kept looking up at our service flag.
I was thinking of the men who serve us.
I see some of them here this morning.
Private Roberts, Sergeant Jackson,
Lieutenant Carter, and, um...
Private Parks, first class.
First class is right.
I was over at the USO the other night and I met somebody I hadn't seen in quite a long time.
The last time I saw this man, well, one of my members treated me to a ticket to Yankee Stadium to see
Joe Louis versus Max Schmeling.
[crowd yelling]
In one minute and 49 seconds, an American fist won a victory, but it wasn't the final victory.
No, that victory is going to take a little longer and a whole lot more American fists.
Now those two men that were matched in the ring that night are matched again.
This time in a far greater arena, and for much greater stakes.
Max Schmeling, a paratrooper in the Nazi Army.
Men turned into machines, challenging the world.
Joe Louis, training for the fight of his life.
This time it's a fight not between man and man but between nation and nation.
It's a fight for the real championship for the world to determine which way of life will survive.
Their way, or our way.
And this time, we must see to it that there is no return engagement for the stakes this time are the greatest men have ever fought for.
And what are the stakes?
The American stakes.
The German stakes, the Bible of the Nazis.
The Gospel according to Hitler.
I'm not going to read all of this, but there are one or two things in this book that will interest you.
I quote "what is denied to us, the German fist must take."
"If our forefathers had made their decisions by the same pacifist nonsense as the present day does, we would possess but a third of our existing territory."
"Further" he says, "from time to time the illustrated papers show how a Negro has become a lawyer, a teacher, perhaps even a minister.
It never dawns on the degenerate middle class America that this is truly a sin against all reason, that it is criminal madness to train a born half ape until one believes one has made a lawyer of him."
This book was written 20 years ago.
The plan which it foreshadowed has become a reality.
And the Nazis now instruct their disciples in terms such as these.
"We must strive by any means to conquer the world, any methods are permissible.
Lie, betray, kill.
Kill, and kill again.
Kill the Slavs, the Russians, the Poles, the Czechs, don't stop whether you have an old man, a woman, a girl or boy, kill.
"We want to create our great German empire, we must exterminate everybody who stands against us."
The liberty of the whole Earth depends on the outcome of this contest.
Americans have always guarded liberty.
The seed took root in Boston.
In that city is the Granary
Burial Ground, 1660.
Within this ground are buried the victims of the Boston Massacre, March 5, 1770.
The first to die in the Boston Massacre was Crispus Attucks.
"Long as in freedom's cause the wise contend, dear to our country shall your fame extend while to the world the lettered stone shall tell where Caldwell, Attucks,
Gray, and Maverick fell."
At Concord Bridge,
Sam Pratt and John Barrett helped to fire the shot heard round the world.
At Bunker Hill, on June 17, 1775,
"gun belonged to Peter
Salem, a colored man who carried it at Lexington,
Concord, and Bunker Hill, and with it shot Major Pitcairn."
And on Christmas Day, 1776, when all but the bravest hearts had lost hope.
Prince Whipple took his place alongside those who pushed on.
In the winter of '78, at Valley Forge,
George Washington wrote
"our soldiers have been a week without food.
They are naked and starving.
We cannot enough admire their unshakable patience and loyalty."
Here's Samuel Haines,
Cleland Ford, thousands of others left their bleeding footprints in the snow.
In this war, the people of the new world won their independence.
They joined hands, and 13 colonies became the United States.
Then the people of the new republic began to build.
Together they pioneered, and together they made territories into states.
By 1812, a wilderness was becoming a great nation.
Then came war.
[cannons boom]
At Lake Erie, Tyler Thompson heard
Admiral Curry's immortal words.
"We have met the enemy and they are ours."
And in New Orleans, when General Jackson said
"by the Eternal they shall not sleep on our soil,"
Thomas Wilson was there.
America began to build ships.
Then came 1861.
[cannons boom]
"The government of the people by the people for the people shall not perish from this Earth.
This malice toward none was charity for all."
Then America began to rebuild.
[country music]
♪ I've been working on the railroad ♪
♪ All the live long day ♪
Hello Bob, hello Frank, hello Pete.
Take care of everything, you know what I mean.
What's the matter, Jim?
You quitting?
Man, I'm going to Cuba.
Cuba?
Yeah, with the ninth regiment
United States cavalry, horses.
[minister] Jim fought in the Spanish-American War at Santiago, Cuba the ninth and tenth cavalry and the 24th and 25th infantry added to their long record new medals for courage and gallantry.
I'm Jim.
After we cleaned up in Cuba, we went on with building factories, cities, everything.
As for me, well,
I went to Panama to help on a little job.
[minister] A little job connecting the Atlantic and Pacific.
A little job.
[dynamite booms]
[cheering]
[patriotic music]
And with Pershing in France,
Jim wasn't there, but his sons were.
Serving with the 813th pioneer regiment near Marseilles.
The 332nd labor battalion and the
808th pioneer regiment near Verdun.
[cannons boom]
Fighting with the 8th Illinois on the Soissons front.
372nd on the plains of Monthois.
The 371st at Beausejour Farm.
And the 369th in the Argonne.
[booming]
369th fought on the line of fire for 191 days, not a man ever captured, not a foot of ground ever lost.
The first American troops to receive the Croix de Guerre, 369th.
And for action above and beyond the call of duty, many received honored medals.
When they cleaned up in France, the boys came marching home.
[patriotic music]
Among them was Henry Johnson, who with one companion,
Needham Roberts, killed four and captured 28 Germans for which the French nation decorated them for exceptional bravery.
And there were those among the honored at Arlington.
Samuel Washington, Walter Waters,
William Fox, John Simms, Young,
Charles Young, colonel,
United States Army.
And to their memory, sermons in stone and bronze.
Tributes of a grateful nation.
"To commemorate the heroism and sacrifice of all colored soldiers who served in the various wars engaged in by the United States of America, that a lasting record shall be made of their unselfish devotion to duty."
And in France at Beausejour Farm,
French people erected a memorial to the 371st infantry.
"This stone and the ground on which it stands are dedicated to the Negro troops who fought and died here on April 21, 1918."
23 years later, on June 15 1941, an invading German army.
[booming]
Yes, the Nazis destroyed our monuments in France, but our monuments here stand and will always stand.
The founder of Tuskegee
Institute, Booker T. Washington
1856 1915, "he lifted the veil of ignorance from his people and pointed the way to progress through education and industry."
The late George Washington Carver, honored in the chemistry of agriculture and the men and women building the monuments of tomorrow.
Law, elected judge in
New York City courts, serving his second tenured term.
Explorer, the only other American with Admiral Peary when our flag was planted on the North Pole.
Medicine.
Leading New York City surgeon.
Father of the blues.
Financier and publisher, contributing to the war bond drive.
Education, principal of a
New York City public school.
Curator, Stromberg
Collection of Literature.
International prize winning sculptor.
Singer.
["Ode to Joy" by Beethoven]
Men and women in every walk of life, all trained and educated in schools like:
♪ Howard will shine the light ♪
♪ Hampton will shine ♪
♪ Tuskegee will shine the light ♪
♪ All down the line ♪
♪ Prairie View will shine the light ♪
♪ Old Fisk will shine ♪
♪ When the sun goes down
And the moon comes up ♪
♪ Our light will shine ♪
♪ Rah rah rah rah rah ♪
♪ Our light will shine ♪
[announcer]
The Olympic Games have begun.
The best athletes in the world have come to Berlin, and 51 nations are represented here today.
The six fastest sprinters in the world are getting ready.
Owens, America.
Broschmeyer, Germany.
And Metcalfe of America.
[cheering]
Owens is ahead.
Schumbeck and Broschmeyer are fighting.
Owens challenges right off.
Metcalfe comes up, Owens wins in 10.3.
Second, Metcalfe America.
Third, Osendarp, Holland.
[cheering]
["The Star Spangled Banner" by Francis Scott Key]
[announcer] The men's high jump.
Brian Kurtz, Germany.
Oh, they all drop out.
Onaka, Japan.
And he drops out too.
The bar is now 2.03 meters high.
That's six feet, eight inches.
And Johnson of America.
[cheering]
First, Johnson America, a new
Olympic record of six foot eight inches.
Second, Albritton America.
Third, Thurber America.
The tree of liberty has borne these fruits.
It's a mighty tree, with roots deep in the ground of America.
Its fame has spread to the four corners of the Earth.
Men of every faith, color, and tone have helped to nourish it and to sow its seed in new ground.
All men stand in admiration of it, except the Nazis, the fascists, and the Japanese military.
The villains of the new order.
There is not a man alive who does not know it's a crime to be adventurous.
In Europe.
[booming]
[dramatic music]
By order of the German Army high command, thousands of innocent men, women, and children have been shot and hanged.
In Asia, the Japanese Army...
[booming]
[dramatic music]
There are those who will tell you that Japan is the savior of the colored races.
On December 7...
[guns firing]
[booming]
[dramatic music]
The people of the world have risen in one great mass to bring to justice the ringleaders responsible for these crimes.
In America's army, in every branch of the service, artillery, tank, quartermaster, engineer--
Don't forget the infantry.
Yes?
My boy's in the infantry.
He's up there.
Third from the left on the bottom row.
I got a letter from him last night.
He's an officer.
Robert?
Did he get to be an officer?
Yes, he said so right here.
"Dear mama, at last it's happened.
I'm an officer, lieutenant
Robert A. Bronson, infantry.
Don't it sound good?
Of course I haven't got my bars yet, but I'm on my way to officers candidate school for four months, and if
I pass the examination and graduate and get my commission,
I'll be an officer.
Now I can do it, mama.
If I could go through those first 13 weeks the way I did,
I can go through anything.
That morning at the railroad depot,
I didn't know which side was up, but misery sure loves company.
When I said goodbye to you I was laughing, but I wasn't tickled.
And the first thing
I heard when I stopped at some place in the middle of no place..."
[patriotic music]
All right men, on behalf of the United States Army and the reception center here at this camp, we're glad to welcome you here today and into the United States Army.
Very glad to see all of your happy, smiling faces.
Now fellas, during the few days that you'll be with us here at this camp you'll be converted from a civilian into a full-fledged soldier.
You'll be interviewed by someone who will inquire into your past life before you came into the Army.
On the construction of guns and gun parts?
That's right.
What machines did you operate?
I operated boring mills, tool grinders, drill presses, planes, and...
Forward!
Forward hut!
Hup hup hup hup, pick it up, pick it up!
Company halt!
Halt.
But I don't want to give you the impression that it's only for religious services and advice that you can come to the chaplain.
You can come to him at any time, for example if you get in trouble with your girlfriend and she doesn't write you any more, you want to know how to propose, why just come see the chaplain and he'll give you some advice.
Or if you get in trouble with your first sergeant, you want to know how to handle him, just come around and see the chaplain and he'll give you some advice.
Or if you're financially embarrassed, why that's simple too.
Just come around and see the chaplain and he'll give you some advice.
Now chaplain Sherman has just told you how to get along in this man's army, and it's my painful duty to tell you what'll happen to you if you don't get along.
Regarding the salute, men.
It isn't a form of servility.
It's merely a form of recognition used between members of the military service.
The average man when he first learns to salute is awkward.
It's a strange gesture to him, and he feels shy.
He usually sneaks his hand up in this manner and gives a broken handed salute.
Or lowers his eyes gently like a shy maiden and he salutes like that.
When you salute an officer, stand erect like a soldier.
Bring your hand up to your forehead in a military manner.
Tip of the forefinger above the center of the right eye.
Now make sure your thumb is alongside your hand because if it's out here, they may misconstrue it.
Then cut the hand sharply to the side.
Don't let it drop down like a dead fish.
Fall in!
-Fall out!
-Sit down.
Put your feet in the machine.
One L on a 10 and a half, David.
Put your foot in here.
Stand up now, pick up both weights.
Put the weights back, sit down.
Step down, put your shoes on and go in the next room.
- Next.
- Fall in!
Fall out!
All right men, strip down completely, put every piece of civilian clothing that you have into that bag.
Now when you're completely stripped and have everything into that bag, put on a set of summer underwear, a pair of shorts, a pair of white woolen socks.
All right, now you try on your green herringbone fatigue hat first.
That's the green hat with a brim on it, try it on.
If it fits, place it into your barracks bag, now don't mind if it's a little loose.
"But I made it, all of us made it.
They put us through so many twists and turns we didn't know whether we were coming or going, but Uncle Sam did.
We were going.
He put us on the train that same afternoon for the replacement center.
We kept passing troop trains going back and forth all over the country.
We finally arrived at a place called military secret.
But this much I can tell you, it was cold.
And even before we had a chance to thaw out, they had us in the school of the soldier.
The sergeant gave it to us straight."
You sleep in that bed, you'll make it.
You wear them clothes, you'll wash 'em.
You walk on that floor, you clean it.
There's no service here, you understand that?
[woman] "And I'd bet right now, mama
I can make a bed better than you can.
But before I had a chance to get the bed warm, there I was.
In the beginning the new hands were all beat."
Right face.
Forward hup, to the rear forward.
Left flank, forward.
Right flank, forward.
Left forward, left forward.
Hup hup hup four left forward.
Left flank forward, right flank forward.
Rear forward, rear forward, rear forward.
Hup hup hup four.
Hup hup hup--
[woman] "Then came the cross country marching."
[yelling]
[sergeant]
Halt, take a 10 minute break, fall out.
[woman] "It was tough.
Hiking, drilling, KP, bivouacs, tent pitching, general orders.
The tougher the day, the shorter the night.
But you get used to it, and if you can't take it, they got doctors.
Some of the best in the country.
Specialists in every field.
And in our dental clinic, we have a WAC, but even so this is one kind of drilling no soldier likes.
But after all the making beds and peeling potatoes and drilling and marching, they give you a rifle and teach you to shoot it.
[rifles crack]
In no time at all, I could hit the broad side of a barn.
It was fun. It's not all work.
There's football, baseball, boxing, and oh yes, ping pong.
If you want to read, there's a library.
Can you imagine me listening to poetry?
But it came in good.
The very next day,
I got a chance to use it.
We were sent on a detail to a nearby camp.
I saw some soldiering that was beautiful to behold."
[yells commands]
Forward march!
Hup two three four, hup two three four hup!
[woman] "And you'd better tell Uncle Everett to quit joking about the WACs because these girls have forgotten more about jeeps and trucks than he'll ever know, corporal or no corporal.
And the next day was Saturday night."
[whistling]
[pleasant music]
"She was very nice, mama.
A real apple pie girl.
Just the right size and everything.
Just the kind you like.
But in the Army, man proposes and GI disposes.
[yelling commands]
And the next morning, I was out there like the rest of them getting tough.
In this man's army they want you to be tough.
Look tough, and I mean tough.
And tough in the Army means a good fighter who can stand up against a strong enemy and beat him to the draw.
And after a hard week, a soldier welcomes a Sunday."
♪ Holy God in three persons ♪
This morning, I have a GI report
I think you'll all be interested in.
This is an official statement from the War Department.
"In the present World War, there are more than five times as many men with high school education in our armed forces than were in World War I.
This has meant an increase in officer candidates.
Official figures tell us in the present war there are three times as many colored officers as in World War I.
From a score of different schools, many have earned their commissions and taken their place alongside those who come from any one of the hundreds of ROTC schools and the greatest of all military institutions, West Point."
[patriotic music]
"Mama, the next time you see me
I'll be wearing an officer's uniform.
Ready to get in there and get this war over with.
That's a promise.
Your loving son, Robert."
Thank you, Mrs. Bronson.
That's a promise millions of Americans have made.
Thousands have put it into action.
In every camp men are getting their final workout.
At Tuskegee, more pilots are earning their wings.
[patriotic music]
In a short while, these young officers will be full-fledged combat fliers taking their place at the controls of our fighter plane.
Today, high above their native land they fly.
Tomorrow, what a surprise the Nazis will get when black, brown, yellow, and white men all Americans, land on the airfields of Berlin and Tokyo.
In the far north, seasoned soldiers are toughening themselves for they know that in a fight against all that is evil, troops must be readied.
Ready to strike hard, and often.
No waiting for weather or temperature.
Any weather can be good weather.
Any temperature can be right, when men know the meaning of their job and are determined to get it done come what may.
[booming]
And the men we knew as tailors, printers, brick layers, cooks, entertainers, carpenters, bell boys, school teachers, farmers, are today soldiers in a modern army.
Tank men, gunners, radio operators, and motor mechanics.
Every man schooled in the meaning of teamwork.
Every man qualified to replace any of his teammates at any time.
Every man ready to do his share.
The engineers, the fighting builders ready to build bridges, highways, railroads, ports, landing fields.
The quarter master, who moves troops and supplies, who provides food, fuel, and clothing.
The men who supply the means of communication.
Telegraph, telephone, and radio.
The cavalry.
Ready to patrol, scout, and harass.
The tank destroyers, ready for swift and decisive action.
[dramatic music]
Hard hitting anti-aircraft unit, ready to knock zeroes and
Messerschmitt out of the skies.
And the infantrymen, the backbone of the army.
[booming]
[guns firing]
This training has met the acid test of war.
Across the Pacific, across the Atlantic, the shadow of defeat hangs over the Axis partners as the Allies liberate town after town.
But the job isn't finished.
This is only the beginning.
To win the final victory over Germany and Japan, our blows must be dealt harder and faster, and with all our strength there can be no letup in the flow of supplies.
More and more food, equipment, and ammunition must reach our troops in the battle areas.
[dramatic music]
More airports, landing fields, docks, bridges, and roads must be built.
Our troops must build them through the swamps of the South Pacific, the snows of the far north.
Over the mountains of India, and across the rivers of Europe.
Build them in record time.
And under enemy fire.
[booming]
Build them right into the heart of Berlin and Tokyo.
[booming]
Robert Brooks,
Colin Kelley,
Meyer Levine,
Dory Miller, soldiers who knew no fear.
Men who would defend even unto death the land of their birth.
Soldiers who believed in this great country.
To the enemy, our country is something to destroy.
Our homes, our right to worship God, our little belongings, something to crush, to shackle, to plunder.
Oh God, we thank you for this land which our fathers have helped to build.
Grant that we may with your help be worthy of this heritage, and in our turn enrich it for our children so that government of the people, by the people, for the people shall not perish from this Earth.
♪ Onward Christian soldiers ♪
♪ Marching as to war ♪
♪ With the flag of freedom ♪
♪ Going on before ♪
♪ Christ the royal master ♪
♪ Leads against the foe ♪
[patriotic music]
♪ When the nation calls on men to march ♪
♪ All the men are tired and blue ♪
♪ From the mountains
We can lead the march ♪
♪ And come and follow you ♪
♪ I can hear them coming down the land ♪
♪ In a humbling march all day ♪
♪ I will heave my row and take my pack ♪
♪ And the soldiers break ♪
♪ When the night is coming down ♪
♪ I will fight for justice to our land ♪
♪ And I'll be marching there ♪
♪ Joshua fought the battle of Jericho ♪
♪ Jericho, Jericho ♪
♪ Joshua fought the battle of Jericho ♪
♪ And the walls come tumbling down ♪
♪ My country 'tis of thee ♪
♪ Sweet land of liberty ♪
♪ Of thee I sing ♪
- This is a film about that scale and grandeur.
This is a film about that military achievement.
This is a film about a people who, for all time, shattered the legend of Nazi invisibility.
This is a film about victory and defeat.
German victory, and German defeat.
This is the battle for Russia, a battle that has been going on for centuries, a battle that fills the pages of Russian history.
The Germany order of Teutonic Knights had invaded northeastern Russia, and occupied the old city of Pskov.
Under the leadership of their grandmaster, von Bock, they threatened to enslave the whole population of that area, including the capital, Novgorod.
In their hour of peril, the Russian people turned for leadership to their prince, Alexander Nevsky.
And on April 5th, 1242, on Lake Peipus, the Russians met the might of the German forces.
They weren't as well equipped or as well organized.
- But in their hearts was a flaming courage, a flame so fierce that it pierced the German army.
The victory they won fills a bright page of Russian history.
1704, and another conquering army marched across Russian land.
This time, under Charles
XII of Sweden, and again, the Russians fought for their country.
Led by their emperor, Peter the Great, after five long years of war, they defeated the Swedes, in the historic battle of Poltava.
- The invading
Swedish armies were crushed, and forever driven out of Russia.
Napoleon and his armies have blazed their triumphant way across Europe, and were marching on Moscow.
Conquering armies entered the city, but they entered a city in flames.
Even in that day, Russian earth was scorched earth to an invader, and once again, the invader was forced to start the long march on the road back out of Russia.
1914, and another German army, this time, under Kaiser Wilhelm, set out to conquer Russia.
This time, the Russian people, under the regime of the czar, were not only fighting German guns but oppression and corruption in their own country, and only the ultimate collapse of imperial Germany saved Russia from losing the Ukraine and the Crimea, which the Germans had occupied in 1918.
Yes, for 700 years, the Russian people have had to fight and defend their land against would-be conquerors.
Why?
Why have all these attempts been made to conquer Russia?
Perhaps Russia itself can provide the answer.
Here it is.
One sixth of the Earth's surface, reaching from east to west, nearly halfway around the world, and southward from the North
Pole to the borders of India.
One country of nine million square miles.
That's our own country three times over, or all of North America, and a million square miles to boot.
The sun never sets on Russia.
When it is dusk on its western borders, facing Europe, it is already dawn on its eastern borders facing the Pacific.
That's Russia, or to be correct, the Union of Soviet Socialist Republics.
Deep in its mountains lie thick, rich veins of gold and silver.
Below ground lie enormous deposits of copper, tin, manganese and nickel, chromium and radium, sulfur and magnesium.
Russia is rich in raw materials.
Her forests cover millions upon millions of acres.
One fourth of all the lumber reserve in the world belongs to Russia, and as for fuel, there's coal, ton upon ton, and more important, there's also oil,
213 million barrels a year of it, black gold flowing from the earth, that contains 55 percent of the world's oil.
What else?
Iron?
Russia has better than 10 billion tons.
That can make a lot of steel before it's done.
Yes, Russia is rich.
Her farms cover millions upon millions of acres, the rich black earth that besides giving forth oil and coil, will also grow everything from sunflowers to lotus.
The tea your people drink in such huge quantities, and the tobacco that they smoke.
Cotton grows here, too.
Three million, 800 thousand bales a year, and sugar, and on the pasture land, the animals grow fat for food and wool for clothing, while on the warm plains, the fields of grain stretch as far as the eye can reach.
Corn, oats, hops, rye, and don't forget wheat.
One third of the world's best.
Yes, Russia is very rich, for it has not only raw materials and the products of its soil,
Russia is also people.
193 million people.
People of every race, color and creed, people coming from the many different republics that comprise The Soviet Union, people speaking more than a hundred different languages, but all citizens of one country.
Whether they are the great Russians, the descendants of the first settlers of this vast area, and for a thousand years, its main population, or Cossacks, or famous horsemen from the open plains of the Don River Valley.
Whether they come from the southwest, the Ukraine.
Here in the bread basket of the Soviet Union live the little Russians that are known as Ukrainians, and beside them, the
Moldavians and Bessarabians, but if they come from the far south, between the Caspian and Black Seas.
Where we find the Armenians and the Georgians, the Ingush, the Chechens, and rugged as the high peaks of their native Caucasus Mountains.
Whether they are Uzbeks, Turkmen, Kyrgys, from the Persian and Indian frontiers.
Or Mongols.
The Bashkirs, the Turko-
Tartars, the Buryats, the Yakuts, from beyond the Ural Mountains, or the people of the ice country, hunters like the Saamis.
Or settlers like the Laplanders.
Whether they come from the pioneering wilderness of the far north, or from a great city, like their capital, Moscow, where the ancient buildings of an ancient civilization stand beside the modern structures of a modern civilization, where the old Russian droshky still competes with the modern limousine.
Whether they work in factories or as soldiers, whether they are brick layers or traffic cops, sailors or riveters, school children or farmers, nurses or engineers, window washers or sales girls, housewives or postal clerks, radio announcers or stewardesses, scientists or typists, musicians or ballerinas.
Regardless of what they do or where they live, they all have one thing in common: love of their soil.
That is Russia.
Size?
The largest country in the world.
Raw materials?
Unlimited.
Man power?
193 million.
These are three reasons why ever conqueror in history has wanted Russia, and these are the reasons why the modern would be conqueror wrote.
- "When we speak of new territory,
"we must think of Russia.
"Destiny itself points the way there."
- Yes, as we have seen,
Germany's spirit of aggression was handed down from generation to generation, and now, in Hitler's Germany, the dream was world conquest.
For such a dream, there could be only one answer: collective security.
So with this objective, in 1934, the Soviet Union joined the League of Nations.
Again and again before the League, its representatives urged binding agreements to support by collective action any nation submitted to attack.
- The State I represent entered the League with the sole purpose of the maintenance of invisible peace.
The League of Nations is still strong enough by its collective actions to avert or arrest aggression.
There is no room for bargaining or compromise.
- But while some members of the League were pleading vainly for the use of collective force to stop aggression, the world saw other members,
Germany, Italy, Japan, withdraw from the League to follow the path of aggression.
Manchuria, Ethiopia, then Hitler invaded Austria,
Czechoslovakia, and in 1939, Poland.
First step on the road to Russia.
But his eastward march was interrupted by France and Britain declaring war.
So the Germans were forced to turn west, and in 1940, as we have seen, wiped the last opposition from western Europe, and while the Nazis were unsuccessfully trying to bring Britain to her knees, the German generals were already planning to resume the interrupted eastern blitz.
The road to Russia was now open, but before that attack, preliminary steps were necessary.
South and east of Germany are Hungary, Romania,
Bulgaria, Yugoslavia and Greece, and Hungary had grain, rich fields of it, grain too good for Hungarians, when German soldiers have such good appetites.
Hungary had bauxite.
Bauxite makes aluminum, and aluminum makes planes, and Hungary had an army, not the battle trained German army, but good enough to throw against Russian guns.
Romania had not only grain, but oil, and Hitler needed every last drop of it to power his war machine.
Romania also had men, more slave labor, and more cannon fodder for the attack on Russia.
And most important,
Romania and Hungary both had Russian frontiers, and
Hitler wanted those frontiers in the hands of German generals.
Bulgaria didn't have a Russian frontier, but it did have bases, bases on the Black Sea, bases for German submarines to prey on Russian shipping.
By the spring of 1941, the reactionary governments of Hungary, under the dictatorship of
Admiral Horthy of Romania, governed by young King Michael, who was only a tool in the hands of Hitler's puppet,
General Antonescu, and of
Bulgaria, ruled by King Boris, always a disciple of German imperialism.
All had sold their countries out to Hitler.
Now, threatened by a revolt of their peoples, they were only too glad to be protected by Hitler's armies.
So by March of 1941, German armies were in occupation of Hungary, Romania, Bulgaria.
That still left Yugoslavia and Greece.
So long as they remained unoccupied territory, they remained the root for a possible Allied counter invasion.
At one of their regular meetings,
Hitler had assigned the job of conquering Greece to his stooge, Mussolini.
The stooge was delighted.
Here was his chance to prove to his people that he, too, was a conqueror.
But he was wrong.
Perhaps the uniforms fooled him.
Something did.
For after the fascist legions had blitzed on one cylinder this far into Greece, the Greeks, in a brilliantly conducted mountain campaign, drove the Italians back, and invaded Albania.
Hitler was enraged.
The failure of his stooge to protect his southern flank was delaying the attack on Russia.
He sent a final ultimatum.
For the Yugoslavs and Greeks, it was surrender or else.
But the Yugoslavs and
Greeks come from a long line of fighting men.
Nazi slavery didn't appeal to them.
At dawn on April 6th, German bombs told the Yugoslavians they were at war with Germany.
The Nazis and Italians launched a powerful and coordinated attack from all their bases, supported by virtually unopposed aerial bombarding.
The conclusion was inevitable.
Although resistance was determined, the Yugoslav army was cut up into many small segments, and captured.
The war in Greece also began on April 6th.
There, in spite of fierce and valiant resistance by the Greeks, and the British, who had come to their aid, the Germans, overwhelmingly superior in both numbers and equipment, forced their way past the Vistritza River,
Mount Olympus, the famous passage of Thermopylae, and by the end of April, a swastika flew over the ancient city of Athens.
The conquest of the
Balkans was now complete.
The whole force of Nazi might could now be turned loose on Russia.
There was no time to waste, for time was Russia's weapon.
Their industries, so recently built and which, like our own, were designed for the ways of peace, were converted for war.
Instead of steel for plows and tools, steel for shells and guns.
They knew their industry could never produce enough too adequately for the titanic struggle, but what they could produce, they would.
At the same, the army began to grow.
More and more men were called up to be trained, hardened, drilled, prepared to defend their land.
With the conquest of the Balkans, the Nazis had a solid front from the Black Sea to the Baltic but the Russians had built themselves a buffer, to take some of the steam out of the Nazi punch no matter where it landed, but where would it land?
When the blow came, it was from five different directions, and from the north, one extra, just for luck.
That was the big day.
As dawn broke, more than 200 Axis divisions, more than 2 million men plunged into a front
2000 miles long, reaching from the White Sea to the Black.
Their aim?
The annihilation of the Red Army, in the decisive battle on the frontier.
The offensive started along the whole length of the front, but was concentrated on three main objectives:
Leningrad, Moscow, and Kiev, the capital of the Ukraine.
In the first 30 days, von Leeb's forces drove to within 125 miles of Leningrad, while the Finns under Mannerheim, supported by the Germans, began to drive from the north to encircle the city.
In the center, von Bock's army plunged 480 miles into Soviet territory.
One Russian city after the other was overrun by the invaders.
And on July 17th, they captured the first main objective:
Smolensk, regarded as the key to Moscow.
Simultaneously in the south, von Rundstedt's forces cut deep into the Ukraine.
This was Blitzkrieg at its best.
The world gave Russia another six weeks, and the Germans issued a communique.
- The issue in the east has already been settled.
Smolensk is the last halt on the road to Moscow.
- But then, a strange thing happened.
For the first time since the mighty German army started its career of blitz, smashing into submission one European country after the other, that same German army came up against a country that did not submit.
Despite the fact that Hitler's army swept deeper and deeper into the Soviet Union, and by October the 15th stood practically within the shadows of the Kremlin, despite the fact that the Soviet government and all foreign missions were forced to move to Kuibyshev,
700 miles to the east, despite Hitler's triumphant pronouncement,
I can say that this enemy is already broken and will never rise again.
Despite the fact that by December,
500,000 square miles of Russian territory, an area equal to the entire middle western United States had fallen to the invaders, yes, despite Russia's loss of her best agricultural areas, her most thoroughly developed industrial plants, millions of her people, thousands of her tanks and her planes, despite everything, those six weeks had lengthened into nearly six months, and the dread Nazi blitz had spluttered, stumbled, and finally died.
What had happened here?
Let's try to analyze it.
First, in this titanic struggle, not only two armies, but two fighting methods and two strategies came face to face.
The German strategy was based on the well tried
'Keil and Kessel' or wedge and trap maneuver.
One wedge would be driven deep into the enemy territory, to hook up with another spearhead, driven through to meet it.
In the trap thus formed, the victim would be pocketed for annihilation.
The German plan in every campaign was to seek a decisive battle at the moment of invasion.
- A single blow must destroy the enemy, without regard for losses, a gigantic, all destroying blow.
- Remember the campaigns you have already seen in these films.
Poland, the Poles concentrated on their borders.
The blitz broke through.
18 days finished Poland.
France, the Allied strength on the borders, the breakthrough at Sedan, and the issue of France was settled.
The Balkans, the Yugoslavians rushed to the border, the breakthrough came and in
12 days, Yugoslavia was gone.
The Germans planned the same blitz against the Russians, but the Russians had developed their own strategy, one to take full advantage of the vast area of their land.
The Russian strategy was a defensive depth, line after line, far back into the interior, and when the Nazi wedge struck, the first line would bend with it, until it became part of the second.
Again, the wedge would strike, again, a segment would be lost, but again, the line would bend, until it became part of the third.
So the deeper the Germans plowed into Russian soil, the stronger their opposition, until finally, they faced an unshatterable wall, and were robbed of their chance to hit that all destroying blow they had counted on.
The result?
The Germans conquered land and lost the campaign.
For the Russian tactics kept the main bulk of their armies intact, and made a long war inevitable, instead of that quick decision the Germans sought.
And the Russians had other tactics that threw the Germans for a loss.
Germany had developed blitz warfare, mechanized warfare, armies on wheels, juggernauts to crush everything before them.
But the Russians found a way to drag them out of their traveling fortresses.
They used their cities as strongholds, and made the blitz come to them down alleys.
The more a city was bombed, the more impassable it became to the German Panzers.
They made the names of these Russian cities as familiar to us as the names of towns in the next county.
Rostov, Kharkov, Kiev, Kursk, Smolensk.
City after city, standing in the path of the Nazi blitz, the Red Army has found a way to make their cities of great strategic importance.
Odessa, the scene of a heroic siege of more than two months held up the whole Nazi thrust into the Crimea.
Sevastopol, which resisted every attempt of the Germans to break through.
Here, for eight and a half long months, the Russians fought for the town.
Inch by inch, barring the Germans from the great Black Sea naval base located there.
Finally, when the
Germans entered the town, each district was defended street by street.
Each street house by house and each house room by room.
The Russians knew their cities would be demolished, but their objective was not to save cities, but to destroy Germans, a high price to pay for a copy of Mein Kampf.
So the Germans were forced out of their armored shells, to fight and to die in the hand to hand combat they thought they had abolished.
There was another item the
Germans had overlooked.
They overlooked people, and generals may win campaigns, but people win wars, and on that fatal June 22nd, when the Russian people first learned of the invasion of their country, their grim faces told of their determination, to fight and to die, but never to surrender.
They knew this wasn't a question of who occupied what piece of land.
This was a question of life or death.
- This war is not an ordinary war.
It is the war of the entire Russian people, not only to eliminate the danger hanging over our heads, but to aid all people groaning under the yoke of fascism.
- So the alarm was spread to factory and farm, and from every Russian town and village, men poured forth to answer the call.
From now on, one thing mattered, and one thing only: victory.
Total war meant total mobilization, not war just for soldiers, war for everyone, young or old, male or female, it made no difference.
Age had nothing to do with it.
If you were only 12 years old, there was work for 12 year olds to do.
Sex had nothing to do with it.
If you could hold a rifle, you were a soldier.
If you could turn a lathe, you were a soldier.
If you could harvest the fields, you were a soldier.
If you could handle a locomotive, or pilot a ship, or guide a tractor, you were still a soldier.
For everything you did was part of that total war.
Nothing that the enemy could use was left behind, not a yard of wire, or a pound of iron, not an acre of wheat or a head of cattle, and the old men stood watch over the fields, ready to give the word to burn at the first sight of the enemy.
Scorched earth.
What can't be withdrawn must be destroyed.
That meant the factories, the plants, the oil depots, flames claimed them all.
The giant dam at Dneprostroi, into which had been poured not only steel and concrete, but five long years of Russian toil and Russian sweat, to yield the miracle of electricity to the farms and people of the Ukraine.
Now, rather than let the power it generated fall to the enemy, they destroyed it.
Scorched earth.
The land they had lived on, worked on, their forests, their fields, their farms, they surrendered them to the flames, but not to the invaders.
That was the scorched earth.
And for action behind the German lines, a new army was formed, an army without uniforms whose home was the forest, and whose front was the enemy's rear, the guerrilla army.
A minimum of glory, and a maximum of determination.
Their achievements were seldom recorded.
Look well at these faces.
You will never see them again in the ranks of war prisoners, or read their names over heroes' graves.
Ahead of them lay nothing but the rope and the halter, but they stayed behind and went on fighting.
Their only goal was merciless destruction, destruction of communication lines, supplies, the invaders themselves.
Their weapons were dynamite, and the terror of surprise.
They asked for no mercy, and they gave none.
This is the guerrilla army, this, the scorched earth, this, the Red Army, these, its leaders.
These are the reasons why although the Germans conquered land,
500,000 square miles of it, it was just land, barren land, scorched land.
These are the reasons why, after five and a half months of blitz warfare, after coming within sight of their goal, the Germans were stopped at the very gates of Moscow.
These are the reasons why although Hitler had sworn that before December, the swastika would fly from the Kremlin towers,
December had come, but it wasn't the swastika that flew over the Russian capital, and it wasn't the Nazi conquerors who marched through the streets of the ancient city.
But fresh reserves of the Red Army.
Causes and events leading up to our entry in the war,
Well what are the causes?.
Why are we Americans on the march?.
Is it because of...
..Pearl Harbour?.
Is that why we are fighting?.
Is it because of Britain?.
France?.
China?.
Czechoslovakia?.
Norway?.
Poland?.
Holland?.
Greece?.
Belgium?.
Yugoslavia?.
Russia?.
Just what was it that made us to change our way of living overnight?.
What turned our resources, our machines, our whole nation into one vast arsine?.
Producing more and more weapons of war, instead of the old materials of peace.
What put us into uniform, ready to engage the enemy on every continent?.
And every ocean?.
This is a fight between a free world and a slave world" Vice President Henry A. Wallace
What of these two worlds, or which Mr. Wallace spoke?.
The free and the slave?.
Let's take the free world first, our world.
How did it become free?.
Only through a long and unceasing struggle inspired by men of vision.
Moses
Thou shall not covet that which is they neighbours.
Mohammed
"Mankind is one community."
Confucius
"What you do not want done to yourself, so not do to others."
Christ
The truth shall make you free."
All believe in the sight of God, all men were created equal.
And from that there developed a spirit among men and nations, that is best expressed in our own declaration of freedom.
"We hold these truths to be self-evident, that all men are created equal."
It is the corner-stone on which our nation was built.
And the ideal of all the great liberators.
Washington
Jefferson
Garibaldi
La Fayette
Peshutsko
Bolivar
Lincoln
Lighthouses!. Lighting up a dark and foggy world.
"Let government of the people, by the people for the people,
..shall not perish from the earth."
Fighting! Living! Dying! For what?.
For freedom! That for which man has fought, since time began.
To be free.
Is life so dear, or peace so sweet,
..as to be purchased at the price of chains and slavery?.
Forbid itAlmighty God.
I know not what other course one may take, but as for me,
..give me liberty or give me death.
But what of this other world?.
Here men insisted that progress lay in killing freedom.
Here they were putting out the lighthouses, one by one.
Here the march of history was reversing itself.
In ltaly it began, when an ambitious rabble-rouser set his followers marching on Rome.
The country, like every other country after the last war,
..was torn by political unrest, hard times, unemployment.
Two courses were available to the ltalian people.
They could solve their problems in a free democratic way,
..or they could let someone else do the solving for them.
They made the tragic mistake of choosing the second course.
They put their faith and trust in this one man.
They believed they represented them.
Actually he planned to betray them, with the selfish interest of himself,
..and a group back of him.
Just as he had earlier betrayed those who first supported him.
In Germany another even more forceful demo go...
..set his marchers following from the Munich beer halls.
He too had the sinister opportunity..
..to take advantage of post-war chaos.
But he also had certain distinctive
German characteristics to play on.
To start with, the Germans have an in-born national love of regimentation and a harsh discipline.
He could give them that.
The German army, and through them the people, had never acknowledged...
..German defeat in the last war.
And were anxious for revenge.
That too, he promised them.
The wealthy and powerful industrialists were fearful of losing any of their wealth and power
And were ready to back anyone who would retain it for them.
He promised to take care of them too.
This man cunningly played all these ends against the middle.
And ruthlessly set out to murder the new-born German republic.
Here not one man, but a gang, disguised their little scheme...
..of the will of the Emperor. And to the Japanese people, the Emperor is God.
Taking advantage of their worship of the God-Emperor,
..it was no great trick to take away what little freedom they had ever known.
Yes in these lands, people surrendered their liberties and threw away their human dignity
They gave up their right as individual human beings.
They became a part of a mass, a human herd.
Although these countries were far apart and different in custom and language,
..the same poison made them much alike.
Each got a new uniform. In ltaly the bosses wore black shirts.
In Germany the shirts were brown.
In Japan they hid behind the uniform of the army.
But really they belonged to a sinister-secret society.
Their symbol was a black dragon.
The other fellows had to have a symbol too.
Germany a Swastika.
In ltaly, the old Roman symbol.
In Germany they called the new order.. National Socialism,
..or Nazism.
In ltaly, they had a shorter word:
Fascism.
In Japan they had lots of names for it.
The New Era of Enlightenment,
The New Order in Asia.
The Co-Prosperity Sphere.
But no matter how you slice it, it was just plain old-fashioned...
..materialistic imperialism.
The Japs would get the prosperity and the other would get the "co"-
They say trouble always comes in three's.
Take a good close look at this trio.
Remember these faces.
Remember them well. If you ever meet them, don't hesitate.
Stop thinking and follow me cried Hitler
I will make you masters of the world.
And the people answered, HElL!!
Stop thinking and believe in me, bellowed Mussolini and I will restore the glory that was ruined.
The people answered ll Duce! Il Duce!
Stop thinking and follow your God-Emperor cried the
Japanese War-Lords and Japan will rule the world.
And the people answered: Banzai! Banzai!
Each system was alike and that the constitutional law-making bodies gave up their power.
The Reichstag in Berlin.
The House of Deputies in Rome.
The Diet in Tokyo.
And these elected representatives, became collections of stooges.
Rubber stamp organizations.
Applauding on cue, the words of the leaders.
Each system did away with free-speech, and free-assembly.
Each system did away with free-press and substituted a press controlled by the party
Through their ministry of propaganda, each took complete control of theatre,
..the movies, the radio. Every cultural activity in every channel of information,
..was controlled by the most important members of the party.
Each did away with free courts, and trail by jury.
And substituted courts and judges, run by the party.
Each abolished labour unions, and the rights of bargaining for wages.
And under the pretext of patriotism, established the system of forced labour
Each enforced its decrees, by an army of secret police, who held the power of life and death,
..over every individual.
And for the few who still believed in freedom and said so, there was a ready answer.
"Only the application of force used continuously and ruthlessly can bring about the decision...
..in favour of the side it supports."
"Mein Kampf" -Page 189 German Edition
"The greatest intellect in the world, can be silenced with this."
That is an exact translation of the words these black-shirts cheer so lustily.
"Whenever I hear anyone mention the word culture, the first thing I do is reach for my gun."
Yes, they had the answers, the black-jack and the gun.
In ltaly they did it differently.
While in Japan.
To their names, can be added hundreds of thousands of others
..who stood in the way of the new order
Finally there is only one obstacle left,
I am the Light of the World, he that follow me shall not walk in darkness, but have the light of hope.
The word of God and the word of purists can not be reconciled.
THEN GOD MUST GO!!
"l am absolutely clear in my own mind, and I think l can speak for the Führer as well.
That both the Catholic and Protestant churches must banish from the life of our people."
Thus spoke Dr. Alfred Rosenberg and if you had any doubt he spoke for his Führer
..here's what happened.
"The Christian cross is to be removed from all churches and cathedrals and to be replaced...
..by the immortal symbol of Germany the swastika."
Berlin, 1935 700,000 members of the Protestant
Youth organizations were forced to disband.
Thousands of other men of God,
Protestant, Catholic, Jewish,
..wee persecuted, arrested and confined in concentration camps.
"Our Führer is the intermediary between his people and the throne of God.
Everything the Führer utters, is religion in the highest sense.
It is only on one or two exceptional points that Christ and Hitler stand on comparison,
..for Hitler is far too big a man to be compared with one so petty."
Everyday in all German classrooms,
"Adolf Hitler is our savoir our hero"
"He is the noblest being in the whole wide world."
"For Hitler we live."
"For Hitler we die."
"Our Hitler is our Lord."
"Who rules a brave new world."
Yes take children from the faith of their fathers, and teach them that the state is the only church.
And the head of the State, is the voice of God.
"l want to see again, in the eyes of the youth, the gleam of the beast of prey" --Hitler
That was the way of life, or better, the way of death in that other world.
Now what of our world?.
What did we want?.
What did we do about it?.
First of all, we wanted peace and security.
And to prove our sincerity, in 1921 we initiated the Washington Disarmament Conference.
This resulted in two vitally important treaties.
One, to reduce the size of the British,
Japanese, French, ltalian andAmerican Fleets.
And the other, the Nine-Power Treaty, which guaranteed the integrity of China,
And incidentally, one of the powers signing this was Japan.
Later on in 1 929, we signed the Kellog-Briand Pact...
..which was suppose to abolish wars in a means of settling international disputes.
This pact was signed by 47 nations, including Germany and Japan.
"Mr. President, I have the honour of handing you the London NavalTreaty."
Faithful to our treaty obligations,
..we scraped more than 60% of our Naval tonnage.
And our Army was reduced to a standing force of 136,000 men.
Smaller than that maintained by Romania.
We let our hopes for peace become so strong, that they grew into determination...
..not to fight unless directly attacked.
We let ourselves be influenced by those who said we could find...
..security through isolation.
The confusion in our way of thinking is apparent.
In the slice of public opinion, as it appeared in Athe News in 1939.
"Another war?. Not for me. This time
America should keep out, and I know I will."
"lf war breaks out in Europe, I think this country should heed the advice of the First President,
..and avoid all foreign entanglements"
I haven't the slightest idea of European affairs."
In the event of war in Europe, I think we should stay out of it entirely
And all our efforts should be made to keep out of the fight.!
Let Europe fight their own battles.
They mean nothing to us."
We should mind out own business.
-By all means, NO."
Yes, fight.... NO.... NO.. Yes"
If my country calls, YES."
"-NO!"
We simply did not want to understand that our individual and national problems were...
..and always will be dependant upon the problems of the whole world.
And we had individual and national problems to worry about. Plenty of them.
Just as Germany, ltaly and Japan had, but we faced it in a democratic way.
We passed laws to give working men a chance to improve their lot.
We established an insurance program for those without jobs.
It began to give old folks protection against want and hunger
We organized the C.C.C. to provide our young men with healthy and useful employment.
A Federal works program came into being and changed the face of our nation with new roads,
..bridges, schools.
It built great new dams that brought electricity of millions of our people.
These were some of our accomplishments, but there were others, not so credible.
We turned our backs on the League of Nations.
We passed theTariff Act to
..to set a higher wall of isolation around us.
We encouraged lawlessness with the farce of prohibition.
But in spite of these mistakes, we never had a thought of losing our free institutions.
John Q. Public still ran the country
He had his choice of voting for Dewey,
Wilke, Roosevelt or anybody else.
In Germany they had the choice of voting for Hitler, Hitler, or Hitler.
Over here, John Q. still read what he pleased.
And although he heard of books being burned in other countries,
..he would have laughed, if anybody told him his books would be burned.
And on Sunday, if he felt like it,
John Q. went to any church he pleased.
Most of all, he got a kick out of seeing his kids grow up.
The average American was quite unconscious of the fact that some people,
..had this in mind for the little John Q's
"To die for the Emperor is to live forever."
Japanese Army Slogan
"Three cheers for war, noble and beautiful above all." --Mussolini
Yes, while their children were being trained to kill,
..John Q. 's kids were giving their pennies to help them have life.
And when we saw these men on the news reels, quite often we laughed.
To us they looked like characters in a musical comedy.
But they weren't comic, they weren't funny, they were deadly serious.
They were out for world conquest.
And what made it deadly serious was, they were 70 million Japanese,
45 million ltalians, and 80 million Germans, all hopped up with the same idea.
Their leaders told them that they were supermen.
Herren Folk" the Nazi called it, the Master Race.
Destined to rule all other peoples on earth.
Take a good look at these humourless men.
These were to be the rulers of the ruling race.
Bear us blindly and you will obtain your rightful place in the world.
All other people will be your slaves.
That's what they promised them.
ThatAmericans, Chinese,
..Russians, SouthAmericans, all free peoples would work for them and make them rich.
And how they ate it up!
We shall restore the glory that was Rome.
Today we rule Germany.
Tomorrow the world.
The Pacific is ours!
It was inevitable that these countries should gang up on us.
The little fellow is our pal,
Kurusu
Who smiled his way into our hearts in December, 1941.
Here he and his friends are busy carving up the world in advance.
Staking out their claims.
Take a good look at these claims.
Here is the ltaly that Mussolini took over in 1922.
And almost his first act was to tell the ltalians they were the rightful...
.. owners of Corsica, Nice, Savoien,
Albania,
Tunisia, Ethiopia, and a land corridor linking it with Libya.
Later on he had an even bigger dream,
..the Old Roman Empire as it existed nearly 2000 years ago.
To dominate all the lands joining the Mediterranean.
Mare Nostrum, Our Sea they called it, just as the ancient Romans did.
As for the Japanese, they had some ambitions too.
By 1920, they had grabbed of Formosa, Korea and the southern half of the island of Sakhalin.
Then Baron Giichi Tanaka, the Prime Minister,
..carefully set down Japanese aims in a document called theTanaka Memorial.
It was presented to the Emperor on July 25, 1927.
In order to conquer the world, we must first conquer China.
Here was their dream.
Manchuria for raw materials.
China for manpower. Then a triumphant
March through lndo China...
..Siam, Burma, lndia, the East lndia,
..and on throughAustralia and New Zealand.
In the north, all they claimed was that part of Russia east of Lake Baikal.
That was to be the new order inAsia.
Then the Japs would move eastward to crush the United States.
And really start the Co-Prosperity Sphere.
Now take a look at the bite the Nazis reserved for themselves.
Here's the Germany Hitler walked into and here's what he wanted.
First Europe under his complete political and economic control.
Leaving Mussolini a share of the loot, if he behaved himself.
Then a drive to the east, through the rich oil lands of lran and lraq and into lndia.
Another push south, throughAfrica.
Then from Dakar, jump off to meet the Honorary Arians...
..who were to move in on SouthAmerica through the Pacific.
At the same time, start across the Scandinavian countries.
To hook up with his buck-toothed pals coming over from Siberia,
..to join in the conquest of the United States.
There it is gents.
All they left us was Shangri-La.
And they'd claim that too, if they knew where it was.
And did they think they had a chance?.
Listen.........
"When war comes between Japan and the
United States, I shall not be content...
..to occupy Guam, The Philippines,
Hawaii and San Francisco."
I look forward to debating the peace to the
United States in the White House in Washington."
Yamamoto wrote those words of January, 1941.
Yes the conquering Jap army down Pennsylvania
Avenue.
That was the final goal. You will see what they did to the man and women...
..of Mankind, Hong Kong and Manila.
I imagine the field day they would have enjoyed if they'd marched through the streets of Washington?.
But before striking, a preliminary step was necessary.
..From Berlin...
..From Rome...
.. From Tokyo, the Champaign started.
Propaganda, to confuse, divide, soften up their intended victims.
Put them on the defensive.
Put them on the defensive.
Scream your abuse!
Shout you're oppressed!
The World is wrong. You are right!
If you shriek it loud enough and often enough, they'll believe you.
Above all, use their free speech and their free press to destroy them.
Lebensraum" they demanded.
Living room!
Our lands are over-crowded and at the same time, they gave prizes to mothers,
..who bore the most sons.
They brought together large groups of young men and young girls for human breeding.
Read what one of their leaders wrote:
"Round up a thousand German girls. Isolate them in a camp. Then let them be joined by a hundred...
..German men. If a hundred such camps were set up, you would have 100,000 thoroughbred children in one stroke."
--Dr. Williband Hentschel
Of course the children from this assembly line, belonged to the state...
..to be scientifically trained for conquest.
Another howl, was lack of raw materials.
They claimed they were the ""have-nots"" and we were the "haves."
But out of this supposed lack, they built up the greatest war machines...
..the world has ever known.
These are the published figures from the German Military budget.
Actually between 1933, and 1939
Hitler's program of re-armament cost more than 80 billion dollars.
The Nazis alone assembled a striking force of...
..30 Panzer divisions,
70 motorized divisions,
1 40 infantry divisions, plus the Luftwaffe, the world's largest air force.
And they had no raw materials.
Think of the bread the automobiles, the good things of life the German, ltalian, Japanese leaders...
..might have given their people, if they had spent this money for peace,
..instead of war.
You know what billions we are now spending to match their military force.
No, no these arguments were all smoke screens.
When war came, the democracies proved to be the "have-nots."
And our enemies the "haves."
And when war came, where did it come?.
Remember that date, September 18, 1941.
A date we should remember as well as
December 7, 1941.
For on that date, in 1 931...
..the war we are now fighting began.
The place was Manchuria, the northern most Province of China,
..6000 miles from San Francisco.
Manchuria the first objective in the Tanaka plan.
By September 18th, the Japanese, who by treaty patrolled...
..the southern Manchuria railway, had secretly and illegally increased their garrison.
On the Korean/Manchuria border an entire
Japanese army was assembled,
..conveniently equipped for a winter campaign.
All they needed was an excuse.
They made their own.
At 10:30 that night, just after the Mukden Express passed by,
..a section of track was dynamited, causing damage to one rail and two fish-plates.
Japan's honour had violated.
In half an hour, the Japanese railroad garrison launched a co-ordinated attack, on the barracks for the sleeping Chinese army at Mukden.
The slaughter was appalling.
By midnight, the conveniently placed Japanese army,
..poured across the Korean border and the first open act of aggression...
..the invasion of Manchuria was on.
In four days they had occupied the whole of southern Manchuria.
And shortly after, the whole country.
Manchuria became Manchukuo a puppet state with an obedient stooge on the throne.
Henry Pu Yi.
A weakling, whom the Japanese had prepared for the job...
..was seven years of women and song.
In Washington, Henry L. Simson, then Secretary of State.
..was now Secretary of War,
..sent out a blistering denunciation of the attack.
The League of Nations sent a committee of five, headed by Lord Litton and...
..including our General Frank McCoy to investigate.
In October of 1932,
..the Committee issued its report.
"We found that the occupation of this large part of China,
..was not justified on the grounds of self-defence,
..and that the new State which had been set up, is Japanese projected...
..rather than a genuine case of
Manchurian self-determination."
Shortly after, The League condemned
Japan as an aggressor Nation.
It is a matter of common knowledge, that Japan's policy...
..is fundamentally inspired by a genuine desire...
..to guarantee peace in the Far East.
And to contribute to the maintenance of peace throughout the world.
Japan, however finds it impossible to accept...
..that it fought abducted by the assembly."
In answer, the Japanese delegates, knowing there were no guns behind this condemnation,
..smiled, took up their briefcases, marched out ofThe League.
Northern Manchuria was dead.
Collective security was dead.
The green light had been given to the aggressors.
We and the rest of the world knew that these aggressors should be stopped and punished,
..but we were unwilling to make the necessary sacrifices to back up that opinion.
It was impossible to convince a farm-boy in lowa, or a driver of a London bus,
..or a waiter in a Paris cafe that he should go to war,
..because of a mud hut in Manchuria.
Yet the subsequent course of history makes it clear that...
..that incident so many miles away is the reason...
..that you and millions of others are in uniform today.
The Japs had Manchuria, phase number one of theTanaka plan was completed.
Phase number 2, the conquest of China.
In 1932, without warning the Japs attacked the city of Shanghai.
Here they met such stubborn resistance, that they had to pour more than 75,000 troops...
..into the local battle, before capturing the city.
This resistance, made them decide to shift their campaign into the north.
And in 1933, they added the
Province of Jerold to Manchuria.
Yes, the Japs launched the second phase of theTanaka plan.
But they had yet to finish it.
A United Nations stands against them.
Under the inspired leadership of
General Chiang Kai-shek.
The Chinese people fought and still fight on.
Meantime, what of Japan's partners?.
What helpless people were they planning to bomb,
..drive into slavery?.
Hitler was not yet ready.
But Mussolini was. Mussolini had to be.
His people were growing restless.
Fascism hadn't produced the heaven on earth that he promised them.
So he pulled the old trick of launching a foreign war to divert the attention from troubles at home.
So Mussolini beat his chest likeTarzan and looked around for a worthy foe.
He found one. Ethiopia.
Good country for the beginning of a glorious empire.
Its army had no machine guns. Its army had no tanks.
Its army did have an air force.
Exactly one old aeroplane.
One aeroplane against the nation which had developed the theory of total air-war.
Of the blitz that would wipe out cities, destroy civilians.
Man woman, and child.
In October of 1935, following the Japanese example,
..an incident was provoked at the little settlement of Wal Wal near the border of Ethiopia...
..and ltalian Somalia land.
Italy's honour had been violated.
Refusing any arbitration, Mussolini moved the whole might of his army through...
..the Suez Canal, to overrun the undefended country
Ethiopia's Emperor, Haile Selaissie, appeared beforeThe League of Nations.
"l must still fight on until my tardy allies appear...
..and if they never come,
I say to you without bitterness,
..the West will perish."
Members of the League, half-heartedly stopped trading with ltaly.
But refused the only thing that would stop any aggressor
..force!
Ethiopia was left to herself.
Native leaders came to pledge their allegiance.
The people of Ethiopia, with their spears and bare hands,
..faced the guns and tanks of the invaders.
Fighting desperately and gallantly to save their country from conquest.
They fought and they died. But in the end, there could only be one result,
..might triumphed.
Italy conquered Ethiopia.
Many of our elected leaders warned us of danger,
.."Without declaration of war, and without warning or justification of any kind,
..civilians, including vast numbers of women and children,
..are being ruthlessly murdered with bombs from the air."
But we were still hypnotized by the fact, that two broad oceans stood between us...
..and the rest of the world.
We didn't realize that when the time was months to span these oceans, was ended.
That the steam ship had cut these months to days.
And that now the whole earth's surface could be covered in the space of hours.
Yes, we were a nation that wanted peace,
..but we hadn't yet learned that peace for us, depends on peace for all.
No one would run the risk of war for some mud huts and barren plains in Ethiopia,
..any more than we would run the risk for some similar huts and plains in Manchuria.
Correctly interpreting our attitude, the aggressors were all assure they could get what they wanted.
Japan had started on her march of conquest.
Italy had begun her new Empire.
And now the third gangster
What about him?.
We take him up in our next film.
And show how he joined his partners and put in his bid.
For this is what we are fighting.
Freedom's oldest enemy.
The passion of the few to rule the many
This isn't just a war. This is common man's life and death's...
..struggle against those who would put him back into slavery.
We lose it and we lose everything.
Our homes. The jobs we want to go back to.
The books we read. The very food we eat.
The hopes we have for our kids.
The kids themselves.
They won't be ours anymore.
That's what's at stake.
It's us or them!
The chips are down. Two worlds stand against each other.
One must die, one must live.
170 years of freedom, decrees our answer!
"Victory of the democracies can only be complete with the utter defeat of the...
..war machines of Germany and Japan."
--G.C. Marshall Chief of Staff
The guns are quiet now.
The papers of peace have been signed.
And the oceans of the earth are filled with ships coming home.
In faraway places, men dreamed of this moment.
But for some men, the moment is very different from the dream.
Here is human salvage-- the final result of all that metal and fire can do to violate mortal flesh.
Some wear the badges of their pain-- the crutches, the bandages, the splints.
Others show no outward signs, yet they too are wounded.
This hospital is one of the many for the care and treatment of the psychoneurotic soldier.
These are the casualties of the spirit-- the troubled in mind; men who are damaged emotionally.
Born and bred in peace, educated to hate war, they were overnight plunged into sudden and terrible situations.
Every man has his breaking point, and these, in the fulfillment of their duties as soldiers, were forced beyond the limit of human endurance.
At ease, men.
On behalf of the commanding officer and his staff of Mason General Hospital,
I want to extend a hearty welcome to all of you on your return to the United States.
There's no need to be alarmed at the presence of these cameras, as they are making a photographic record of your progress at this hospital from the date of admission to the date of discharge.
Here are men who tremble, men who cannot sleep, men with pains that are none the less real because they are of mental origin.
Men who cannot remember.
Paralyzed men whose paralysis is dictated by the mind.
However different the symptoms, these things they have in common-- unceasing fear and apprehension, a sense of impending disaster, a feeling of hopelessness and utter isolation.
May I have your last name?
Meishner, sir.
How do you spell that?
M-E-I-S-H...
May I have your last name, please?
Wulliver.
How do you spell that?
The psychiatrists listen to the stories of the men, who tell them as best they can.
The names and places are different.
The circumstances are different.
But through all the stories runs one thread-- death, and the fear of death.
And then after you got wounded what happened?
Same things, only worse?
Seems like my nerves keep getting worse on me.
They get worse.
These airplanes, they bother me.
I got killed nearly by one of them.
You nearly got killed.
Where were you at the time?
Saint-Lo, I believe.
Somewhere over there.
I don't remember.
What were you doing when the planes came over?
I was in a hole.
Do you know where you are?
I think I'm in the States now.
They told me I was coming back.
But they told me
I was going to die.
In the hospital I wouldn't eat, hardly.
But I was sick, and I wouldn't eat hardly.
They told me I was going to die if I didn't eat anyhow.
Told me that they didn't care whether I died or not.
We will see that you don't die.
You won't die.
I lost my last buddy up there, little Norman.
He was second scout,
I was first scout.
They had it all mixed up up there.
They were shelling us.
Well, did that make you nervous?
I should...
I'm first scout, and I should have been out in front.
And he went out and I started right after him, and he got shot.
And he... he just said,
"Oh, Dutch, I'm hit."
And he crawled to my feet, and
I start calling for the medic.
And I went back to see if I could get the medic, and there wasn't any.
And I started to go out after him again, and they wouldn't let me go.
And he was the last one of the original boys that was with me.
Him and I were the last two left out of the original.
And when you were shelled, how did you feel?
I don't know.
I just... after Norman got hurt, got killed, why I was all right when we were moving up or attacking or anything like that.
But when we get pinned down
I start thinking about him laying back there.
And what happened to you when you'd think about him?
How would you feel?
I just didn't care what happened to me.
You mean you didn't want to go back into combat again?
Yes, sir, I wanted to go back.
I wanted to stay there.
I wanted to keep on for him and all them other guys--
Norm, John, and Stryker, and
Tex, and Pop, and...
And how do you feel right now?
I feel all right.
How have you been getting along?
Well, fairly well, sir.
You were overseas.
Yes, sir.
Where?
We were in France, and then we went to Germany.
Where?
France to Germany.
And what outfit were you with?
I was with
Headquarters Detachment,
50th Quartermaster Battalion,
Mobile.
I see you're PFC.
At present, sir.
You had to go in the hospital.
Sir?
You had to go in the hospital.
Twice, sir.
It says here on your record from overseas that you had headaches, and that you had crying spells.
Yes, sir.
I believe in your profession it's called nostalgia.
In other words, homesickness.
Yes, sir.
It was induced when shortly before the war
I received a picture of my sweetheart.
Yes?
I'm sorry, I can't continue.
That's all right.
Griffith, Griffith?
Yes, sir?
Come on and sit down a minute.
Now, a display of emotion is all right.
I'm not doing this deliberately, sir.
Please believe me.
Of course you're not,
I do believe you.
A display of emotion is sometimes very helpful.
I hope so, sir.
Sure-- it gets it off your chest.
You wouldn't be here, you wouldn't have been returned as a patient, if there wasn't something upsetting you.
Yes, sir.
I'm sorry.
Well, now, you say you had received a letter from your...
Not a letter, sir.
A photograph.
A photograph, yes.
Well, what about that, now?
Well, sir, to be perfectly honest with you,
I'm very much in love with my sweetheart.
She has been the one person that gave me a sense of importance in that through her cooperation with me, we were able to surmount so many obstacles.
What happened?
Well, when I was in combat...
Can you speak louder?
I have trouble hearing you.
Yes, sir.
During the time, I got worried that my brother... he was killed in Guadalcanal.
What was he, a Marine?
Yes.
Now, I notice in this history here that you saw a vision of your brother.
What... tell me something about that.
What happened?
Oh, I guess it was a dream.
Well, describe the dream.
What did you see in the dream?
I dreamt that I was home, my brother was home, and my other brother was home.
We all were home.
All of you were home.
Sitting around the table.
Everybody was happy, and we were laughing, you know, talking.
Just admiring each other.
And then it ended there.
And you could see these images clearly.
It was like in a dream, see?
Yeah.
What about this Mindanao thing you were telling me about?
Well, in Mindanao, after I got the news,
I admit I was scared.
You were scared.
I don't know.
Sometimes I'd hope something would happen, then again I'd say, "Well, something did happen."
What do you mean by
"something happen"?
You mean you were hoping that you'd be wounded and sent back?
Is that what you mean?
No.
What do you mean by that?
I meant that I hoped that just... you know, I was so disgusted and tired of everything,
I just didn't feel like living.
And then I changed my mind, and
I'd think back to my folks, and it would be a double blow if something happened to me.
And I'd be standing guard, sitting a machine gun nest, watching.
And then I'd hear a little noise, and I'd let go, shoot.
Wasn't nothing, probably.
It was an animal or something.
Any noise made you upset, and you'd just shoot.
At that time, yes.
Do you feel worried about anything now?
I don't know.
Are you mixed up?
Kind of.
What's that pin on your shirt there?
My heart.
Why do you cover those up?
Aren't you proud of them?
Yes, sir.
You got a Purple Heart and campaign ribbons.
Yes, sir.
Well, why are you covering them up?
I mean, there must be some reason for you doing that.
Well, what happened over there?
We got in a scrape, and...
I was in the house there, just got off of guard duty.
And it was Friday the 13th, and
I'm sweating it out all day.
Patrol came up from town, patrol, and they shot a panzerfux though the wall.
Well...
And what?
I was laying on the couch, and right before it happened I felt a little jittery, so I lay down on the floor.
When I got up again, the couch was all torn.
In other words, you were almost killed.
Is that it?
Right.
It must have gone right over my head.
Do you feel conscious... that is, are you aware of the fact that you are not the same boy that you were when you went over?
Do you feel changed?
Yes, sir.
In what way?
I'm more jumpy.
How about with people?
I used to...
I used to always like to have fun.
I used to always be going places.
I don't like to do nothing no more.
How long were you overseas?
11 months.
Were you in any combat at all?
Just the second month, sir.
I tried every way to keep my mind occupied-- reading, going to the gymnasium, getting... going out with the fellows and trying to become an extrovert, trying to get out of myself.
But it seemed to Me that I got worse and worse.
And after a while I developed... after the fear of insanity,
I started developing fears, different sorts.
Did you ever have similar pains before you got...
Never in my life.
Have you ever been nervous before in your life?
No, sir.
Never. I was a solid man.
Do some noises bother you particularly?
I just shake a little, but not bad.
Well, I guess I just got tired of living.
You know, put it that way.
I have trouble sleeping, yes.
Dreaming of combat, you know?
I just took off, because I see too many of my buddies gone, and
I figured the next one was me.
A man can just stand so much up there, see?
Admission note.
Poole, P-O-O-L-E comma Walter L,
T5.
Transfer diagnosis.
Anxiety reaction, severe.
Active symptoms in remission.
On this, their first night back in the States, each man who is able may make a long distance call without cost.
After months and years of silence, familiar voices are heard once again.
Then each man makes for himself a small home which will be his for the eight or ten weeks to come.
Now in the darkness of the ward emerge the shapes born of darkness, the terror of things half remembered.
Dreams of battle, the torment of uncertainty and fear and loneliness.
The day begins with an early morning ward inspection.
The medical officer in charge checks the condition of every man.
Modern psychiatry makes no sharp division between the mind and the body.
Physical ills often have psychic causes, just as emotional ills may have a physical basis.
Possibilities of organic disturbance in the brain are investigated by means of the electroencephalograph.
The Rorschach Test.
The things that the patient's imagination sees in these cards gives significant clues to his personality makeup.
This looks sort of like a drawing of two women standing on a rock and waving their hands.
This man suffering from a conversion hysteria requires immediate treatment.
Organically sound, his paralysis is as real as if were caused by a spinal lesion.
But it is purely psychological.
Well, just sit up top the middle of the bed there.
I feel pretty good, though.
That's fine.
Now sit yourself over there.
Well, now, can you move over just a little so I can talk to you?
Yes, sir.
Now, what is the trouble?
You seem to be upset.
Just nervous.
Nervous?
Yes.
It makes me flinch like that.
I see.
How long has that been going on?
Since Friday.
Friday.
Friday night.
Come on suddenly or gradually?
Suddenly, sir.
How?
Well, it started in the afternoon with crying spells.
And felt something funny in my shoulders here.
Back bothered me.
Just started crying, lost control of my legs and my arms.
Was there any reason for crying spells?
I don't know, sir.
Anything happen at home to bother you?
Well, my mother's been ill.
She has been ill?
That worry you a lot?
Quite a bit.
Well, now, has this got anything to do with your mother's illness?
Any reason why you should have that kind of reaction?
No, sir, not that I know of.
Unless my mother's illness might have brought this on.
I try to hold in, but it hurts.
I see.
You've just been holding these things in.
That's right, sir.
No way you can control this at all?
No, sir.
Well, now, we're going to have to help you do that, of course.
Let's take off this jacket here.
Just slip that off.
All right, now lie down on the bed.
Shoes?
No, we're leaving the shoes on so you can walk in them.
I think we're going to get you walking.
Let's come over here.
That's the boy.
That's fine.
That's good.
Now you lie steady.
Lie steady, that's a boy.
This is all going to go away as
I give you this medicine.
No bother at all.
The method employed here is effective in certain types of acute cases.
An intravenous injection of sodium amytal induces a state similar to hypnosis.
What a torpedo that is.
You mind if I look this way?
You look that way.
Nothing for you to watch here.
But you're going to talk to me as we go along.
Yes, sir.
That's all.
Now, you're not going to feel much of anything else.
You're going to feel a little bit woozy.
The use of this drug serves a twofold purpose.
Like hypnosis, it is a shortcut to the unconscious mind.
As a surgeon probes for a bullet, the psychiatrist explores the submerged regions of the mind, attempting to locate and bring to the surface the emotional conflict which is the cause of the patient's distress.
The second purpose of this drug is to remove through suggestion those symptoms which impede the patient's recovery.
Now tell me a little bit about what you're thinking of.
The thoughts are coming to your mind now.
Nothing in particular.
Well, now, let's go back.
Let's go back to Friday.
Friday?
Yeah, think about that.
Friday.
My mother argues with me.
Your mother argues with you.
Yeah.
What does she argue about?
Oh, every little thing.
If you sit down in the wrong chair or something like that.
Doesn't like the stuff we get in the store.
Then she calms down.
Well, see, have you always tried to please her?
Yes.
Always tried to please her.
I used to clean the house with her when I was smaller.
Well, now, why do you think she argues like that?
Because she's sick?
Well, she doesn't try to control her temper.
I see.
How about your father?
He's a swell guy.
He's a swell fellow, is he?
Gets kind of hot tempered.
Since my mother's been sick it's been costing a lot of money.
And he's lost a lot of weight from worrying.
I see.
My mother argues with him, she wants to know where the money is.
But I don't care about that, long as everything turns out all right.
Yeah.
Well, now, this jumping, what does that make you think of?
Think about it a minute.
I can't help it.
It just jumps.
How about the legs?
Do you know anybody that had any trouble with their legs like that?
No, sir.
Except...
What did it make you think of? Go on.
Except several... several years ago...
...there was one fellow, he had something wrong with his right leg.
Wound in the knee, but he's walking today.
That hasn't bothered me.
Was that anything like your leg?
No, he couldn't walk at all.
He couldn't walk at all?
No.
What do you think of when you can't walk like that?
I wish I could walk.
But what do you think of?
What comes to your mind when you find that you can't walk?
Just maybe I think my mother and father should be okay.
Sometimes I wonder.
Hope the war ends soon, and things like that.
I see.
Nothing in particular.
Mm-hmm. And now the shakes are gone, now, haven't they?
Yeah.
How about your legs?
They're good and strong.
They feel all right.
Move them.
Let's raise them.
I was able to raise them before, but I can't walk.
How about them now?
They feel all right.
They feel good now, as if you can walk on them, don't they?
Toes feel numb.
Toes feel numb, but that's going away, isn't it?
Yeah.
See? Raising them fine, isn't it?
Yeah.
Now you're going to be able to walk, aren't you?
I don't know.
Well, you're going to, aren't you?
Yes, sir.
All right.
I'll walk.
I like walking.
You love walking.
Always been very fond of walking.
Now you've found yourself unable to walk.
Now you're going to get right up and walk, right now.
All right, now let's sit up.
Sit up on the side of the bed.
Here you are.
That's fine.
All right, now stand up.
And look at that.
That good?
All right, now walk out here.
Walk over to the nurse all by yourself.
That's the boy.
Walk over to the nurse.
You're just a little woozy.
That's the medicine.
Now come back to me.
Come back to me.
Open your eyes.
That's the boy.
Isn't that fine, isn't that wonderful?
Sure.
All right, now again, once more.
Careful.
I don't know how long I'm going to be this way.
Oh, it's going to stay that way.
It's going to stay, because that's taken care of your worry now.
All right, now come on back to me, and I'm going to let you go to sleep.
When you wake up, you'll keep on walking perfectly well.
How about it?
Thanks, sir.
Right-o.
All right, now let's get up on here, and we'll go to sleep.
Now, there you go.
Now, I'm going to have you go right to sleep.
When you wake up, it'll be all right.
Thanks.
All right, sleep, Girardi.
The fact that he can walk now does not mean that his neurosis has been cured.
That will require time.
But the way has been opened for the therapy to follow.
Now a new way of living begins, very different from the old one, whose purpose was killing and trying not to be killed.
Now in an environment of peace and safety, all the violence behind them, they are building rather than destroying.
Men have their choice of occupational therapy.
Some find relaxation in mechanical jobs.
Certain types of cases obtain relief in precision work, which answers their inner need for order and certainty.
For sons and daughters and nieces and nephews and neighbors' kids, hobbyhorses are turned out by the carload.
Physical reconditioning is not the only purpose in sports, which also serve to bring men out of their emotional isolation and back into group activity.
One of the most important procedures is group psychotherapy.
Here under the psychiatrist's guidance the patient learns to understand something of the basic causes of his distress.
As one of a group, he also learns to understand that his inner conflicts are, with variations, common to all men.
I think of it a little bit like this.
We want to get you out of your own feeling of isolation, to get you to feel like you are like other people.
In order to get to that, we have to use knowledge as one thing, and something else which has to be added, and that is an experience of safety.
You could say it is almost the core of all our treatment methods-- development of knowledge of oneself with the accompanying safety that it brings.
I'd like to see if we can get some illustrations of how one's personal safety would stem from childhood safety, and how the childhood safety itself would stem from the parents' safety.
My illustration, as a child, whenever I underwent any experiences that were frightening to me, I never told my parents.
I kept it to myself.
While I was alone at night in my room I'd call on God.
If I did anything wrong that I was ashamed of,
I was ashamed to go to my parents and tell them what I had done.
So I kept it to myself.
And I used to...
I know I used to be in constant fear that my parents would find out my feelings.
Well, I wonder if there's any of your mother's troubles that you would know about.
No, my mother never gave any of the children any part of her troubles.
Well, that would be the same thing that happened to you.
She didn't tell her troubles, and you didn't tell yours.
You took your troubles to God, and she probably did the same thing.
Probably didn't even confide in your father.
In other words, the kind of method that you used to get relief from anxiety was really, we have to assume, learned and felt right in your home in the same kind of thing.
I think it was all caused by economic conditions in the world.
I mean, people trying to comp... compete with one another, trying to get a better job, trying to keep up with the prices of living.
Things like that have caused a lot of arguments in the home.
Mother and father arguing about the price of food, and that has a reflection on the children, things like that.
So I think that was one of the causes.
Was it worse not having enough food to eat, or the arguments between them?
Well, both.
I mean, there was...
Which was the worst, though?
I guess the arguments.
Sure they were.
Of course they are.
Because I can't remember about the food.
There you are.
You can't even remember about the food, and the lack of food.
I have in mind my own childhood, where, coming from a moderate family... moderate in the sense that the family had some sense of security.
What happened there was we were told that we...
I mean, myself, my brothers and sisters, we couldn't just play with any of the kids we wanted to play with, unless their parents in turn had the equivalent of what our parents had.
And as a result, we were kept in a narrow circle, very, very, narrow.
However, I have found that there has been a strong yearning on my part to break out of this environment, to be able to play with Tom,
Dick, and Harry.
I say the net result's like this.
Your mother did not feel really so superior.
She felt inferior when she tried to make you take the attitude you were better than the other children, so that now certain experiences in the Army have brought that out more clearly, because you've been thrown in with Tom and Dick and Harry, and need to get along with them.
It's not necessary to be in the
Army.
It's not necessary to be in the war.
These kind of troubles have always gone on in all time through all the centuries.
You were going to say something.
I never spoke until I was seven.
Is that right?
Yes, sir.
And I stuttered very bad.
At 14 and 15 I couldn't recite in school.
Today I'm able to talk.
Can you explain how you got started to talk, how you began to get over that?
During the war, the first word I ever spoke,
Santa Claus had brought me a war gun, and my brother broke it.
This is the First World
War, yes.
And so I...
Santa Claus was not in your...
When I went in to get my gun, I just said... walked in, "Somebody broke my gun."
That was the first thing I said.
You were angry because someone broke your gun.
So that's the way I started talking.
I would say all those symptoms, like being unable to speak, stuttering and so on, they have an underlying anger and resentment in the deeper parts of the personality.
You could almost say it like this.
Underneath "I can't" you usually find "I won't."
Stuttering on Okinawa,
I was stuttering too, about three weeks.
And as soon as I came here...
I've been here a month now...
I stopped stuttering.
You've stopped stuttering completely since you came here.
Yes, sir.
Well, that's good.
I don't know whether that's a tribute to the doctors or a tribute to your fundamental health.
It's due to my fundamental self.
No tribute to the doctors at all.
No, sir.
Very good.
Some patients require special therapy.
Hypnosis is often effective in certain types of battle neuroses, such as amnesia.
This man does not even remember his own name.
A shell burst in Okinawa wiped out his memory.
The experience was unendurable to his conscious mind, which rejected it, and along with it, his entire past.
Through hypnotic suggestion, the psychiatrist will attempt to evoke them.
Relax completely, and put your mind on going to sleep.
All right, now, keep your eyes on mine, keep your eyes on mine, and keep them fixed on mine.
Keep your mind entirely on falling asleep.
You're going to go into a deep sleep as we go in.
You're going to go into a deep sleep as we go in.
Now clasp your hands in front of you.
Clasp them tight, tight, tight, tight, tight.
They're getting tighter and tighter and tighter, and as they get tighter, you're falling asleep.
As they get tighter and you're falling asleep, your eyes are getting heavy, heavy.
Now your hands are locked tight.
They're locked tight.
They're locked tight.
You can't let go.
They're locked tight.
You can't let go.
When I snap my fingers, you'll be able to let go.
When I snap my finger, you'll be able to let go, and then you'll get sleepier, and your eyes are getting heavier.
Now your eyes are getting heavier, heavier, heavier.
You're going into a deep, deep sleep.
You're going into a deep, deep sleep.
Deep asleep, far asleep.
Eyes are now closed tight, closed tight.
Going to a deep, deep sleep.
Deeply relaxed, far asleep.
You're far asleep.
You're far asleep.
Now you're in a deep sleep.
You have no fear, no anxiety.
No fear, no anxiety.
Now you're in a deep, deep, sleep.
Now just sit down in the chair behind you.
Sit down in the chair behind you.
Lean back.
Head now falls forward into a deep, deep sleep.
Head now is falling forward.
You're going further and further and further asleep.
When I stroke, your left arm will become rigid like a bar of steel, and you'll go further asleep and further asleep.
You're falling further and further and further asleep.
Rigid.
Cannot be bent or relaxed.
When I touch the top of your head, when I touch the top of your head, that arm will relax, and the other will become rigid, and you'll go further asleep.
You'll be in a very deep sleep.
And your sleep is deeper and deeper.
Now when I touch this hand, my finger will be hot.
When I touch this hand, my finger will be hot.
You will not be able to bear it.
Your arm is rigid.
And now, as I touch your hand, you will no longer feel any pain there.
It will be normal.
Now the arm is relaxed, and you're further and further and further asleep.
Now you're deep asleep.
We're going back.
We're going back now.
Going back to Okinawa.
Going back to Okinawa.
You can talk.
You can talk.
You can remember everything.
You can remember everything.
You're back on Okinawa.
Tell me what you see.
Tell me.
Speak.
I'm in the battery area.
You're in the battery area.
Go on, tell me what's going on.
Getting fire missions.
You're getting fire missions.
Go on.
You see everything now clearly.
Getting shells thrown at us.
You're getting shells thrown at you.
From where?
Japs.
Japs. Go on.
Yes.
Keep on.
You remember it all now.
Every bit of it's coming back.
Japs getting near us to get our position.
Japs getting near you to get your position.
Go on.
Told us to get cover.
Who told you to get cover?
BC.
BC.
Go on.
They spotted us.
One of the boys got hurt.
One of the boys got hurt.
Took him away.
Yes, go on.
You remember it now.
Tell me.
It's all right now, but you can tell me.
You can tell me.
Explosion.
Yes.
You remember the explosion now.
All right, go on.
They're carrying me.
They're carrying you.
Who's carrying you?
I don't know.
Where are they taking you?
Carrying me across the field.
Across the field.
Go on.
Put me on a stretcher.
Yes?
Yes?
Go on.
They're still throwing shells.
Yes, can you hear them?
Yes.
You see them?
No.
All right.
Where are they taking you now?
In a truck.
Why are you fearful now?
I want no more of this.
You don't want any more.
No.
You want to forget it.
But you're going to remember it, because it's gone now.
It's gone.
You're back here now.
You're away from Okinawa.
You've forgotten it.
But you remember who you are now.
Who are you?
Dali.
Dali, that's right.
Full name now.
Dominic Dali.
Dominic Dali, that's right.
Know your mother's name?
Isabel.
That's right.
Father's?
Salvatore.
That's fine.
You know who they all are now.
All right, now you're coming back with us.
This is going to stay with you.
You're going to remember it all.
You're going to remember about
Okinawa.
You're going to remember about the shells and the bombs, but they're gone.
You're at ease, you're relaxed.
There's no fear, no anxiety.
When I wake you up, you'll be comfortable, relaxed, no pains, and no aches.
But you'll remember all that
I've told you, all that you've remembered.
You can wake now.
Well, how are you?
Pretty good.
Under the guidance of the psychiatrist, he is able to regard his experience in its true perspective as a thing of the past, which no longer threatens his safety.
Now he can remember.
Well, Hofmeister, what's your trouble?
It's hard for me to get my words out.
Yeah, it does seem to be a bit tough.
How long have you had that trouble?
It started about a month ago.
Where were you then?
I was in France.
You were in France.
Have you been in combat?
Yes.
Well, maybe we can help you talk a bit better, and you can tell me more about it then, right?
Let's lie down and see if we can't help you on that.
This man is not a chronic stutterer.
He suffers from a battle tension which the drug will attempt to diminish.
Like the man who could not walk and the man who could not remember, his illness has an emotional basis.
Get all comfortable now, and relaxed.
We're just going to give you some medicine here, and it's going to help limber up that tongue of yours.
And this is going to make you feel a bit groggy.
Well, now, tell me now, how do you feel now?
Make any difference in your feeling?
Boy, and how.
It's just like seventh heaven.
What is it?
Tell me about it.
Boy, I can talk.
That's fine, isn't it?
I can talk!
I can talk!
That's good, boy.
Listen, I can talk!
Oh, God, listen, I can talk!
Holy Mother of God, listen!
All right, it's coming back now.
Take it easy.
Oh, listen, I can talk!
Just the way you always did, isn't that right?
Listen.
Oh, God, I can talk.
Just the way you always did, Hofmeister.
Why don't you try going with it now?
Oh, nice!
Let's take it easy now.
Just talk just a little lightly now.
Tell me, got any idea why you couldn't talk before?
What's coming to your mind now?
Tell me, what's coming to your mind now?
What is it in your mind when you couldn't talk?
What is it that stopped it?
Something came through there and stopped it.
What is it, now?
Think quickly, think deeply.
Let's go back.
When was it you lost your speech, had your trouble talking?
Go back quickly.
Seems that I first noticed it on a boat.
On a boat.
Going over.
It first started with an S.
And the fellows laughed at me.
I don't know why they laughed, until the guy started...
Well, let's start with that
S.
Let's go back to that S now.
What were you thinking then?
What was in your mind then?
Right now?
No, then.
On the boat?
Yes, with that S.
When you couldn't say S right.
S.
The port side.
Port side.
Port side.
Port side of the ship.
What side's that?
That would be the left side.
Left side, that's right.
Yeah, I remember it.
Because we were out there that afternoon, and we saw the fishes.
And we had some flying fishes.
And I came down, and I said...
I was telling the fellow underneath me about the port... that I had seen some flying fishes on the port side.
He tried telling them about the flying fishes, and he stumbled over the S sound.
And the fellows laughed at him.
Think hard, S, S.
What does S remind him of?
S, S.
He remembers-- it is a sound he fears.
A sound of death in combat.
The sound of a German 88 high explosive shell coming in.
Now it is possible to proceed to the basic method of psychiatric treatment-- discussion and understanding of the underlying causes of his symptom.
As the weeks pass, the therapy begins to show its effect.
The shock and stress of war are starting to wear off.
For these men are blessed with the naturally regenerative powers of youth.
Now they are living less in the past and more in the present.
Sometimes they think of the future.
The war years must be put aside, and the responsibilities of peace must be considered.
A man might open a filling station, or a hardware store.
Or he can buy a few acres of land and raise some chickens.
He might even go back to school.
Visitors day.
Now the men resume their contact with the world outside.
These are the people they are coming back to, whose lives are bound up with theirs.
Without their understanding, all that has been accomplished in the last few weeks can be torn down.
With it, their return to life can be doubly swift and sure.
Classes in group psychotherapy continue.
The men are thinking of themselves in relation to society.
How will they fit into the postwar pattern?
How will the world receive them?
You fellows have had an opportunity to be home with your families since you've returned from overseas.
Have you noticed any change in the various members of your family toward you, and their reactions toward you?
Well, I found out after four years of absence that it only took me the second day to be really relaxed, and I was right chummy again with my dad, and we talked about the old neighborhood and the new changes.
I don't know.
It surprised me.
Do you feel that your family has to be taught how to treat you when you come back?
No, absolutely not.
How do you want to be treated by family?
The same I was treated before I went into the service, no different.
You don't want to be treated any differently?
No.
I was talking to one man, and I said,
"What do you think of us fellows that come back with Psychoneurosis Anxiety
State?"
And I says, "You can see that we're not crazy, by any means."
And he says, "Well, before I came out here to see you," he says, "my first impression was like in Bellevue."
He said, "The fellows from the last war there are completely maniacs."
He said, "That was my first impression."
And I'm wondering if, I mean, the great percentage of the people are going to be like that when we get out.
That is a common concern among servicemen who have developed nervous conditions during their stay in the Army, as to what the public is going to think about them.
Undoubtedly there will be people on the outside who won't have any understanding of the condition, who may think of it as being a rather shameful condition.
That's why we're having an educational program, trying to education the public into understanding.
Unfortunately, most of you fellows have gone through some very severe stresses in the army, stresses that civilians are rarely subjected to.
In civilian life, you can avoid serious stresses.
If a civilian, the average civilian, were subjected to similar stresses, he undoubtedly would have developed the same type of nervous condition that most of you fellows developed.
All of us have our so-called breaking point.
And our survey outside showed that civilians on the whole were more nervous than soldiers.
On Park Avenue, for instance, where some of your richest people live, most of the patients are people who suffer from nervous disorders.
And if the doctor won't give them a pill, why, they'll go out and say, "Well, he's not a good doctor."
So therefore they're given pills, and they take them at home.
They take these pills at home because the hospitals are too full.
If the hospitals were empty, they'd be in a sanitarium or so forth.
Having been through a number of these discussions, like the other men have, I know that we have learned the basis of how we've gotten nervous.
Some of us through combat, and some of us by not being in combat.
And I think... and I'm sure that we have a better understanding of our conditions, and I'm pretty grateful of being here at Mason General Hospital, like a lot of fellows are.
It just so happens I couldn't walk.
And they made me walk.
I couldn't walk when I arrived, and I was here 24 hours, and they made me walk.
I feel pretty grateful for getting my limbs back.
But that's what I'm driving at, is that I know that when I get out of here, and the other fellows do too, we're going to try our best to make ourselves as best we can.
And we feel more confident to grasp this nervous situation that's come about us, and we want to show people that we can do things on our own on the outside, whether we've been in a hospital for nerves, or wherever we've been, whether we've lost an arm or a leg, that we can be just as good as anybody else.
All I want is that they give us a chance to prove our equality, like they said they were.
And I hope they keep their promise.
That's all I hope.
Would you make it a point to tell your employer that you were a psychoneurotic?
Well, if he's an intelligent man, which most well-known employers are, that own large concerns, why he's going to react the same as any other normal human being would.
He's going to say, "It's absolutely plausible, and the man right now looks all right.
I'll try him out."
But you may run into employers who are not that broad minded, or intelligent.
Yes, sir.
And I'll sell myself to them.
How about you, Hofmeister?
Do you have any plans about jobs, or do you have any fears about getting a job?
I have no fear whatsoever.
I've got my job waiting for me, sir.
You have your job waiting for you.
I think it comes down to this, doesn't it-- that most of you fellows feel that you ought to be honest with your employer, that you have nothing to hide, nothing to be ashamed of?
Isn't that the general attitude?
Yes, sir.
That's the way all the men feel.
Your time in the service was not entirely wasted.
You have learned a great deal in the service.
For instance, a great many jobs and tasks that you've learned to do in the service that you'll have had absolutely no contact with in the past.
You've also learned to work in groups, something that every soldier learns to do very early in his military career.
This definitely will be of much value to you in your future civilian employment.
The weeks have slipped by fast.
The first strangeness of hospital life has become routine.
Sometimes a man learns something new.
Deranger always did want to play guitar.
And now the days begin to seem long.
There's the old healthy sound of bellyaching in the air--
"Spinach, spinach again."
And, "How about a good movie for a change?"
And, "How about putting some ice cream in the ice cream soda?"
No longer is a man shut up within the lonely recesses of himself.
He is breaking out of his prison into life-- the life that lies ahead, offering infinite possibilities for happiness and sorrow.
How does a man find happiness?
Is there a secret to discover?
What is the mysterious ingredient that gives joy and meaning to living?
You know in the Bible where it says,
"Man does not live by bread alone"?
Children don't grow up well without safety and confidence.
If that wasn't in one's childhood, in growing up, you could say, "Now, there's something missing during all that time."
And the next question is how to supply it.
And it does need to be supplied.
Not all of the learning in all of the books is half as valuable in getting over nervousness as to find someone that you esteem, that you can learn to feel safe with, where you can get a feeling of being accepted, or cherished, where you get a feeling that you're worthwhile, and that you're important to someone.
You could say the feeding that you didn't get, that something more than bread, when you were little, you still need to get it.
You still need to be fed with acceptance, and to find the safety.
In other words, knowledge alone is not enough.
Home, Sarge! Home, home!
Nobody got it.
Get up, get up!
Get up, get up and go around!
Eight weeks have passed.
What about these men?
Are they ready for discharge?
How complete is their recovery?
How about the boy in right field?
I just didn't care what happened to me.
How about the kid at bat?
Foxhole was covered by dirt.
I was covered up for 29 hours afterwards, until they found me.
He's out, he's out!
Out! Joe, you're out.
Joe, you're out.
How about the umpire?
Hard for me to get my words out.
You're out, go on!
Batter up.
How about this kid?
How about him?
Are they well enough to be discharged?
That is for the doctors to decide at tomorrow's boarding.
The answer is yes.
Men, this is your last military formation.
Today you are returning to your homes, your families, and friends.
Many of you have been looking forward eagerly to this day.
But remember that when you reenter civilian life, on your shoulders falls much of the responsibility for the postwar world.
May your lives as civilians be as worthy as your records as soldiers.
Good health, good fortune, and Godspeed.
WHY WE FlGHT
A SERlES OF SEVEN lNFORMATlON FlLMS
THE BATTLE OF BRlTAlN
SPEClAL SERVlCE DlVlSlON lNFORMATlON FlLM #4
Produced by: THE WAR DEPARTMENT SPEClAL
SERVlCE DlVlSlON S.O.S.
With Cooperation of:
THE SlGNAL CORPS
JUNE 1940
The shadow of the conquering German armies, covered western Europe.
The self-styled master race, was riding high.
DUNKlRK
Calais
Now Adolph Hitler stood, just as Napoleon had stood, more than 100 years before.
And looked across the English Channel to the one fighting obstacle that stood...
..between him and world domination.
The chalk cliffs of Britain rose sheer and white, out of the choppy waters.
And beyond, a little island, smaller than the state of Wyoming.
Crush that island, and its stubborn people and the way was open for world conquest.
The fall ofAustria, Czechoslovakia, Poland, Denmark,
Norway,
..Holland Belgium, France had given him more than
100 million slaves,
..to work for him or starve.
The preliminaries were over, it was time for the main event. The battle of Britain.
Berlin
Where Napoleon failed, I shall succeed. I shall land on the shores of Britain."Adolph Hitler
Hitler and his Generals feverishly drafted their plans for the conquest of Britain.
Every detail must be anticipated.A slip now, might wreck the timetable of world conquest.
Six weeks of final preparation went into those plans.
Six weeks to determine the history of a thousand years.
The thing was fool-proof. See for yourselves how simple the whole operation was meant to be. Look.
GERMAN PLAN FOR lNV ASlON OF ENGLAND
PHASE l
Knock out the Royal Air Force and its bases.
Get control of the air and sea lanes across the channel.
Follow the blitz plan that wiped out the low countries, Poland and France.
Destroy communication and transport lines.
Above all, get command of the air.
PHASE ll
Pulverize the coast line with dive bombers.
Drop parachute troops to take over the air fields and establish beach heads.
Drop parachute troops to take over the air fields and establish beach heads.
PHASE lll
Actual invasion.
Pour the German Panzer divisions across, in high speed barges,
..under an umbrella protecting fighter planes. then send spear-heads of armed might, to divide, surround, destroy all opposition.
That's all there was to it.
Conquer Britain. Force the surrender of the British fleet. then with the combined sea-power of Germany,
Britain, ltaly, France and Japan,
..he could control the seas, and tell us whereto head in.
The torch of freedom flickered low.
On the invasion coasts, more than 100fully equipped
German divisions were singing the Nazi theme song,
We are sailing against England.", as they waited the word from Hitler.
Here, for weeks, all the supplies and weapons of the
Nazi war machine...
..had been turned toward Britain.
The jaws of the Nazi whale, were set to swallow Jona.
And what about Jona?. How was he doing?.
Well, Britain also had an army
But it was an army dragged from sea at Dunkirk.
An army without weapons. These had been left behind on the roads of France.
Tanks, guns,
..motorized equipment,
..all abandoned to save the one priceless item...
.. men!
In all of Britain, there was not enough equipment for one modern division.
Only one tank for every thousand square miles of territory.
Only one machine gun, for every 1 500 miles of beach.
Britain had a navy too, but it was scattered all over the globe,
..guarding vital food and supply lines.
And the British knew it would be suicidal to use their fleet in the narrow waters ofThe English Channel,
..with the German air force in control of the air.
Britain also had an air force.
An air force outnumbered 10 to 1 by the enemy
..both in men and machines.
There was Britain herself.
The people of Britain.
The people who would be terrorized and forced to surrender.
They knew every man, woman and child, in uniform and out,
..would be Hitler's target, in the onslaught that could come at any moment.
They knew they had a job to do and not much time to do it in.
The young, the not so young and the old.
The clerk, the butcher, the farmer, the member of
Parliament,
..they formed the civilian army,
Britain's Home guard.
They started from scratch.
Experience, equipment, supplies...
..all were scarce.
Only one shell to fire at each practice.
The women of Britain refused to be left out.
We're in this too."
We'll put up the barrage balloons."
Man the air cat guns."
We'll run railroads and get the trains through on time."
Ferry the planes."
Carry the dispatches."
Drive the ambulances and run the buses."
And we'll see our male are fed, and don't go hungry."
Others worked.
They worked full time.
Overtime.
Double time.
Forty hours a week, fifty, sixty, seventy.
Hours meant nothing.
Fatigue meant nothing.
Until the government forced them to cut down hours, because over-fatigue was...
..hurting production.
And when they weren't working the men patrolled the moors for parachutes...
..blocked the roads...
.. rehearsed invasion defenses.
For something had happened here the Germans could never understand.
In a democracy, it is not the Government that makes war...
..it is the people.
To lead them, the people had chosen Winston
Churchill as their Prime Minister.
To lead them, the people had chosen Winston
Churchill as their Prime Minister.
And he spoke the word in every British heart, when he said:
We shall defend our island, whatever the cost may be."
We shall fight in landing grounds, in fields, in streets, and on the hills."
We shall never surrender."
This was Britain in its darkest hour.
The people knew they were in for the worse the Nazi mind could invent, yet...
..they didn't panic or run away
They patrolled and waited.
They drilled and waited.
They worked and waited.
Waited for the terror they knew was coming.
Then it came!
That is the sound that became part of life, for every man, woman and child in Britain.
August 8th, 1940 and the battle for Britain is on.
Thirty enemy aircraft over the channel, flying due west."
Here comes the Luftwaffe.
In dozen of flights, hundreds of planes.
Bombers, fighters, dive-bombers, across that 21 miles of channel.
That eight short minutes of water.
Their first tactics were to bomb convoys in the channel.
Convoys loaded with food and munitions, bounded for the great port of London.
German fighters waited overhead for the defending planes of the RoyalAir Force, the RAF to appear.
They didn't have long to wait.
The RAF came, facing of 6, 8, 10 to 1,
..and dove in, shouting the old hunting cry: "Tallyho!"
Phase one of the Nazi plan, called for the RAF to be knocked out of the air...
..but the men of the RAF, hadn't read the Nazi plan.
In the first 4days, the RAF knocked
182 German planes out of the sky
For the next week the Germans attacked the coast cities from the Thames River to Weymouth.
Mr. Getty, take cover!"
Spitfire!"
And Hitler paid off with 180 more planes.
Then the Luftwaffe battered the great towns of Southampton,
..Plymouth....
..trying for a knockout, before the flow of supplies from overseas reached port.
The ports took a terrible pounding, but they couldn't be knocked out.
Cargos went on being unloaded, with the protection of the RAF overhead.
Battling the Spitfires and Hurricanes in the air wasn't panning out.
So Göring switched his main attacks to the fighter airfields, Dover,
Deal, Bucking.
Maybe he could destroy the planes on the ground.
He bombed the air fields, and the fields were hit...
..but the planes were saved.
For Britain, unlike Poland and the low countries, didn't make the mistake of bunching its planes on the runways.
The planes of the RAF were scattered and hidden.
Only a few on any one field, and those in the far corners.
The Spitfires still went up to meet the enemy
In the first 10 days of the Battle of Britain, Göring launched 26 major attacks to get command of the air
And lost 697 aircraft. The British lost 153.
And 60 British pilots bailed out.
Valuable trained men were saved, and ready to fight again,
..but the crews to Göring's planes, were lost to him forever.
The pace was too hot.
Something was going haywire.
The Nazis had to call "timeout".
On a 2000 mile front, from Norway to France,
..the whole Nazi blitz program was being stalled, because the RAF was still in the air.
The long-range German guns were getting hot,
..from throwing shells across the channel.
In public, Hitler assured the Germans,
Mr. Churchill tells his people that England will win...
..but I tell you victory will belong to Germany"
But in private, he sent for Göring, the boss of the Luftwaffe, and put him on the hot seat.
Göring was told to do something and do it quick.
So on August 30th, he ordered all out attacks on inland air drones and industrial centers.
Maybe he could knock out the RAF on the assembly line.
And he adopted new tactics too.
More fighters and fewer bombers, or maybe he just had fewer bombers to send.
Anyway, those he did send were well protected.
Fighters above at high altitudes.
Fighters on both sides.
Fighters in the front and in the rear Fighters weaving in and out of the bomber formations.
Fighters in the front and in the rear Fighters weaving in and out of the bomber formations.
Britain, winner of the first round, was ready
With higher morale and sharper defense.
Improved listening posts were set up all along the coast.
And warned of the enemy's approach, before he left the continent.
A quick flash from the control station to the fighter station.
And pilots were on their way to meet the enemy while he was still over the channel.
Day after day, out of sight, an almost out of sound of the watchers on the cliffs.
Four, five and six miles above, the battles raged over the Dover area.
The Dover area became known as Hell's Corner.
By sheer weigh of numbers, the enemy again and again broke through the coastal defenses.
And reached inland to the air drone.
Aircraft plants.
Munitions, factories and machine shops.
Hello, gunfire in the southeast. Right."
But the workers kept on working.
And the RAF kept on flying.
These few men with wings, alone in the sky
..behind their motors and machine guns,
..were shooting down more than the Luftwaffe.
They were smashing the whole Nazi plan of world conquest.
Any claims Johnny??'
109 destroyed, yes."
-"Oh, good show!"
How did you get on sir??'
-"Oh, I had a wonderful party, thanks."
Are you all right?. Have you hit any of the batters??'
-"Yes, I got a Messerschmitt 109."
Between August 24th and September 5,
35 major attacks were launched.
They cost the Germans 562 planes, while the British lost only 219 planes and...
..and saved 132 pilots.
Invasion plans were going completely haywire.
Berchtesgaden
The Nazis were blind with rage.
The German mind has never understood why free people fight on against overwhelming odds.
Hitler knew he was now superior in every weapon, expect the weapon of spirit.
So he told Göring, break that spirit, crush the people, crush the spirit of democratic life itself.
Invasion now, would have to wait.
The Nazis would avoid the RAF and smash the great city of London,
..into the rubble heap they had made of Warsaw and Rotterdam.
Could London take it?. Even the people themselves didn't know the answer.
The defenses they trusted in, were London's hastily assembled anti-aircraft.
The Ack-Ack guns. The balloon barrages which kept the raiders at high altitude.
The Royal Air force, now down to its last reserves.
And the plain down-right guts of people.
They sent more children out of the city
Tightened air-raid precautions.
Stationed more aero plane spotters.
Rehearsed firefighters.
Moved into bomb shelters.
They blacked out their city, and carried on.
The first blow, aimed to crush the British spirit,
..came on September 7th.
Control room speaking."
-"Customers and staff, will now take cover...
.. in the basement. Please do not run, keep moving."
Down the stairs or you can use the escalator."
Third floor clear. Second floor clear.
First floor, clear."
That day when 375 German planes came roaring up theThames River,
The battle of Britain, became the Battle of London.
The German's broke through the charge of Spitfires and Hurricanes that went out to meet them.
Gone was any pretence of aiming at military objectives.
This was just savage destruction.
Bombs fell alike on the homes of the east-end poor,
..and the Mayfair rich.
On shops.
Hospitals.
Churches.
For 28 days the Nazis were to drop everything in the book on the city of London.
Tons upon tons of high explosives.
Delayed action bombs had exploded days later
Torpedo that had sheered away whole buildings.
And underneath the war in the air the war of the man in the street went on.
He learned to exist with very little food.
He forgot what it meant to have a night's sleep.
Spending most of his time underground, in the damp, dark and cold.
Good-evening folks."
-"You're in early tonight."
Well, I quite a sight, aren't l??'
I think that will be all right now."
-"Yes, that's grand."
How are we going to get you up there??'
-"Get the young man to lift you up."
Brady!"
-"Hello."
Come give this young lady a lift up."
-"Right you are."
The air-raid wardens stayed at their posts.
Doctors and nurses worked on steadily, as the bombs crashed around them.
Rescue squads labored night and day
Hey Warden, I found one."
Is she dead??'
-"Quite dead."
Firemen said, nuts to the bombs, and battled to put out the fires.
This was life in the blitz.
Against all the rules of Nazi warfare,
Britain was refusing to crumple up.
Across the Channel, the enraged Göring took personal command of the operations.
And on September 15, he sent the Luftwaffe into one of its greatest attacks.
Five hundred German bombers and Messerschmitt fighters, roared over the English coast.
Bomass calling. Planes heard three miles southwest."
Hostile planes approaching from southwest."
The British met the challenge by throwing in everything they had.
An historic 3 dimensional battle took place.
Inside an area 60 miles long, 38 broad and from 5 to 6 miles high.
Two hundred individual dog fights took place within the first 30 minutes of the raid.
Right on our own doorstep. Oh, what is that??'
Centre calling mountain one."
-"Thank you centre, we'll keep an eye on them."
Hostile formation to the south."
Some of the German bombers broke through
London's defenses.
And reached the centre of the city
Doughy?. Where are you??'
Blimey, I thought they'd got you."
-"Who me, nah. I had my fingers crossed."
140 destroyed, 70 probable.
Dear Ministry Communicant,
..the biggest bag yet. One hundred and eightyfive enemy aircraft shot down.
End of message."
Of the 500 German planes that came over that day
..more than 1/3were shot down.
In the 28 days of terror, from September 7th to October 5,
..the Nazis dropped 50 million pounds of bombs on the city.
Killed 7000 helpless civilians,
..and wounded 10,000 more.
Bombs fell on Buckingham Palace.
Westminster Abbey.
The Houses of Parliament.
Fleet Street, the centre of the news.
St. Paul's Cathedral.
Bombs blasting the historic past, out of the lives of Englishmen.
But in these 28 days, the Nazis lost
900 planes and their crews.
The more were sent over, the more were shot down.
The British Spitfire proved to be one of the deadliest weapons ever put into the hands of man.
If this kept up, pretty soon, no more Luftwafe.
The frantic Nazis had to pull a new one.
They did. On October 6, they changed to night attacks.
Maybe that way they could avoid those deadly
Spitfires and Hurricanes.
Maybe that way they could crush the stubborn British spirit.
Never mind control of the air. Never mind Phase one,
Phase two and Phase three.
Never mind control of the air. Never mind Phase one,
Phase two and Phase three.
Now concentrate on bombing the people themselves into submission.
And make them cry for mercy.
Hostile raid sir."
The RAF wasn't much help at night.This was just
German bombs against British guts.
Hello Jerry."
-"They sound happy enough down there tonight."
The great docks of London, were left roaring infernos.
Homes were destroyed by incineration.
Business blocks were a flame.
And still the people of London took it.
Night after night they burrowed underground.
And morning after morning they dug themselves out of the wreckage.
Good-morning."
-"Good-morning."
Would you like to sit down??'
-"Thanks."
Morning ladies. Sleep well??'
-"Fine thanks."
What about the one that came down about 2??'
-"l didn't hear it."
Don't you think you ought to go away from this for a bit??'
Of course not. It will take more than this to get me out of my home."
Now go on, you've got to get to work."
-"Okay."
The Battle of London, was the battle of the people of the century
In spite of bombs, and fire and death,
They got to their desk and workbenches, to spend another 10-12 hours working...
..working...
..working.
The British spirit was stronger than ever.
And the RAF was flying higher than ever
Not only higher, but further
S.I.O.?. Operations for the night."
GP1 562"
EP781 Ten aircraft."
You'll find a decent photograph of the submarine yard there."
There was a very good one taken the other night."
That's it. There's the submarine yards."
All right chaps. This is your target for the night.The submarine and ship-building yards at Bremen."
It's a vitally important target.
And it's got to be hit hard."
In the midst of this life and death struggle,
The British found strength not only to defend but to counter-attack with what...
..Q-bombers they could get together
Hello air-gunner, can you hear me??'
"Coming okay skipper."
Hello operator. Everything okay??'
-"Well it seems to be all here sir."
Stand by, I'm going in on a glide."
Steady!"
I got a bulls eye with the last one."
Here was the RAF giving it back.
Hitler cried: Night gangsters. For this crime
I will exact at thousand fold revenge.
November 14, 1940.
All the available German night-bombers, were put into the air.
A thousand fold revenge was Coventry.
On November 14, a million pounds of bombs were dropped on the city
Coventry was smashed as flat as Warsaw and Rotterdam.
The people of Coventry, dug their loved-ones out of the blasted ruins...
..a them to their last resting place, in a common grave.
Hitler could kill them, but damn if he could lick them.
They went back to their lathes and machines.
For they knew the machine-bench was as deadly a weapon as a rifle.
And in their hearts, was a grim determination, that this enemy must be destroyed.
That the day was coming when they would strike back.
And how they would strike back!
Christmas 1940.
Christmas. Season of Peace on Earth,
Good Will toward men, was the ironed...
..quiet before Hitlers great burst of rage against a people who couldn't be licked.
PLANES!"
He couldn't bomb them into submission, so he would burn them to ashes.
Millions of fire-bombs, rained down on the great city of London.
In a matter of minutes, more than 15 hundred diferent sections of the city burst into roaring flames.
Flames that swiftly merged into the greatest fire in recorded history.
In the midst of all the fire and destruction,
..vital water mains were shattered. Water pressure was almost entirely cut off.
Heroes of the night, were men of the London Fire
Brigade, who stretched temporary hose lines out to the centre ofThames River,
..struggling through mud and slime.
For the Nazis had carefully picked the night on which theThames River
..had one of the lowest ebb tides on record.
And while London burned above them, the people of the city held on.
Chin up and thumbs up.
They knew this was the peoples' war.
And they were the people.
And the people that couldn't be panicked couldn't be beaten.
In the months to come, the British were to suffer many such bombings and burnings.
But a nation that calls on cold courage, when hot courage runs thin,
..may die, but it can't be defeated.
The Battle of Britain was won, but not by Hitler.
Hitler had lost the battle. He had lost
2375 German planes and their crews.
For the first time, it was the Germans who ate the bitter dirt of defeat.
Gone was the legend of their invincibility
For a solid year, the Nazis struck Britain with all their might.
They leveled thousands upon thousands of homes.
And damaged millions of others.They killed more than 40thousand men, women and children.
And seriously wounded 50thousand more.
But not one single Nazi soldier, set foot on British soil.
But Hitler couldn't stop. In our next film, we will show how he had to turn to the east again.
Why did the Nazis lose the Battle of Britain?.
First, because a regimented people, met an equally determined free people.
And the free people made them quit cold.
We've been bombed, dive-bombed, high-level bombed,
..machine gunned, been through two invasion scares...
..and the last lot we had, we had the house down about our ears."
But we're still sticking it and we're going to stick it."
Second, because this was a new kind of war.
And the RAF were the men who could fight it.
These are the men who belonged to what
Hitler called,
..those weak, soft democracies.
The British did more than save their country
..they won for the world a year of precious time.
It was not only for the people of Britain, but for the people of the world that Winston Churchill spoke, when he said: "Never in the field of human conflict, was so much owed by so many."
Victory of the democracies can only be complete with the utter defeat of the war machines...
..of Germany and Japan.
C.G. Marshall Chief of Staff
WHY WE FIGHT
A series of seven information films
DIVIDE AND CONQUER
SPECIAL SERVICE DIVISION INFORMATION FILM
Produced by the War Department Special Service
Division Army Service Forces
With cooperation of:
THE SIGNAL CORPS
This film will deal with the period when the Nazi blitzkrieg reached its highest point...
...and Nazi treachery reached its lowest point.
As you have seen on September 1st, 1939, the German armies blitzed into Poland.
The Nazi bid to smash the world into slavery was on.
The Nazi bid to smash the world into slavery was on.
On September 3rd, the British and
French declared war on Germany.
By September 27th, the Germans had wiped out
Poland and met the oncoming Russian Army.
Determined to avoid at two-front war, Germany halted her drive to the east and turned...
...west to first crush Britain and France.
Six years of hard-training and actual battle experience in Spain and Poland,
...had made the German army look invincible.
But what about the British and French?
First, let's take up the British.
They started from scratch but both at home and abroad, an army was growing.
For not only had Britain declared war Canada...
Australia...
New Zealand...
South Africa...
...the whole British commonwealth of nations was also determined on victory over...
.. Hitlerism and all it stands for
And Britain had one weapon that was ready
The Royal Navy.
Shortly after war was declared, it swept German shipping from the high seas.
And units of the British fleet were deployed at Suez,
Malta, Gibraltar, in the Channel and in the North Sea,
...blockading Germany.
World conquest was impossible, without running smack up against the rock Britain.
How to strike at that little island?
That was the question.
Between Britain and Germany, stood not only France,
...but the little countries of Luxembourg, Belgium,
Holland,
...Denmark, Norway and Sweden.
The people of these small neutral countries were peaceful,
...hardworking, and free.
They knew they were in the middle and feared violation of their neutrality.
Hitler knew this.
He also knew that if they united with the allies,
...they would form a solid democratic wall against Nazi aggression.
And their conquest would be far more difficult.
So before striking with his armies, he used another weapon.
The propaganda brirage, to confuse, to make them lose faith,
...to divide and conquer.
To lull the fears of the little neutrals, propaganda minister Goebbels told them:
...Germany didn't want a war at all.
It was Britain and France that caused all the trouble.
Then it was Hitler's turn.
In a speech on October 6, 1939,
...he made even more kinds of specific promises.
To the Danes he said: "We have concluded a non-aggression pact with Denmark."
To the Norwegians he said: "Germany never had any conflict with the northern states and has none today'
To the Dutch he said: "The new Reich is endeavored to continue the traditional friendship with Holland."
And to the Belgium's he announced: "The Reich has put forth no claim which might in anyway be
And to the Belgium's he announced: "The Reich has put forth no claim which might in anyway be be regarded as a threat to Belgium.
And while Hitler was making these promises, his Generals were cold-bloodily...
...picking out the first victim, Norway.
And why did they pick Norway?
Its many steeping lets or fjords would make excellent u-boat bases,
...from which raiders could prey on British supply lines.
Also it would give the Nazis vital air bases.
This is Scapa Flow the British Naval Base.
And this the blockade fleet. At this time, the German base bombers couldn't reach them.
Possession of bases on Norway's western shore would bring these vital British defenses...
...under easy bomber attack.
But he couldn't take Norway without also taking tiny Denmark.
The spring board for his attack.
So at dawn on April 9th, 1940,
The German army rolled across the neutral borders of little Denmark...
...and in a matter of hours, it occupied the entire country.
By nightfall, Denmark is erased as a nation.
And the Danes go into slavery.
Although only 6 months before
Hitler had announced:
We have concluded a non-aggression pact with Denmark."
The Danes will not forget.
Meanwhile in Norway, peaceful-looking German merchant ships like these...
...had sneaked inside Norway's neutral waterway.
And tied up at all principal ports.
That is, they looked like merchant ships.
But if the Norwegians had x-ray eyes, this is what they would have seen...
...the Trojan horse of ancient Greece, brought up-to- date with new and deadlier weapons.
At the precise moment the Nazis overran Denmark,
...these quiet looking ships sprang to life.
At the same time Nazi warships, discovered along the entire coastline,
...started steaming up the Norwegian fjords.
Ships, transports, tanks, men, planes,
...all flung themselves simultaneously upon a defenseless country.
Airborne infantry seized every strategic Norwegian airport.
The whole job was made easier by treacherous fifth columnists.
Lead by Major Quisling, who seized power and issued orders to suppress resistance.
Nazi warships steamed passed silent guns that could have blasted them out of the water.
This was one of the most amazing acts of treachery they have ever known.
It brought Major Qusling international fame.
Making his very name synonymous with the word traitor.
By the afternoon of April 9th, the Germans were in complete control of all 7 ports...
...where they had landed in the morning.
For the first time in more than 200 years, the people of Norway saw an invading army
...parading through their city
Many of these Nazi soldiers, strutting as conquerors in 1940...
...had last seen Norway some 20 years earlier.
When as refugee German children, they had been raised and cared for by kind Norwegians.
Now these same Germans were back,
...to repay that kindness with terror and destruction.
Once they had occupied the capital, the Nazis quickly fanned out in all directions.
The loyal Norwegian troops stopped one
German column between Hamar and Elverum.
So the Germans brought up their bombers.
The Norwegians were forced to flee to the north, under constant and unopposed air attack.
It was here that Captain Robert Lozey, and American military attaché was killed.
The first American soldier to lose his life in this war.
Meanwhile, the Nazis had spread out all over the country.
Small patrols occupied all strategic villages.
Parachute troops landed high in the mountains.
Unopposed bombing raids sent defenseless civilians fleeing in stark terror.
They hadn't wanted war. They had done everything to avoid it.
Hoping they could escape the Nazi scourge, they had compromised.
And tragically failed to unite with the other democracies.
And now they faced the scourge defenseless and alone.
But before the allies could come to their aid, the
Germans were in control of all main ports.
Regardless of this, British, French and Polish contingents plunged in...
...and made several landings along the Norwegian coast.
They landed forces north and south of Trondheim and attempted a circling movement on the city.
They landed forces north and south of Trondheim and attempted a circling movement on the city.
Under constant and heavy and almost unopposed air attack.
While the scene of action was out of range of British fighter planes,
...so they brought up aircraft carriers.
But these are at a disadvantage when opposed by land based planes.
The allies therefore, were badly battered from the air.
Suffering heavy loses, they with drew from the hopeless situation.
Further to the north at Narvik, they met with better success,
.. inflicting heavy naval loses on the Nazis.
Incidentally, they also took their first prisoners of the present war.
Again, the Nazis overwhelming air superiority proved a deciding factor.
And the allies were forced to withdraw under terrific air bombardment.
Loyal Norwegians were left with their Quislings.
Their ruins, their dead. Even though
6 months before Hitler had said:
Germany never had any conflict with the Northern
States, and has none today."
The Norwegians will not forget.
And Hitler, Hitler had another victory.
He high jacked two more countries.
The world wondered...
...and sometimes marveled at this man's efficiency.
Gangster Dillinger was efficient too.
Railway Station Massacre!
When a man or a nation throws away all regard for the laws of God and man, he is bound at first to be more efficient than his victims.
Society had a police force to deal with gangster Dillinger,
...but it had no police force to deal with gangster Hitler. so he clubbed Norway into submission and got what he wanted. Bases for use against Britain.
Now he had the northern claw of an enormous pincer movement.
The drive through France would give him the southern claw.
Blockade by u-boats, coupled with mass bombing attacks,
...would weaken the British for final invasion.
Then with Britain gone, Germany could reach out in all directions for world conquest.
His next move must obviously be through
France, to get his southern claw...
...through France.
How as she is to face the onslaught?
These scenes are ancient history.
They occurred in 1914.
The German armies without warning has smashed across neutral Belgium.
Invaded France, reached the river
Marne only a few miles from Paris.
Out of the French capital, poured the French reserves.
Riding out to battle the enemy in any vehicle that could move.
The famous taxi cab army. Note well it was riding out to battle.
In the centre of the French line, stood the Ninth French Army.
Commanded then, by a comparatively unknown General.
On September 5, 1914he is reputed to have said:
My right has driven in, my centre has given away the situation is excellent, I attack!"
He did attack. The German onslaught was checked and Paris was saved.
That comparatively unknown General, later became
Commander in Chief, of all the allied...
...armies, and presided at the signing of the Armistice with the defeated Germans on...
...November 11, 1918.
To this General the French people erected a monument.
To Marshall Ferdinand Foch.
Whose motto was:
ATTACK! Always ATTACK!
Still later, the war-weary French people erected another monument,
This one to a Minister of War.
André Maginot.
Between the idea symbolized by these two statues,
...may lie the military story of the fall of a great nation.
In Foch's time, the proud spirit of France demanded nothing less than victory
And placed its faith in the attack.
In Maginot time, the spirit no longer proud,
...asked only to avoid defeat and placed its faith in concrete.
So the French built the mighty chain of fortresses called the Maginot Line.
These tremendous Bach tons were built deep into the French land.
They were connected by underground passages and railways.
Guarding France's eastern borders, facing Germany.
And when France was finally forced to declare war against the rising Nazi menace,
...the French troops, instead of attacking, were marched into their modern caves...
...to wait for the Nazi blitz to smash itself against the Maginot line.
And their Generals, headed by
Maréchal Pétain, proudly announced,
...whoever makes the first move in this war will be hurt.
But Hitler didn't go near the Maginot line. That was
France's strong point.
Instead he attacked the weak point.
Hitler knew that the French tried to avoid war, instead of preparing for it.
That knowledge was one of his greatest weapons.
He knew they had planes, but he knew they were antiquated.
He knew they had tanks, but he knew they were few in number and lightly armored.
But most of all, he knew France had become a cynical and disillusioned Nation.
What made this change in the French spirit?
In the first place between 1914and 1918 the French suffered more than 6 million casualties.
In the heroic defense of their land, against the German invasion.
The flower of an entire generation was lost. With its stimulus of new blood, new determination, new ideals.
Secondly the failure of the League of Nations to which the French had pinned their hopes...
...of peace, the corruption of many in high places,
...the greed of special interests, all had combined to shake the faith of...
...the French people in their democratic ideals.
And when a people loses its faith in its own ideals,
...it is right for the insidious words of the devil.
France still looked like an imposing castle, but Hitler's political termintes had so gnawed away the binding of national unity
...that the castle was ready to crumble.
SABOTAGE!!!
FIFTH COLUMN!
STRIKES!
RIOTS!
During those months of military inactivity, that we call the phoney war,
...a ceaseless barrage of German propaganda crossed the still waters of the Rhine, to affect the soldiers in the Maginot Line.
Why do you fight? asked the banners.
Poems and friendly notes were sent over by balloons.
French tunes were played by German bands.
And German hooey was broadcast in French.
The British will fight to the last drop of French blood.
You have been deceived. This is an imperialistic war for Britain.
We Germans want nothing of France.
What is happening to your wives back home, soldiers?
The British are stationed in your villages.
Yes, France was ready to be plucked.
The whole force of the Nazi might, was turned toward the west.
How would they strike this time?
Through Lorraine as in 1870?
Through the low countries as in 1914?
What was the 1940 model conquest?
The French considered the Maginot Line utterly impregnable.
And therefore believed the Germans would try a swing through the low countries, as in 1914.
But even after Hitler's rape of Scandinavia,
Holland and Belgium, hoping against hope, still clung to their neutrality.
So the French massed 78 divisions along here, the border of Belgium.
Seventeen were in the Maginot Line.
Ten divisions were here, in case Mussolini got bold.
Three and a half as a safeguard against Spain.
The British had 10 divisions here.
The allied strategy in the event of an attack against the Low Countries, was to swing their armies like a gate, into Belgium.
The hinge being the north end of the Maginot Line.
This all important hinge was protected by the forest of the Ardennes.
A hilly and thickly wooded area, honey combed with streams, its roads narrow trails, its bridges too weak for military vehicles.
The French strategists estimated that the forest of the
Ardennes impassable for forces.
As you will see, this was one of the most costly estimates in military history.
That was the situation on May 9, 1940.
The hour of trial had come.
The people of the democracies prayed for strength, to meet the hurricane of terror.
While across the Rhine...
...the delirious madness possessed the German nation.
Their tag had come.
Without even bothering to declare war, the German armies launched a coordinated attack.
Across the neutral borders of
Luxemburg, Belgium and Holland.
From the Maginot Line to the north of the sea.
The action along the entire front was simultaneous.
So for purposes of clarity, let's take up one country at a time.
First, let's see what happened in Holland.
The Nazi ground forces smashed through the improvised and hastily erected border defenses.
But the main attack was to come from the air far behind the defense lines.
Over 10,000 troops were landed in this manner.
Before the stunned citizens of Rotterdam even knew they were at war.
These troops aided by well-trained
Fifth Columnists,
...quickly captured the airport in the out-lying section of the city
Meantime, Nazi armored columns were racing across the country.
Their progress speeded by other Fifth Columnists, who prevented the destruction...
...of vital dykes and bridges.
These forces effected a meeting with the parachuters who landed in Rotterdam.
The Dutch were doomed to defeat.
On the fourth day of the invasion, the
Nazis gave the Dutch General an ultimatum.
On the fourth day of the invasion, the
Nazis gave the Dutch General an ultimatum.
All Dutch resistance must cease, or
Rotterdam will be bombed flat.
The Dutch General had little choice.
To save the lives of innocent civilians, he accepted the German terms.
But after the unconditional surrender the Nazis bombed the city anyway.
Flights of unopposed German bombers flew low over the centre of Rotterdam.
And methodically bombed it into a heap of rubble.
One of the most ruthless exhibitions of savagery the world has ever seen.
Over 30,000 men, women and children, were killed in the space of 90 minutes.
Though only 6 months before, Hitler had said:
The new Reich has endeavored to continue the traditional friendship with Holland."
The Dutch will not forget.
Meantime in Belgium, the whole force of Nazi Blitzkrieg had stormed across...
...its neutral borders.
The main German attack was directed at the Albert Canal, Meuse River line.
The anchor of which, was Fort Eban Emael. A modern and seemingly impregnable fortress.
The Germans had secretly built a replica of the mighty fortress in Czechoslovakia.
And rehearsed the attack until they knew every detail of the Fort's construction.
And it's every weakness.
When the real attack came it was fool-proof. Parachute troops,
...dive bombers, flamethrowers, specially trained engineer battalions,
...all working together as a well-trained team.
They knew exactly where to cross the river.
You will notice that this assault engineer knows where to put his high-explosive charge,
.. in order to destroy the blockhouse.
Fort Eban Emael withstood the Nazi attack, exactly two days.
And the German armies rolled on.
Meantime, an hour and a half after the German invasion began,
...allied troops crossed the French and Belgium borders to meet the advancing Germans.
As they raced across Belgium to take up their defense positions,
...they met an obstacle they hadn't counted on.
Refugees.
And there fugue-chocked roads didn't get that way by accident.
The Nazis methodically bombed little towns and villages.
Otherwise devoid of any military value.
Not so much to kill, but to drive the inhabitants out onto the highways.
Then by expert machine-gunning, the Nazis would herd them along in terror-striken flight.
And hopelessly entangled in the advancing allied army.
Refugees used as a weapon of war.
A new low in inhumanity.
No school today, the sign says.
The children are otherwise occupied.
No, no school today.
Although only 6 months before,
Hitler had announced:
The Reich has put forth no claim, which might in any way be regarded as a threat to Belgium."
The Belgium's will not forget.
And what about the allies? They were convinced that the German attack on Belgium and Holland was the main thrust. And according to plan, had swung their armies like a gate into Belgium.
But the attack on Belgium and Holland was only a feint.
The main German attacks to be centered where the allies least expected it.
Through the Ardennes Forest.
For this decisive blow, they had secretly assembled a mighty striking force ever seen.
Including 45,000 armored vehicles.
At the same time the Nazi armies were plunging into
Holland and Belgium,
...this column started to move.
Well-trained engineer battalions went first.
They were opposed by only scattered ally patrols.
They cleared path ways for the tanks to follow.
In three days the German armored forces reached the Meuse River.
Two days faster than the French thought that any troops could get through.
The Germans should have paused here to bring up heavy artillery before attempting the river.
But the Nazis had a new type of artillery
Dive bombers.
They plastered the French positions across the Meuse.
With feverishly haste, the Germans laid a barrage across the river...
...with anything and everything that would shoot.
This tremendous concentration of fire-power, continued all through the night.
By the following day, troops were able to get across the river.
These troops held a bridge entrance till the engineers brought up topping and built bridges.
Then without wasting a moment, across these bridges the main armored forces...
...of the German military machine rolled through the Sedan.
The all-important breakthrough went to a dismayed and flat-footed France.
There went the old ballgame for the allies.
From here on, it was only a matter of how long.
Watch the map as one of our intelligent officers explains the details...
...of the German breakthrough.
Well actually the break was along a wide front extending...
...for 50 miles from Namur in Belgium to Sedan.
...for 50 miles from Namur in Belgium to Sedan.
Further north, the allied armies had swung like a gate into these positions.
The German armies had swept over Holland broken the line for the Albert Canal,
...and for all anyone knew were preparing
...to smash against the allied front with all their power.
The situation, dangerous but obscure on the evening on May 13th.
On the 14th and 15th, it became clear that the German breakthrough south of Namur
...was in the greatest strain.
And that the French 9th army attacked while moving into position had been shattered.
Without doubt, this was the point of mortal danger.
And the French high-command ordered the abandonment of these positions.
Although they had not yet been attacked.
Those positions were abandoned solely because of the situation developing along the Meuse.
In the meantime, the French 7th army had been ordered...
...to make its historic forced march...
...far to the south, into the area threatened by the rapidly advancing German spearheads.
This army was not used to attack the German flank.
But was rather used as a plug to restore the broken front.
Throughout, the allies had not placed their faith in offence, but in defense.
And the defense was doomed to failure.
Because it was confronted by an entirely new technique in warfare.
The plane, tank infantry team in action.
The world was staggered by the speed in which the German armored columns moved.
What was the secret that enabled armies to move so far so rapidly?
The secret lay in the organization of the striking spearhead.
Armored forces came first, closely followed by motorized divisions.
Which peeled off forming solid walls.
And through the corridor, thus formed, raced the supply trucks...
...to feed the ever lengthing column.
It was obvious that if the allied situation was to be restored,
...the German column would have to be cut.
On May 17th, General De Gaulle attacked the German flank,
...and captured a few prisoners.
But his light mechanized forces were like a pin pricking the side of a rhinoceros.
A subsequent attack, met with even less success.
The means for a really successful counter attack against the German corridor,
...simply did not exist.
Where numbers of divisions were required, only handfuls of...
...companies, and battalions were available.
A valiant attempt to cut the German corridor...
...was made by a group of slow-moving
British tanks...
...just south of Area.
But lack of sustained striking power
...doomed this valiant unit to destruction.
On May 21st, the German spear head reached the Channel Port of Abbeville.
Protecting that flank along the seam,
...the Germans fanned out to the north and east.
This was to be the perfect battle of annihilation.
On May 28th, the Belgium army compressed into a small space,
...and weary of battle lay down its arms.
That left the desperate French and British defenders,
...with their backs to the sea at the small channel port of Dunkerque.
One of the greatest disasters in history seemed in the making.
An entire British army faced annihilation.
But out of the fog and mist, came a strange armada.
Of navy craft, fishing boats, pleasure yachts,
...anything that would float.
The sea-going people of Britain had come to rescue their army.
High overhead, British planes brought the Luftwaffe to a standstill.
While below, small suicide units held the Germans back long enough...
...for the miracle of Dunkerque to take place.
21 1,500 British troops plus 112,500
French and Belgium's were rescued.
Over 300,000 battle-tested men grimly determined to go back again with new tools, new weapons, in which to blast the heated
Nazis out of this world.
For free men are like rubber balls, the harder they fall, the higher they bounce.
Leading the British at this time, was a man who had been bouncing all his life. Winston Churchill.
Who had tried for years, to warn the world about Germany.
Meantime, the situation that faced France was as hopeless as a military situation can be.
Two-fifths of the French army was lost.
There were fewer than 50 divisions left to defend the front almost 200 miles long,
.. running from the northern end of the Maginot Line to the sea.
And behind that thin front line, there were no reserves.
The sparing people of Paris sent their children south,
...praying that some miracle would keep them from harm.
The hopeless men of the French army without adequate arms,
...braced themselves for the coming blow
The first blow fell on June 5th.
The French resistance was determined, but by June 8th, the left flank army...
...had been shattered and a general withdraw was ordered with the line of the Seine.
On June 9th, the German's main attack came.
Within two days, the German armored and motorized divisions,
...roared out into the open terrain.
With this breakthrough, the issue of the battle of France was decided.
And from that time on, there was official talk of an Armistice.
Now what about the famous Maginot Line?
Let's go back and take a look.
On June 14th, the Germans launched two attacks against the Maginot Line.
In both cases penetration was effective.
But we must remember that this was against fortifications,
...defended by men, devoid of hope.
In the meantime, Mussolini now thinking it's safe,
...sent his division racing across the border.
The hand that held the dagger
...has struck it into the back of its neighbor.
Organized resistance in France was no longer possible.
The Government faced two alternatives,
...retire to North Africa and carry on from there or,
...give up the struggle.
France's leaders were old and tired.
And the oldest and most tired was Maréchal Pétain.
Egged on by men like Lavalle, who saw in a German victory the chance for personal power,
...on June 16th, Pétain asked for an Armistice.
The news is carried to Hitler, who received this word of a great nation's fall,
...in a characteristic manner.
Also characteristic were his terms for the Armistice.
It must be signed in the coach where Maréchal Foch met the defeat of Germans in the last war
The French delegation arrived.
To pay the final price of French disunity and the treachery of some of its leaders.
The final price. A price for centuries to come, the
French will not forget.
More than three-fifths of their country was to be blacked out by a military occupation.
The remainder was to be controlled by a
French government acceptable to Hitler.
A tax of 400,000,000 Francs a day, was to be imposed on the French people.
Nearly 2 million French prisoners of war, were to be taken into Germany.
And kept there as hostages, to work as slaves or,
...rot of hunger, or tuberculosis or other diseases in concentration camps.
Men deliberately and permanently separated from their families,
...in order to decrease the French birth rate.
And thus eliminate France as a world power in future generations.
French civilians, men, women and children, must slave on farm or in factory for the Nazi master race, or starve.
There will be a class of subject alien races: we need not hesitate to call them slaves." Hitler
French children were to grow up on such inadequate food,
...that many would reach the age of 12 before they grew new teeth.
And for any attempts to protest against these restrictions,
...thousands of innocent French civilians would be executed.
This was the price the French were to pay, as they signed the Armistice.
And the Master of the master race must go to Paris.
To tour the streets of what once was the City of Lights.
You notice no cheering crowds hereto welcome in the new order.
When the people of Paris come to the streets again,
.. it is to hear the voice of dictators, telling them what they must do.
How they must live.
What they must say.
What they must think.
Telling them how to be slaves.
Gone is the Republic of France.
Gone is free speech and reprehensible government.
Gone is liberty.
Fraternity.
With their ears they listen, but their minds and their hearts, are down...
...on the Mediterranean where the battle collared regiments are being taken to Africa.
Out of the Nazi grasp.
The people weep as their glory departs.
For they don't as yet know that France has hope, a rallying point.
Charles De Gaulle, a soldier in the great tradition of
Foch,
...is not surrendering.
He will continue to fight. Gathering around him loyal Frenchmen...
...from all over the world to become the free French army.
The Fighting French!
Yes, the people weep as they watch their colors go,
...not knowing that two years later, those same flags...
...would again be unfuled in North Africa.
Along side the Stars and Stripes, along side the Union Jack.
Once more their leaders united in the common cause with the leaders of their allies.
Once more the red, white and blue of France was raised on high.
For out of the ashes of defeat and humiliation of
France,
...her soul has been born again.
Victory of the democracies can only be complete with the utter defeat of the...
...war machines of German and Japan.
-G. C. Marshall
The civilized Jews we know in Germany... give us but an incomplete picture... of their true racial character.
The film shows actual shots of the Polish ghettos.
It shows the Jews as they really look... before concealing themselves... behind the mask of civilized
Europeans.
The campaign in Poland gave us the opportunity to really get to know the Jewish people.
Nearly four million Jews live here in Poland. but they won't be found among the rural population.
Nor have they suffered from the chaos of war, as has the native Pole.
They sat it out indifferently in the gloomy streets of the Polish ghetto.
Yet within an hour after the German occupation they were back in business.
We Germans had a look at the Polish ghetto 25 years ago.
This time our eyes are sharpened by our experience in the last few decades.
Unlike in 1914, we no longer see just the most grostesque... and comoical of these qusetionable ghetto figures.
This time we recognize that there's a plague here: a plague that threatens the health of the Aryan people.
Richard Wagner once said
"the jew is the demon behind the corruption of mankind". and there pictures prove it.
Jewish home like reveals remarkable lack of creative ability to civilize.
In plain language, Jewish dwellings are filthy and neglected.
These Jews are't at all poor.
After decades of business, they've hoarded enough... to acquire decent, comfortable homes.
But they live for generations in the same dirty and bug-ridden dwellings.
Untroubled by their surroundings, they go right on with their prayers.
The bobbing motion is part of the ritual for reading Jewish scriptures.
The main part of Jewish so-called community life takes place in the street.
Seldom are Jews found going useful work.
And when they are, as here, it often isn't voluntary.
The German military government is making them clear away rubble.
It appears that they're not used to working, abd don't like it either.
This isn't helplessness that's to be pitied.
These Jews don't want to work, but barterl Here, they're in their element.
It's not true that Jews are forced into trade because other professions are clised to them.
On the contrary, they welcome trade eagerly. because it suits their character and natural inclination.
One might want to regard these haggling children as a sign of great proverty.
But watch them awhile, and it becomes clear... that they're proud to act as their grownups do.
These young people don't have the idealism that ours do.
With them, the egoism of the individucal is not in the service of higher common goals.
Instead, Jewish morality, in crass contradiction of the Aryan concept of ethics, proclaims the unrestrained egoism of every Jew to be divine law.
His religion males cheating and usury a duty.
In the fifth book of Moses, for example, it is stated... that a non-Jew thou may loan to upon usury but not thy brother, that the Lord may bless thee in all thy dealings.
For the Jews, then, doing business is something holy.
This is totally incomprehensible to non-Jews.
Aryan man attaches a sense of worth to every activity.
He wants to creat something worthwhile: food or clothing, houses or machines, works of art or anything else of value to everyone.
He's ruled by the feeling of being responsible for his achievements.
For the Jews there's but one thing of value: money.
How he gets it makes no dofference.
The first trade goods are generally worthless trash of all sorts.
That's how the little
Jews start out.
Soon they've reached the point where they can sell from a tray, and before long they've assembled a complete line of goods.
Not long after, they own a regulat stand.
The most ambitious soon own a small shop, and then a bigger shop.
The most cunning that is, the most inscrupulous... eventually have warehouses and banks, and move into the most splendid mansions in the cities, provided that they don't get in each others' way, as in the narrow ghettos of the East.
That's why they try to escape to rich lands with rich people.
They need other people, because they need the wares with which to do business.
What creative Aryan people find of value has been reduced by the Jew to mere merchandise.
He buys and sells, but produces nothing.
The production he leaves to the workers and farmers of the host nation.
The Jews are people without farmers or workers: a race of parasites.
Wherever the body of a nation shows a wound, they anchor themselves and feed on the decaying organism.
They make business out of the sickness of the nations, and therefore endeavor to deepen and prolong all conditions of sickness.
That's how it is in Poland, and was in Germany.
The Jews have been this way throughout their entire history.
Their faces bear the age-old features of the perpetual sponger: the eternal Jew, who in the course of time and worldwide wanderings has always been the same.
There's no difference between these Jews in Poland and those in Palestine, thought the two are geographically separated.
Palestine is the spiritual center of international Jewry, though the Jews are numerically insignificant there.
Here at the Wailing Wall, they gather and mourn the fall of Jerusalem.
Theit homelessness, though, is a matter of choice, and in keeping with their entire history.
Four thousand years ago, their Hebrew ancestors were already wandering.
Out of the Land of Two Rivers, they wandered along the sea to Egypt, wher they ran a lucrative grain business for a while.
When the country farmers and other Wgyptians... rose aganist the foreign usurers and speculators, they wandered once more, and plundered their way to the promised land.
They settled there, mercilessly looting culturally-superior rightful inhabitants.
Here in the course of centuries, from the Oriental,
Far Eastern racial mixture... with Negroid admixture, the ultimate mongrelized
Jews developed.
Foreign from us Europeans, born of totally-different racial elements, they differ from us in body and above all n soul.
We probably would never have been bothered by them had they stayed in their Oriental home.
But the cosmopolitan empire of
Alexander the Great, reaching from the Near East across half the Mediterranean, and especially the boundless world empire of the Romans, brought about the evolution of the trade and migratory traits of the Jews, who soon spread across the open Mediterranean area.
While some of them settled in the large urban traffic... and the trade centers of the Mediterranean, others wandered relentlessly on across Spain, France, Southern
Germany, and England.
Everywher they made themselves unwelcome.
In Spain and France the people rose openly aganist them in the
13th and 14th Centuries, and they wandered on, mainly to Germany.
From there they followed the path of the Aryan culture... creative Germans colonizing the East... till they finally found a gigantic new untapped reservoir... in the Polish and Russian sections of Eastern Europe.
The 19th Century, with its muddled ideas about human equality and freedom, gave the Jews a great lift.
From eastern Europe they spread across the entire continent... during the 19th and 20th Centuries, and then across the world.
Parallel to these Jewish wanderings throughout the world is the migration of... a similarly restless animal: the rat.
Rats have been parasites on mankind from the very beginning.
Their home is Asia, from shich they migrated in gigantic hordes... over Russia and the Balkans into Europe.
By the middle of the 18th Century, they'd already spread over all of Europe.
Toward the end of the 19th Centiry, with growing shipping traffic, they took possession of America as well, and eventually Africa and the Far East.
Wherever rats turn up, they carry destruction to the land... by destroying mankind's goods and nourishment and spreading diseases and plagues... such as cholera, dysentery, leprosy, and typhoid fever.
They are cunning. cowardly, and cruel, and usually appear in massive hordes.
They represent the elements of sneakiness and subterranean destruction among animals, just as the Jews do among mankind.
The parasite nation of Judah is responsible for a large part of international crime.
In 1932 the Jews, who made up only 1% of the world's population, accounted for 34% of the world's dope peddlers, 47% of robberies,
47% of crooked games of chance,
82% of international crime organizations, and 98% of dealers in prostitution.
The most-common experssions in the jargon of international gangsters and criminals... tem from Hebrew and Yidddish words.
These physiognmies immediately refute the liberal theories... abut the equality of all who bear a human countenance.
The Jews alter their outward appearnce... when they leave their Polis haunts for the rich world.
Theit hair, beard, skull cap, and caftan make the Eastern Jew recognizable to everyone.
Should he remove them, only sharp-eyed people can spot his racia origins.
An essential trait of the Jew is that he always tries... to hide his origin when among non-Jews.
A bunch of Polish Jews still wearing caftans... and now in Western
European clothes, prepare to infiltrate
Western civilization.
Of course these ghetto Jews don't yet move too well in their clean European clothes.
Somewhat more adept are the Jews of Berlin.
Their fathers and grandfathers lived in the ghetto, but that is not outwardly noticeable.
Here, in the second and third generation, the assimilation has reached its zenith.
Outwardly, they try to act just like the host people.
People without good instincrs let themselves be deceived by this mimicry, and consider Jews the same as they are.
Therein lies the enormos danger:
These assimilated Jews remain forever foreign bodies... in the organisms of their host people, regardless of appearances.
Even aristprats with pld Jewidh names, who've intermarried with the Aryan nobility for generations, and are part of European "high society", remain foreign bodies.
Here we show a scene from a film about the Rothschild family.
It was made by American Jews, obviously as a tribute to one of the greatest names in Jewish history.
They honor their hero in a typically Jewish manner, delighting in the way old Meier Amschel
Rothschild cheats his host state... by feigning proverty to avoid paying taxes.
Transfer of money by check is not a Jewish invention, nor was it cultivated by Jews for the good of mankind.
It served them as a means of obtaining... international influence over their host people.
So Nathan goes to London and becomes an Englishman.
Jacob goes to Paris and becomes a Frenchman.
Salamon goes to Vienna and becomes an Austrian.
Carl goes to Naples and becomes an Italian.
Amschel stays in Frankfurt and remains a German.
But of course they all remain Jews.
Therefore, when during the French Revolution...
Jews became rightful citizens of their respective host nations, they each belonged to two nations at the same time.
It's not for nothing that they have blood relations at all
Wuropean courts, and are therefore intimately acquainted with what goes on at these courts... and in the countries they preside over... in this century of ibdustry and progress.
Jewish business blooms as never before.
The House of Rothschild is just one example of the use of this tactic by the Jews... to spread their net of financial influence over the working man.
The House of Warburg follows the same tactic, as do other Jewish banking families.
By the beginning of the 20th Century, the Jews are sitting... at all junctions of the world's money market.
They are an international power.
Though they make up only 1% of the population of the Earth, their capital enables them to... terrorize world exchanges, world opinion, and world politics.
New York is today's chief center of Jewish power.
The New York stock exchange, financial center of the world, is ruled by such...
Jewish banking houses as Kuhn, Loeb,
Warburg, Hanauer, Wertheim, Levisohn,
Seligmann, Guggenheim, Wolf,
Schiff, Strauss, Stern, and so forth.
These Jewish kings of finance love to play out their power behind the scenes... and stay out of the limelight.
Outwardly, they fit right in with their hosts.
They look almost like genuine Americans.
Bernard Baruch, Jewish financial advisor and friend of the American President, in the guise of a smart citizen of the US.
Otto Kahn, Jewish banker of Wall Street, enjoying his role as Anglo-Saxon lord.
Jewish banker Felix Warburg.
Jewish banker Mortimer Schiff.
Jewish lawyer and Geramn-hater
Samuel Untermeier.
Professor Felix Frankfurter, Jewish legal advisor to the American President.
Herbert Lehman, Jewish governor of the state of New York.
Laguardia, half-Jewish mayor of New York City.
Henry Morgenthau, Jewish Secretary of the Treasury of the Us.
The Jew Leon Blum, former prime minister of France, who knows how to act just like a genuine Frenchman.
Millions of French workers once greeted him as their party leader.
The Jew Hore Belisha, former minister of war for England.
English soldiers salute their commander!
But the Jew is still a rootless parasite, even when in power, for his power doesn't come from his own strenghth.
It lasts only as long as his misled hosts... are willing to carry him on their backs.
Remember those tragic days when Germany lay helpless:
The Jews saw their chance;
Just like loyal citizens they stepped forward, as though deeply concerned about the fate of the German people.
They rushed to the so-called national ssembly in Weimar, where Germany's future was to be decided.
The jewish representative Landsberg, on his left, Schneidemann.
The Jewish Hirsch, prime minister of Prussia.
The Jew Theodore Wolf, editor of a Berlin daily.
The Jew Georg Bernhard head of the Ullstein publishing house.
The Jew Hugo Preuss, creator of the German constitution.
The Jew Walter Rathenau, foreign minister of Germany.
The Jew Hilferding,
German finance minister.
The Jew Bernhard Isidor Weiss, assisant police chief in Berlin.
Meanwhile other Jews represented the radical line aganist law and order.
In the guise of selfless humanitarians,
They promised the masses castles in the sky, inciting them against civic order.
Unrestrained personal freedom and self indulgence for the individual.
Rejection of all ideals and higher values.
Submission the basest life of material pleasures.
Criticism of all that is sacred.
Revolt against everything.
Incitement of the young to class warfare and terrorism.
It's no accident that this doctrine of destruction of nations... sprang from the Jewish mind: of Karl Marx, son of Margoehei, a rabbi and lawyer in Trier.
The founder and organizer of the
German Social Democratic Party... was the Jew Ferdinand LaSalle-Wolfson.
The Jewess Rosa Luxenburg real name Emma Goldman... was a notorious communist agitator.
The Jew Nisson was responsible for the murder of hostages in Munich.
The Jew Frankfurter was the murderer of...
National Socialist activist
Willeim Gustloff.
The Polish Jew Grynspan murdered the German diplomat von Rath in Paris.
Although they were a small minority, they knew how to terrorize a great tolerant nation.
For every thousand Germans, there were 10 Jews.
Or better said, for every thousand disunified Germans who fought among themselves, there were 10 Jews who despite business competition, all had a common goal: exploiting the Germans.
The Kewish merchants crowded into the cities.
Three-fourth of all Jews lived in the big cities, but not to work in the factories;
They left that to the Germans.
For every thousand workers in Berlin, there were two Jews.
At the beginning of 1933, of 100 state prosecutors in Berlin, 15 were Jews.
Of 100 judges
23 were Jews.
Of every 100 lawyers,
49 were Jews.
Of every 100 doctors,
52 were Jews.
Of every 100 merchants,
60 were Jews.
The average income for a German was 810 marks.
The average income for a Jew was 10,000 marks.
While millions of Germans fell into unemploymet and proverty, immigrant Jews acquired fantastic riches in a few years.
Not through honest work, but through usury, swindling, and fraud.
The Sklareks lightened the Berlin treasury by 12,5 million marks.
The Jew Kutisker defrauded
Prussia of 14 million.
The Jew Barmat cheated the same state out of 35 million.
Not to mention the inflation profiteer Mendelsohn, the Jew recketeer Katsenelenbogen, and all the rest of them.
Jews are most dangerous when permitted to meddle in a people's culture, religion, and art, and pronounce their insolent judgement on them.
The concept of beauty of Nordic man is incomprehensible to the Jew by nature. and will always reamin so.
For the purity and neatness of the German concept of art, the Jew, without rools of his own. has no feeling.
What he calls art must gratify his deteriorating nerves.
The strench of disease must pervade it.
It must be unnatural grotesque, perverse, or pathological.
These feverish fantasies of hopelessly sick minds wereonce extolled by...
Jewish art critics of German public life as high artistic expressions.
Today it seems incredible that such pictures were once bought by nearly all our galleries, but Jewish art dealers and critics praised them as the only real modern art.
German cultural life was niggerized and bastardized.
Painting, architecture, literature, and music suffered as well.
For more than a decade,
Jews wielded their profane power.
As art dealers, music publishers, editors, and critics, they decided what would be called art and culture in Germany.
The Jew Kerr, art czar in the Weimar Republic.
The Jew Tucholsky, a wicked pronographer... who said that treason is honorable... and the heroic ideal is the stupidest idea.
The Jew Hirschfeld, who promoted homosexuality and perversion.
In the guise of scientific discussions, they tried to direct mankind's healthy urges down degenerate paths.
The "relativity" Jew
Albert Einsrein, who masked... his hatred of Germans behind his obscure pseudo sciences.
The Jew Kestenberg, conntroller of German music in the Prussian Ministry of Culture.
The Jew's El Dorado was the German stage.
Here they ruled unchecked, degrading the classical tradition by appealing to rhe basest instincts. the Jew Haller and his revue.
The Jew Rotter, who had a monopoly with seven theaters in Berlin, finally skipping out while millions in debt.
The Jewish revue director
Robert Klein.
The Jewish stage dictator
Max Reinhardt.
Most stages were directed by Jews.
The Jewish comedians
Ehrich and Morgan.
It was no different in the movies.
The Jewish film director
Richard Oswald.
The comedian Gerron.
Jews consider portrayal of the disreputable and repellent... particularly fertile ground for comic effect.
The Jewess Rosa Valetti.
The Jew kurt Boar enjoys a particularly perverted role.
The Jew Kurt Nakuhn extols the "virtues" of a depraved officer... who dosen't even shrink from committing a murder.
The Jew is instinctively interested in everything abnormal and depraved.
He seeks possibilities of disrupting a people's heallty judgement.
The Jew Peter Lorre in the role of a child murderer.
With the notion that not the murderer, but his victim, is guilty, normal judgement is twisted by a sympathetic portrayal of the criminal, to gloss over and excuse the crime.
I can feel it, burning within me.
I must go the way that I'm driven.
And run, run... endless streets.
I want to get away... get away!
And with me run their ghosts; they won't leave me alone.
I have to do it... I must.
A disproportionately great number of Jews arrained prominence in Germany.
In newspapers and newsreels, their Jewish cronies... presented them to the public as German artists.
The Jew Richard Tauber left for New York, and was miurned as an alleged loss for German art.
The Jew Ernst Lubitsch was hailed as a German film producter.
"I'm very glad to be back in Germany, and especially my home town, Berlin".
The Jew Emil Ludwig Cohn was honored as a German writer.
"An author can do nothing better today... than carry the German name aborad with honor".
The Jew Charlie Chaplin was welcomed by an enraptured crowd when he visited Berlin.
Then of the German public acclaimed the newcomer Jew.
A deadly enemy.
How could this happen?
The phony dogma of human equality... had tricked the healthy instinct of the nation.
Centuries of religious upbringing had taught European Christians... to regard Jews as fellow founders of the Christian religion.
Benevolent German painters and poets... idenalized the Biblical figures of Hebrew tribal history.
Abraham, Isaac, and Jacob were considered pillars... of the highest moraliry and human nobility.
But we know now that the Hebrews of the Bible couldn't have looked like this.
We must correct our historical view.
Here's what real
Hebrews look like.
The following is a
Jewish Purim festival, filmed by Warsaw Jews for their own use as a culture film.
This harmless-looking family celebration... commemorates the slaughter of
75,000 anti- Semitic Persians... by Biblical ancestors of our Jews of today.
The Bible reports that
"The next day the Jews rested, and made the day one of feasting, joy, and gift giving.
They decided that these two days, Purim. should be thereafter remembered by their children's children, firever".
Educated Germans, objective and tolerant, regard such tales as just folklore and strande customs.
But that's the race of Israel, still rubbing its hands over its feast of revenge. even when dressed in the Western European clothes... in which today's Israelites hide their murderous nature.
To understand the serious danger behind all this, it's necessary to look at the moral teachings of the Jewish race.
From boyhood, the Jew learns his ancient laws in the Talmud schools.
As grows older, he learns more from the books of Jewish law. but it's not religious instruction.
The rabbis are not peaceful theologicans, but political educadors.
The politics of a parasite race must be carried on in secret.
The individual ghetto Jew dowsn't necessarily have to know all their plans.
It's enough that he's filled with the spirit from youth ones.
What dose the ancient law of the Tamlud teach?
"Always be cunning when afraid; answer softly to clam the anger of the stranger, so that you'll be loved.
Ally yourself with him on whom fate smiles at the moment".
"Five things Canaan taught his sons:
Love one another, love pillage, love excess, hate your masters, and never tell the truth".
Further development of Jewish inner life is carried on in the synagogue.
The Jews count on people not understanding language and ambiguous symbols.
The Black boxes on their heads contain law passages.
Conducting business during the service... is not considered an act of disrespect by Israekites.
The law teaches that "Whosoever honors the Torah will succeed in business".
The Torah scroll, containing the five books of Moses and the law, is taken from the so-called Holy Ark:
On its way to the pulpit,
Jews kiss it to ask forgiveness for their sins.
The Torah scrpll is rolled to the place to be read.
What sort of "truths" dose it teach?
Hora Hajum, Verse 290:
"Praise to the Lord, who has set apart the holy and the common nations,
Israel and the other races.
The Heathens, who do not keep your commandments, you have made enemies to be wiped out.
God's anger is on them and he says, even the best among the heathens will I kill.
There are none good among the people of the world, for they are blasphemers.
But the sons of Israel are all righteous".
Haghida 3, Verse 1:
"And the Lord told the Israelites: you have made me the one God of the the world, and I will make your people the only rulers of the world".
Hora Hajim 126, Verse 1:
"Glort to the Eternal One, who reduces the enemies of your people, humbles them and wipes them out, that the earth may belong to you alone and your people".
This is not a religion!
It's a comspiracy aganist all non-Jews by a sick, deceitful, poisoned race, aganist the Aryan people and their moral laws.
One of the most illuminating... customs of the Jews' so-called religion... is the slaughter of animals.
The following actual scenes... are among the most horrifying ever captured.
We show them despite objections about poor taste.
It's more important... that our people know the truth about Jewry.
Sensitive citizens are advised not to watch.
Supposedly, their religion forbids Jews from eating ordinarily-butchered meat.
So they let the animals bleed to death while conscious.
The Jews deceptively describe the cruel method as the most humane way to slaughter.
European science has long acknowledged... the torturous chartacter of this type of alsughter.
In 1892, the people voted to ban it in Switzerland.
Jewish law has no love and respect for animals in the Germanic sense.
It's even forbidden that the suffering animal be put out of its misery.
The National Socialist movement has opposed this cruel... torture of defenseless animals since its earliest days.
In nearly all provincial elections and in the parliament, we moved to forbid this form of slaughter.
But the entire Jew-controlled press called our stand disgraceful.
In sessions in Baden,
Bavaria, and Thuringa, the National Socialists moved to forbid this form of slaughter, as it is unworthy of a civilized nation.
The Nazis, in their hate-filled anti-Semitism, dpn't shrink from involving
German citizens in their... interference with time-honored religious customs.
They claim it's just cruelty to animals.
Objective scientists, however, have long proven...
That this form of slaughter... is among the most-humane anywhere.
NAZI FANTASIES AGANIST
RITUAL SLAUGHTER
THE BATTLE AGANIST KOSHER MEAT
An objective study by
Rabbi Englebert.
In reply to many inquires... from all circles as to whether slaughtering animals by...
Jewish rites is really cruelty to animals,
I'd like to say the following.
The slaughter is actually a matter of...
EXPLANATION BY
RABBIS OF GERMANY
STORMY COUNCIL SESSION:
SCIENTISTS REFUTE NAZI LIES
ATTACK ON THE CONSTITUTION FAILS
NAZI MOTION FAILS:
HYPOCRITE "ANIMAL LOVERS"
The Jewish press could only get away with writing this because hardly any Germans had ever seen a kosher slaughter. considering the well-known German love of animals, it would otherside have been impossible for the Jews to continue their cruel torture of innocent and defenseless animals unpunished.
These scenes prove the cruelty of this method of slaughter.
They also reveal the character of the race that hides its senseless brutality... behind the gacade of pious religious customs.
The Jewish butchers usually bind the animals... so that no movements betray their agonies.
But it's customary to also sometimes slaughter unbound animals in the way.
Right afer the Führer took power, a law enacted April 21st, 1933, forbade the Jewish form of slaughter.
It decreed that all warm-blooded animals... be given anesthetic before slaughter.
And just as with ritual slaughter,
National Socialist Germany... has made a clean sweep of all Jewry.
Jewish thinking and Jewish blood... will never again pollute the German nation.
Under the leadership of Adolf Hitler,
Germany has raised the battle flag aganist the eternal Jew.
"There's plenty of living space in the world, but the notion that the Jewish people were chosen by Cod... to live off the preductivity of other people will finally have to go.
Jews will just have to getused to the idea of performing some respectable, constructive activity as other people do, or sooner or later they'll face trouble they never dreamed of".
"Should the international finance Jews inside and outside Europe... push people into another world war, the result will not be... a victory of Jewry, but the descruction of the Jewish race in Europe.
The eternal law of nature, keeping one's race pure, is the legacy which... the National Socialist movement leaves to the German nation forever.
In this spirit, the unified German people march on into the future.
1664, Ming Dynasty was overthrowned
On May 2nd the same year
The Manchurian captured Beijing
Norhtern China was occupied by Qing Dynasty
On October first
Emperor Shunzi was crowned at Forbidden City
He ordered all Chinese to shave their scalps to show their loyalty to the Qing Emperor
The Qings continued to invade the Southern Ming
Do the next one!
Our skin and hair are gifts from our parents!
Shaving one's head shows disrespect to ancestors!
I refuse to shave it!
You can't shave my head!
They don't come in peace
Halt!
You can only pass with a shaved head
Either head or hair goes!
Nonsense
Stop!
Don't you see the army?
Who are you?
I am Lin Kun the Ming's Vice-Commander of Fujian Province
I am Li Wei, Military Governor
Li Wei, don't kill him
My father is...
The Commanding General of the Ming Dynasty's Fujian Province
Don't forget...
We will never allow our heads shaved!
My son
I'm glad to see you've finally come back
I know the road was difficult
Father
On the road from Nanjing, Li Wai, Lin Kun and
I saw the Qing Army beheading all wearing the Ming uniform
And the roads were flooded with the troops of the Qing
They will attack Fujian within the next few days
Mountains surround Fujian...
Creating a natural barrier
I have in my command a quarter of a million men
And the emperor is by my side
I am not worried about the Manchus from the north temporarily what distresses me is not only Qing Army but also Taiwan
Fujian and Taiwan have always been united
Now Holland has taken possession of Taiwan for 21 years
I face Qing army's attack from the North
I also fight against the Dutch fleet in sea
The Ming Dynasty would be finished soon
But the Ming Emperor does not understand the situation
He still issue an edict to ask me to vanguish the Qing Army directly
I have braved the rough seas for many years and now Zheng family is well known
The honor to the Zheng family would be kept by you later
My teach told me that country is more important than family
My teacher, the great scholar Qianqian Yishi
Instructed me...
That high officials...
Must have loyalty for the emperor and the country
He said...
Only loyalty to the emperor and country can guarantee national peace
Therefore, since the emperor has issued
An edict to vanquish the Qing and reinstate the Ming Dynasty
The situation of Zheng family should not be consider in first priority
I ask that you dispatch me to command the front line
I promise to wipe out the enemy to revenge the Ming
Talk about it later
Father
My son
The emperor often speaks of you
He intends to summon you
The emperor?
He wishes...
To make a conferral upon you
My son
I also want to tell you...
Your mother will come from Japan soon
My mother?
Mistress, someone is drowning
Rescue them quickly
Hurry!
My girl, where are you trying to go?
I want to go home
I want to go home
Mother
I finally see my son once again
You must be my daughter-in-law
Mother, her name is Dong Yougu
I'm honored to meet you
My husband
You arrive from Hirado at last
Are your parents well?
They are fine. They miss you
We shall meet the Emperor later
Don't say anything
Let's go
We are forever indebted to you
Fuzhou
The Southern Ming Emperor Longwu's Palace
Presenting Fujian Province's
Commanding General
Zheng Zhilong
I, Zheng Zhilong along with wife and son Zheng Sen
Have come to pay our respects to the Emperor
Please rise
Let me see
So you are Zheng Sen
Yes
I heard of you long ago
When you were eleven
You expressed your loyalty to the country...
By expounding upon the virtues...
Of the rulers of former dynasties
It is no wonder that within one year at the imperial academy
The entire city of Nanjing all knew
The greatness of Zheng Sen
Thank you your majesty
The Ming dynasty Emperor Longwu confers upon Zheng Sen...
The emperor's surname Zhu the first name Chenggong...
And the title Earl of Loyalty
Zheng Chenggong, the Imperial Namekeeper!
Your father is already the Commanding General of Fujian Province
I appoint you in charge of military governors...
Commanding the lmperial Army
We kowtow to our benevolent majesty!
On your feet
Zheng Zhilong...
I have seen today's report from Shaanxi Province
The Qing troops have taken the cities Nanking...
As well as Zhengjiang Shaoxing and Hangzhou
Now
They're encamped at the border between Zhejiang and Fujian Provinces
War is now at our doorstep
Your majesty dispatching Li Wai to strengthen the front line
My imperial army is at your command...
Why do you only hold recuse but not attack Qing Army?
Your majesty
The Qing Army comes from the north
In Fujian, mountains surround us on three sides...
The ocean surrounds the fourth side
Fujian is difficult to attack and easy to defend
Fujian's prosperity depends entirely on maritime trade with the world
During the reign of Emperor Chongzhen...
According to the imperial ban on maritime trade
Only Fujian was permitted to continue trading with the world
I believe...
Our most urgent task is to protect our home province guarantee the continuation of maritime trade
Father
Zheng Zhilong...
I could not have become emperor without your support...
Now, most of China is not under my rule
Why should you remain in my service?
I promise to hold secure Fujian Province
Are you only concerned about Fujian?
We can only reclaim Taiwan if Fujian is secured
And by reclaiming Taiwan we will strengthen our maritime trade
Only when our court is prosperous...
Can we have sufficient power to drive the Qing out of China
You don't know the military affairs
Reporting from frontline
Military Governor Gan Hui!
Two Dutch warships fired upon Fujian's trading vessels
They engaged in battle all the way from the Taiwan Straits to Mazu
I have a treaty with the Dutch Viceroy Kuye in Taiwan
They are not permitted to interfere with the Fujian trading vessels
How could he break the treaty! We must retaliate
Inform the batteries to fire the canons!
Yes, sir!
My highness
Please don't watch what my father says
Fire!
Over there
Father
My son, never forget...
You must always protect Fujian Province and our home
Yes, sir
Attack!
Bravo!
Nice job
Have some tea
Mother, please go ahead
Mother
Forget the sadness arising from your argument about
Father's mauner of anti-Qing
Father selected this dish
Buddha jumping the wall. Just for you
The story is that. This dish is so fragrant...
Even when monks catch whiff of it...
They jump over the monestary wall just to steal a few bites
That is why this dish is called
Buddha jumping the wall
I can already smell its wonderful fragrance
Mother
Mother, this is hibiscus and swallow nest soup
The tide of a thousand years; the tears of ten thousand people
Form this bitter ocean water
The wind blows south; the clouds move north
But neither can carry my grief away
Searching for one's home on horizon far away
Reuniting with parents only in dreams
My wish always pushes me on!
I ask the plum blossom in the old courtyard:
When can I return?
Pipa is my voice but fails to relieve my worries
Who understands the feelings of these strings...
And the meaning of this song
My lady
I would like to express my gratitude again for saving my life
You're the girl who was drowning at sea
Your song expresses heartfelt sorrow
My son says your singing expresses longing for your parents
Can you tell me why?
My lady
I am from Taiwan
During Emperor Tianqi's rule
The Taiwanese revolted against the Dutch...
But unexpectedly, it did not succeed
My parents were both killed
Many of us fled to Fuzhou
Please, my girl
Come with me
I shall be your mother lmperial Namekeeper! lmperial Namekeeper! lmperial Namekeeper!
My respected elders
Zheng Chenggong is at your service...
And await your instructions
I see two people down below
Lower the drawbridge!
It is Officer Zhang from the Commanding General's headquarters...
But I don't recognize the others
Officer Zhang, who are those among you?
These three are here to see the Commanding General
Lower the bridge
Adpted sister, you are looking about your home
Please return, otherwise mother will be worried
The gracious commander Zheng!
Why the long journey?
What is it that you want?
The Qing Emperor has sent this imperial decree
He offers you the post of Viceroy of Fujian and Guangdong Provinces
Viceroy of Fujian and Guangdong Province?
Yes, in addition to Fujian Province...
Guangdong Province will also be under your command
This is a very important decision
Please allow me to think it over
The Qing Emperor is also very concerned about Taiwan
If Dutch is defeated and Taiwan is returned to China
According to the rule established by the Ming...
Taiwan will also be placed under your command
Thank you lmperial Namekeeper! lmperial Namekeeper!
Your father has instructed...
Not to allow anyone to enter
What affairs can be so confidential as to be kept a secret from me
I don't know
Your father has ordered the area cordoned off
As you can see...
Guards are positioned throughout the compound
Your majesty. Please rise
Only you can be Anasted
I have received the latest intelligence report
Not only are there traitors among the Ming troops at Xianxia Pass...
But they are also colluding with the Dutch imperialists
This is very serious
You must go to Xianxia Pass and supervise the military
Obtain the general's seal and take over command
Yes, your majesty
If necessary, behead the general
Yes, your majesty
You are a loyalist
This is strictly confidential. Be on guard!
That's right, look straight ahead
You still haven't hit the bull's eye
Try again
Let's see about this time
Excuse us miss
Please let us pass
It seems like there is trouble
Something is certainly up...
Otherwise the palace eunuch...
Would not be so frantic
What has happened?
The Emperor dispatched Chenggong to the military front
As commander of the imperial army...
Of course, he must obey the emperor's orders
You don't understand
He has only taken twenty men with him
This is very serious
Not even you have been informed
The imperial army only obeys the emperor's orders
But you are the Commanding General
Aren't the daily movements of the imperial army
Also reported to you?
Don't make wild guesses about the army
Of course the army is not any concern of mine...
But Sen'er, my son, means the world to me
I beg you to have him return home safely
General
The imperial guards have cordoned off the compound
The Emperor is a fool. How dare he watch me?
Xueliang, you are the only one who can sneak into town
Remember...
After leaving the city gate, follow the shoal
Hurry along the footpath and catch up to Sen'er
I know
I took all the footpaths before when I was homeless
Xuelaing, when you see Sen'er...
Tell him that his father and mother want him to come back immediately
He must not go to Xianxia Pass
Do you understand?
I know
What if Sen'er refused to come back...
And insists on going to Xianxia Pass?
Xueliang
Li Wei fights with a sword in both his left and right hands
Sen'er is aware of this
If he insists on going to Xianxia Pass...
You must have him put on this leather armor vest before he can go
If Li Wei behaves recklessly then he must be killed
Is that a scout?
Let's seize him and find out
Isn't this Xueliang?
Xueliang lmperial Namekeeper
Why are you here? lmperial Namekeeper your father sent me to tell you...
You must immediately return to Fuzhou
This mission is top secret
How does my father know?
Tell my father...
I must go to Xianxia Pass
You mustn't!
You mother insists you return to Fuzhou
I must obey the emperor
In that case, your father said if you must go...
I should give you this
What is going on?
I don't know
Your father said...
I must give this to you
My father wore this armored vest for thirty years
More years than I have been alive
My father must be sending a message
Your father said...
If Li Wei behaves recklessly...
You must kill him
I will have someone escort you back to Fuzhou
I want to go with you to Xianxia Pass
This is a very dangerous mission
You're a girl, you can't go
You father also mentioned...
Li Wei is a master swordsman...
And very cunning
Wait, it's Zheng Chenggong
Why has he come?
I must report to General Li by a faster footpath
Remember, you must keep your queues hidden from view
Yes, sir
General, Zheng Chenggong is coming
Stop! Don't shave him. Clean this up!
Hurry! Conceal your queues!
Quickly put on your helmets! Hurry!
Zheng Chenggong is coming! Hurry!
Put on your helmets! Tuck in your queues!
Attention all officers...
Zheng Chenggong is coming. Hurry!
Keep calm!
General Li please excuse this sudden interruption
Taiwan's Viceroy Kuiyi would like to present these gifts to General Li
What is this?
General Li, please also accept...
This bank check for 3,000 pounds of silver
We know General Li is a brave warrior
Viceroy Kuiyi holds you in high esteem
I'm still not used to wearing a queue upon my head
Right, tell me why you have come?
We would like to ask you...
To serve as a mediator...
Between the Dutch East India Company in Taiwan and Zheng Zhilong
Regardless of whether you are under the Ming or Qing Emperor...
We request the right to freely enter Fujian Province...
And enter China's interior
I will certainly pass this on to General Zheng
Missus, please this way
Let's eat and drink
Everyone let's drink
Hurry
This drink will warm us up
Let's take off our caps
Wanli, you also take of your caps lmperial Namekeeper only the Emperor has the authority...
To patrol the military front
How can you say this!
The Qing has 150,000 soldiers in the Fujian-Zhejiang border region
You must know this
The Qing Army is divided into eight divisions
Each banner is its own division
Their flags flutter all around us...
And we see their armor shining in the sunlight
With such few men
We will not be able to defend Fujian Province
When I was seven...
I recall reading in our teacher's garden
At that time, we were fellow students
The class bullies frequently picked on me
You were always willing to fight back...
Coming to my rescue
You...
You are a hero in my heart
Li Wei
That is only fourteen years ago
Are you no longer that same Li Wei?
Things are different today
When I went to Nanjing to meet you...
I passed through the cities...
Zhengjiang, Shaoxing, Hangzhou, and Yuhua
The Ming troops faced defeat everywhere
How could this not raise doubts?
We have both received the Ming emperor's favor
We must loyally serve him!
The emperor's favor?
How have you served your country?
The Ming emperor has given you a name...
To have you risk your life for his sake
You are doing just as told
Li Wei!
The Ming court...
Has fled in defeat all the way from Beijing to Fujian
After Fujian is lost in battle where will the court go next?
What use is there in defending Fujian?
Li Wei, watch what you say!
Your life is at stake!
I will say what I want!
What are you doing!
Sit down!
Sit back down!
I've had too much of this strong drink
Bring more! lmperial namekeeper
Please forgive me
Who is that playing?
Xue Liang, my adopted sister
What noisy racket!
It is the masterpiece Ambush
Guards!
Yes, sir!
What are you doing?
I want to invite your adopted sister to join us
Such a masterpiece...
Should be better appreciated
Let me go! lmperial Namekeeper, you are surrounded!
Look out for the arrows!
Xueliang!
Stop!
Step back!
Take them off
Zheng Chenggong...
I recall our past friendship as schoolmates
I must reveal the truth to you
At midnight, my troops will surrender to the Qing
According the the Qing imperial decree...
Ming officials are to keep their titles under the Qing
If you come with me...
You will also keep your title
The Ming imperial army...
Will not so easily surrender!
Even if you kill me...
You can not escape
My troops surround you
I will fight to the end for my country!
To live for loyalty
Even if it means my death...
I will never shave my head and surrender to the Qing
Bringing scorn upon myself!
We from Fujian will never...
Surrender to the Qing! lmperial Namekeeper lmperial Namekeeper!
Li Wei, I will take your life!
It is better than becoming a traitor!
Wait, wait!
I am not the one. It is your father!
Shut up!
Viceroy of Fujian and Guangdong...
Have you made up your mind? lmperial Namekeeper!
Throughout my life
I have always detested traitors
Although Li Wei is my friend
He had to come to this end
From today
All officers will be under the command of Wan Li
I shall let the past be past
The devoted will be rewarded!
Xueliang will remain with you while she recovers
You must give her your best care
Please rest assured
Go, go
Mr. Zhang
My husband
Mr. Zhang, where are they going?
Master...
Your father is going to Beijing
Father, mother
My son, you have come back
Father, I have killed Li Wei
What!
Li Wei told me...
You had given him the order
Of course, he is under my command
To surrender?
I am not surrendering
But Li Wei's troops have already shaved their heads
Perhaps you have not yet heard
Hunan and Jiangxi Provinces have all been taken by the Qing troops
Even your teacher Qian Xianyi now pays allegiance to the Qing
No, he could never have surrendered to the Qing
There must be a mistake
How could there be a mistake...
In informing me...
About such an important matter?
My son
I know you don't want to think it possible...
But the Ming dynasty is coming to an end
In China's 2,700 year history...
From the Zhou dynasty until the present...
Only during the rule of the Ming...
Has Taiwan come under the rule of foreigners
There is no use in serving a court...
Which has decayed to this point
Father the emperor has given me the imperial surname
And the first name Chenggong (Victory)
It is my duty to restrengthen the Ming and reclaim Taiwan
Since times ancient fathers have always taught their sons to be loyal
I have never heard of a father teaching his son to be a traitor
How dare you declare yourself a traitor...
In front of your son and wife?
Insolence!
My son
Your father is not surrendering
The Qing Emperor has appointed me
Viceroy of Fujian and Guangdong
Only Hero understands and handles the situation
It is an either for hero
It is hopness for Ming frighting against Qing
Every emperior only devotes to internal struggle even he is being destroyed
You can keep your loyalty
For the goodness of Zheng family
Separtion is our best choice
Master, everything is set to go
Father if you go, you will be in grave danger
You can never return
I must express my appreciation to the emperor
Father!
Sen'er!
Father!
No
Father!
Take care of your mother
You really must leave us?
Father
Be careful!
If anything happens to you...
I will be filled with grief and take revenge!
Zheng's Father never again returned to Fujian
Qing Emperor finally decapitated him in 1662
Attack! lmperial Namekeeper, are you hurt? lmperial Namekeeper the western part of the city has been taken
Attack!
Yun'er
Mother
Mother
Protect the lifeline of the Zheng family
Take the child!
Hope of Millions!
In August, 1946
Qing Dynasty captured Fuzhou's lmperial Court
Zheng's mother died in the battle
Ming's last Emperor was captured and Passed away in prison at Fuzhou
Mommy
Come here.
My son
It's an eagle
It's flying so high!
In the next 14 years
Zheng kept fighting Qing Dynasty
After defeated in Nanjing
He retreated to Xiaman in Fuijian Province
He faced The Netherlands Sea force's invasion
Holland's attack take away these tables
Quickly make room for the injured!
The sea is becoming more and more perilous
It's best for you to move into the official residence and live with us
I am only an adopted daughter...
And my mother who adopted me is no longer with us
It's not appropriate for me to stay in the official residence
In addition, while you look after the canons...
I see to the teahouse
This way we can help each other
Chenggong is still attending the canons
Please deliver this food to him
I known you take care lmperial Namekeeper
Chengong's arrow wound from the past become even more painful by the wind and cold
I am busy take this medicine to him as well
We would like to give you this medicine
You are worried about the situation today
Today
Many of my fellow soldiers...
Have been buried at sea
Xueliang
The first time I saw you...
Your music brought tears to my mother's eyes
I swear this even after ten years
To bring you back to your home in Taiwan
Everytime I set eyes upon the Hope of Millions
I am overcome with grief
Protection of Xiamen is not forever
If we plan to fight against Dutch we have to take care Qing Army's attrack
We have to face enemies
I hesitate what to do next lmperial Namekeeper has good planning
If you can defeat Dutch...
Taiwan is good for military traning anti-Qing and reinstate the Ming Dynasty
And we would not be suppressed by the Dutch
Taiwan!
General, Chengong has arrived lmperial Namekeeper
Wanli, how many canons can fit...
On the newly built vessel?
Thirty-six canons
Thirty-six! That many?
That's right. Even in your father's prime...
The war vessels he built...
Could hold only twelve canons
The Dutch canons may be more powerful
Quickly build more small warship to defeat them
Mistress
Get yourself ready to enter the official residence
Xuelian
Xuelian, please come in
Chengong is preparing to wage war
He has put this Hope of Millions...
On the wall of his bedroom
From the morning bells to the evening drums...
He pledges to serve his country against all hardships. He has decided to reclaim Taiwan
This is the reason why I invited you today
Xuelian, after you
When my father was at sea...
He had sent a man by the name of He Bin...
To go to Taiwan as a liaison with the Dutch
Xuelian, please sit
Chenggong says the first step in reclaimingTaiwan is to find He Bin
This is strictly confidential
I have decided to go to Taiwan
The one thing...
Holding me back is Chenggong
These ten years his body has become covered with wounds
Both his body and spirit...
Are much weaker than in the past
After going to Taiwan this time most likely I will not return
I will entrust my husband in your care
You must take the best care of him
Agree?
Chenggong
I have made arrangements for the household
Make sure you take care of your health...
After I have left lmperial Namekeeper
I beg you to let me go to Taiwan in your wife's place
Xueliang
You can't do this! Get up quickly
You have been protected within the compounds for many years
You are different from us commoners
I grew up in Taiwan...
I am the right person to go
But Xueliang...
Xueliang
Have you forgotten about yesterday?
Didn't you agree?
Xueliang!
Xueliang!
Please get up
More than ten years ago...
Your mother saved me from drowning in the ocean
My life belongs to the Zheng family
Only until after you defent the Dutch and recapture Taiwan...
Will I not feel as if my body is torn in pieces...
And be of no regrets
Xueliang
This is a military...
Xueliang! lmperial Namekeeper!
Take this with you
This was given to my father by the Ming emperor
Thank you, lmperial Namekeeper
Chikan Castle Taiwan
The East India Company insignias...
On the top of your staffs...
Indicate that we have granted you the authority to collect tax
During this meeting of the Taiwan village elders
We shall punish...
The following village elders...
For their unsatisfactory tax collection
We punish the Sumer tribe of Taibei's Danshui
Taizhong's Fawolan tribe...
Taidong's Xibiyin tribe and Langqiao's Shiba tribe
Go ahead
Colonel, they are the village elders
Let's continue
Do not be frightened
What are you doing! This is for my uncle
Give it back to me!
It's for my uncle!
Where are you from?
Fujian
What are you doing here?
I'm looking for my uncle
He is here as a liaison
His name is He Bin. Give it back to me!
What is his name?
He Bin
He Bin, come here
Do you recognize her?
No
Take her away
Colonel, wait
I recognize this sword
Sword?
Yes
This is my brother's sword
It was given to my brother by the Ming emperor
Your brother? The emperor?
Who is your brother?
He is a high-ranking officer
But you don't recognize her?
Colonel, I have been away from my home for nearly thirty years
That is enough time for a woman to grow up and give birth to a child
This sword indicates this girl is my niece
Uncle
My child, let's go
Your brother is gravely ill
You may return immediately
When you come back...
Bring your wife and child with you
Thank you
I will come back as quickly as possible
You will be let out when your uncle returns
You are?
I'm Zheng Chenggong. He Bin?
At your service, lmperial Namekeeper
Please get up. Sit here
What about Xueliang?
Why didn't she come back with you?
She has been taken hostage by the Dutch
Excuse me, please
A map of the sea! lmperial Namekeeper
The waterways in Taiwan are complexly interconnected
Departing from Jinmen...
There is only one route...
In which large vessels can enter Taiwan's interior
Namely, Anpingkou
The Dutch are aware of this
Heavy artillery guards this location
And they have blocked off overland routes
I presumed this as well
I have been studying the island's geography since my arrival
I discovered Lu'ermen
Lu'ermen?
Lu'ermen is located betwen the Lu'er archipelago
And the Beixianwei Island
From here it is possible to reach the city of Chikan
I have investigated these islands
There are many coral reefs and the waterways are windy
The water is also too shallow for large vessels
But every year Lu'ermen experiences two high tides...
And this is when the route is passable for large vessels
Can you guarantee this?
Yes
There are only two high tides each year
When is the first high tide?
The first of April
The first of April
Lu'ermen lmperial Namekeeper, look!
The hightide has come
Defet Dutch and Reclaim Taiwan...
And you will be rewarded!
Order the vessels to raise their sails!
My god!
We are being attacked!
Attack!
Captain the Ming troops are attacking the fortress
Turn the ship around and prepare for battle
Yes, sir lmperial Namekeeper the Dutch vessels are coming from behind lmperial Namekeeper what can we do?
The Dutch cannons are more powerful than us
Use the warship to sink it!
He Bin, come back!
He Bin!
Stay back!
He Bin! lmperial Namekeeper!
General, I beg you to let the girl go
She is innocent
Take me instead
He Bin!
General
He Bin! lmperial Namekeeper!
Get the canons! Bring up the canons! lmperial Namekeeper!
Xueliang!
Fire
In 23 December, 1661
The Dutch Viceroy in Taiwan decided to surrending and return to Batavia
After Zheng liberated Taiwan he established the township in Taiwan
Anping, Tianxing and Wanpian
I have finally proven my loyalty Zheng said
In 1662
Zheng died of illness at the age of 39 at Anping
In 1683
Zheng's grandson surrendered to Qing Dynasty
Taiwan returned to his Motherland again
THE FIGHTING LADY
In Technicolor
A Drama of the Pacific
U. S. Navall Communications
U. S. NAVAL COMMUNICATION SERVICE
This is an authentic record photographed in zones of combat by men of the United States Navy.
Photography Supervised by:
Commander Edward J. Steichen US NR
Lt. Comdr. R. L. Middleton USN
Lt. Comdr. Dwright Long US NR
Phillppe De Lacy
Musical Direction: Alfred Newman
Music: David Buttolph
Maps by: Fred Sersen
Film Editor: G. Leverettand R. Heman
Narration Written By: Eugene Ling and John Stuart Martin
The Narrator is:
Lieut. RobertTaylor US NR
A Louis De Rochemont Production
Faraloft, over the Atlantic seaboard, one fine morning in 1943...
...an Imposing force of
American Navall air power proceeds...
...to an Important rendezvous.
This force is the aircraft compllment of a new carrier.
Fighters... bombers
...torpedo bombers.
With the airgroup commander leading everyone...
...they flying out to sea, tojoln the ship which will be...
...their floating home and fighting base.
It's one of many carriers which the American people have bullts lnce Pearl Harbor.
To destroy the enemy in his own part of the world faraway.
And there now is our base.
Powerful and serene.
In honor of all American alrcraft carriers...
...let us call her The Fighting Lady.
Agalnst a good solid wind, with hertall hooks down...
...our planes come Into the broad flightdeck oftheir new home.
In case the plane's hook falls to catch the arresting gear...
...there s a series ofstout, wire barriers.
Numberone man on the flightdeck, just now, is the LSO...
...the Landing Signal Oficer.
Always a flyerr hlmself.
Llke all aviators, he would much rather be flying.
Come on in and sitdown.
The plane is outofthe groove and he waves itoff.
Come around anothertime pilot and we will take you aboard.
When planes land, they taxi quickly forward, outofthe way.
Later, they will have to be shifted to the storn...
...and rearranged for proper position fortake off.
This is called, re spotting the deck.
Here is ourskipper, Jocko.
Aveteran Navy. flyerr.
Annapolis 1917
He is not Impressed by ourearnest efforts.
Northe flightdeck control oficers.
The skippercalls all hands together, and gives us a piece of his mlnd.
We will never be ready forcombat, unless you flightdeck crews learn right now to work as a team.
Don'tyou men realize that before long, we will be in dangerous waters?
Thats too slowl Bare handsl
Watch outl Keep thatwing clearl
Get itoverto starboard, way overto starboard.
Come on, get the lead out of your pants.
Nowthis is the way yourdeck should look when you are ready foraction.
Our ship, Our Fighting Ladyis enormous, wonderful and strange to us.
From stom to storn, the entire ship is a honeycomb of water tight and flame proof compartments.
Far belowthe water Ilne are englne rooms, fire rooms and fuel tanks...
...with magazlnes packed with enough high explosives to blow us all to kingdom come.
The hangardeck is like a gigantic tunnel...
...nearly two city blocks long and wide enough to house four freight tralns abreast
It will take us a week, month maybe, to learn ourway around.
These new surroundings are as mysterious to us...
...as they are cold and Impersonal.
Our Fighting Lady is like a huge floating cave, noisy and uncomfortable.
Elevators as big as a tennis court...
...carry us top side to the flightdeck.
The greatsuperstructure rising at mid ship, is called the island.
This is truly the ship's nerve cehter, it'sfighting braln.
85% of us, who make up
The Fighting Lady's famlly...
...are volunteers in thiswar and have never been to sea before.
We learned ourjobs theoretically in intensive training ashore.
Very shortwhlle ago, we were high school boys, and college kids...
...or bank clerks, orfarm hands, orfactory workers.
Nowwe are Blue Jackets and Marines.
All members ofa Navall
CombatTeam nearly 3000 strong.
In our multitude of newtasks and duties as a team.
We are very green, butcuriosity and comradeshlp...
...and the Instinct of self preservation are great teachers.
Some of us have to masterthe delicate and complicated Instruments...
...which control the fire of our five Inch batteries.
The guns that must defend The Fighting Lady when enemy dive bombers and torpedoes planes attack.
We traln and traln to learn ourstuff and earn our E...
...forefficiency.
The Fighting Lady s destination is still a closely, guarded, secret.
No one can hide the fact that we are ehtering tropical waters.
Ourship seems more friendly and comfortable now.
We green hornsfeel a suntan will at least make us look like fighting sallors.
Even our mascotScrapy, has been atsea longerthan mostof us.
Some of the mystery, that has been hanging over us...
...has been lifted when we ehterthe Panama Canal.
There's a lot of unprofessional nervousness about whetheror not we too big to get through the locks.
By using Ilnes, Instead offenders, we do get through...
...as the Navall constructors knew all along, we would.
Come on, hop aboard, we re going places.
For 2 cents I would.
Know anybody who wants to swap?
Now we stand out in the Pacific.
Life aboard settles down Into monotony.
Here are ouralrcraft pilots, officers all.
Ship's company call themThe Glamour Boys.
They are the men who fly and fightour planes.
All the efforts ofall the rest of us are concentrated on...
...putting these people in the air and getting them back again.
Mostof us are hiding a certaln amountof nervousness and anxiety...
...for many of us are
Johnny Come Lately
Reserve Officerswho only recently learned to fly atCorpus Christi in Jacksonville.
Others among us are speoialists who tralned at Quonset Polnt, Rhode Island.
Reserves are called by the regulars,
In a friendly way, 90 Day Wonders.
In return, theAnnapolis regulars are called The Trade School Boys.
In return, the Annapolis regulars are called The Trade School Boys.
ButwhetherQuonsetorAnnapolis, all are bound in a fraternity...
...a close fellowshlp, of Navy. men.
Among the ships non commissioned personnel...
...almost3000 Blue Jackets and 100 Marines...
...the hottest shots are the aircrewmen.
Ariel gunners and radio men.
The boys and the plane captalns are the partners of the Glamour Boys in the air
By non flying Blue Jackets, they are called zoom pigeons orAlredales.
And because they receive
50% extra pay forflying...
...they are sometimes referred to as the bank roll boys.
Everybody aboard ship backs up the flying group.
This requlres the efforts ofall mannerof people.
Many ofthejobs are farfrom glamorous.
All the little tasks and services you find along Maln Street...
...must be preformed by some members ofourcarriers crew
ForthoughThe Fighting Lady is a powerful ship ofwar...
...she is also a sizeable
American community.
It's population must be supplied with all the necessities and...
...some of the comforts of home.
Sorensen, the pharmacist's mate, isjust like a village druggist.
Nextdoor is our hospital, called sickbay.
Itonly has a few patients now, but soon it is be filled with ourwounded.
Men like these, who perform the humblejobs that make life aboard a fighting carrier more boarable...
...the barbors and the cobblers...
...are seldom mentioned in communiqués...
...they all have a place
In ourfighting team.
Weeks pass.
Nowwe are farout in the Pacific...
...which is a very considerable body ofwater.
Monotony shuts down on us between ourduties...
...guessing where we're bound is still ourchief pastime.
Will we pull Into Pearl?
Are we going to Iron Bottom Bay?
Or maybe even to theAleutians.
All such gosslp and rumorare called scuttie buttordrlnking fountaln conversation.
Throughoutthe ship, men gettogether in little groups... to take refuge from the heavy burden ofwaiting forsomething to happen.
And then one day, outof nowhere, comes a fastfleettanker...
...and we refueled atsea.
This tells us something.
This tells us that we are notgoing to Pearl...
...orany other land base fora long, long time.
Besides ourskipper, we have an Admlral aboard.
Asea dog who has been a Navall flyerr for nearly 20 years.
Until now, only these officers have known where we are to go.
But nowJocko, ourcaptaln, conferswith the air-group commanderand reveals the plan.
The Fighting Lady has been ordered to make a strike.
She will pass through waters, where no carriertask force has ventured...
...slnce the bloody battle of Midway.
Rememberthis is 1943, long before we took the Marshall Islands.
Weatherstudies are made, and though this is a dally routine...
...somehowthe whole ship senses, something is aboutto happen.
Even before the news is broadcastto all of us...
...there is a new tension and atmosphere expectancy
And then we are told...
...we have traveled more than
7000 mllesfrom Panama...
...so thattomorrow,
August30, 1943...
...we can strike the Jap base at Marcus Island...
...deep withln the enemies ring ofdefenses.
The evening before ourfirststrike...
...the airgroup commander briefs all his pilots with maps and the model ofourtarget.
We are sticking outour necks, to withln a thousands mlles of Tokyo... to divert the Japs attention from to her American activities...
...farsouth and eastof Marcus.
Those of us, who have never before been in battle... that is mostof us, ask a lotof questions to those who have seen action.
Don't break off until you are practically on the same course...
...righta storn of the enemy.
Then push overfast.
Outwardly, we try to seem composed and cheerful.
A lots going on Inside our mlnds.
We question our most Innerselves.
Whatwill it be like?
Howwill we take it?
Will we do all right?
This is the nightwhen a lotof the boys write one more letter home.
Among those playingAchy Duchy
In the ward room...
...is a chubby 23 yearold from Eureka Springs, Arkansas.
Lt. E.T. Stover
Nicknamed, Smokey.
That's he, sitting on the far right.
Having flown 50 missions atGuadalcanal...
Smokey has been ordered to take a rest.
He'd much rather be flying.
Before dark, on the eve of the battle, our planes are...
...loaded with bombs and gas.
So thateach plane will be in its precious position fora speedy take off...
...we spotand re spotourdeck.
Now all is perfect...
We will strike at dawn.
And now G. Q. General Quarters.
Every man on the ship goes to his battle station.
His speoial place on the fighting team.
George, the barbor, will pass ammunition.
Leo, the baker, will be a sky look out.
Frank, the tallor, is assigned to a firstaid station.
Pilots are in their ready rooms.
Each squadron, fighter, bomber, torpedo bomber...
...assembly separately.
Flyerrs get Into theirflightgearand receive last mlnute data and Instructions.
On the flightdeck, ourfirst battle dawn awaits us.
Ourwhole ship is on halrtrigger.
The Fighting Lady is hardly 100 mlles ofthe firsttarget in hercareer.
These lastfew mlnutes before the orderforourfirstaction...
...are the toughesttime ofall.
Awise man once said:
"War is mostly waiting".
We learn now, whatthatcan mean.
At lastthe word comes.
Pilots, man your planes.
Ready room three, Roger.
Pilots, man your planes.
The fighters take offfirst, to form coverforthe othersquadrons.
Then the bombers... heavy laden with destruction.
The sun has risen now, and ourescorts are alertforenemy submarines.
ButThe Fighting Lady boldly steams toward ourtarget.
To lessen the distance forour planeswhen they return.
The radio plotting room is the electric eye and ear...
...by whichThe Fighting Lady detects and keeps tab on all...
...planes and ship for mlles around us.
Smokey, the fighting ace fromArkansas...
...has been put in charge ofthis room forour big day.
Hunched among his assistants,
Smokey is like a superquarter back...
...on a superfootball team.
He is in constanttouch with ourentire airgroup.
As ourfirstfighters race In towards Marcus Island, they stay low...
...hoping to escape detection by the enemy's radar
Then they cllmb suddenly and dive...
...a surprise strafing attack on the enemy's airstrips.
These red balls, floating up at us to lazlly...
...are anti aircraftfire.
There is 3 times as much of it coming up at us aswe can see.
Because only one shell
In three is a tracer
What looked like firry pulley woks are tracersfrom ourown wing guns.
The acted is much heavier than expected...
...butthrough itwe go to knock out enemy bombers on the ground.
All through these battle pictures, realize we are looking straightdown ourgun barrels.
These pictures are taken aautomatically by the same mechanism thatoperates the guns.
Pictures even shake, with the guns recoll.
Our eye is now the very eye of our fighting airplane.
The enemy's picket boats and supply ships ofshore...
...are thoroughly scraped.
No longerwill these bring crafts brings rice and sake and munitions to Marcus.
Our bombers, flying higher, see the island beginning to burn.
Amomentago, it looked like a little jade trinket, in cobaltsea.
As the fighters and bombers swing victoriously away from Marcus island...
...towering columns ofsmoke show the thorough job our boys have done.
Back aboard the ship,
Smokey is tracking the flyerrswith care, to make sure none is missing...
...and that no enemy planes are trying to follow them outto our Fighting Lady
As our planes come aboard, there begins an operation almost exciting as the attack itself.
A ballet after battle. With the plane dlrectors as dancing masters.
The whlrling propellers fill this scene with danger...
...but now our crews are tralned and adept.
The landing signal oficer, performs an elegant adagio on The Fighting Lady's storn.
Awarning to the rest of the cast, to stay offstage...
...until the Ilmping member can be lead out of the way
The pilots go below, to report to their combat intelligent oficers.
They have hot news. Good news.
They tell whatthey saw and did.
How many rounds of monition they fired.
How many bombs they dropped.
What they hit.
What they noticed at the target that was new or different...
...or that may need hitting again.
As the reports are added up, and our combat photographs develop their pictures...
...the story becomes better and better
Every single Jap bomber on Marcus, has been destroyed.
80% of the shore Installations blasted or set at fire.
Hangars, radio stations, gas dumps, and munitions dumps.
Marcus is now a lovely mess.
In the radio hut, Smokey sworried.
There are planes still up there and he swondering about them.
They are ours though, delayed by battle damage.
Landing a shot up plane on the carrier...
...is a crucial testas to howwell tralned, how alert and steady a Navall flyerr is.
The Fighting Lady has now met her enemy.
In the ward room, the pilots who this morning, felt new and nervous...
...now talk like veterans.
We have been baptized by fire, and have survived nicely.
We ofThe Fighting Lady are growing up.
The Admlral of our task force...
...knows the overall strategy of the Pacific campaign.
To smash straight through Japan's outer network of islands.
To recapture the Philippines and land on the malnland ofAsia.
Thuswe will deny Japan supplies from ally in the Dautoh East Indies...
...and leave herfarflung garrisons marooned.
Then we will reach out and really help ourally Chlna.
Months after Marcus, this campaign iswell started.
Our carrier task forces have been
In many battles.
And now, early in 1944,
The Fighting Lady s target is
Kwajaleln, the Marshall Islands.
These are Jap Zeros.
Fighter screens being pierced by our planes and...
...planes from either other carriers... preparatory to scraping Kwajaleln and bombing it apart.
The fighter pilots have Improved with practice.
With the confidence that comes from experience.
They estimate their range, by watching their tracers.
They hold theirfire, until their wing gunned bullets can verge at 300 yards.
They shoot in bursts Instead of steady streams...
...which heat up the guns and spend ammunition.
They soon have Kwajalein burning, very satisfactorily.
After our bombing attacks, and heavy shelling by our surface ships...
...assaultcrafts filled with
Marines and Army hit the beaches.
And very soon after that,
Kwajaleln is ours.
Right after Kwajaleln, word comes to ourAdmlral, thataTruk
Japan's huge and secret Navall fortress
1400 mlles to the west...
...there are apparently some heavy units of the Japanese battle fleet.
Perhaps we can surprise them.
Again The Fighting Lady's squadron and squadrons from other carriers...
...take off for combat.
A lot of mlles are dry at the though to four target...
...is mightyTruk
The rearseat gunners, look back at The Fighting Lady...
...wondering when and if...
...they will ever return to her.
All that we know about Truk, we know by a few photographs taken by...
...some nervy Marines on reconnaissance just 18 days ago.
And here there is a complex of heavily fortified islands...
...surrounded by airstrips.
With Navall anchorages on certaln spots among the islands.
For the next two days, more than 1000 ofourcarrier-base planes... are going to sweep In on Truk in relays.
The planes appear to float gently of four bow.
Actually their air speed is a good 70 knots.
Diving in onTruk, we again turn on our guns and their synchronized cameras.
Truk's defenders are aloftand we smack them hard.
The hearts thatwere in men's mouths before this strike began...
...now settle back Into place and are singing once more.
There's something really grand, something historic...
...about diving in here on this place which Japan has been bullding and guarding...
...jealously from all the Japanese eyes for 20 years.
We dive right in low and take a good look.
At fighter strips, bomber bases and seaplane ramps.
In an almost vertical dive...
...the pilot may black outorgo bilnd fora moment when he pulls up and out of the bottom.
But the camera won't black out.
Itcan not see the landing of our own bomb, forwe will be up and away...
...before that reaches the target.
But it records the hits of the other planes ahead of us.
We had hoped to find the Jap fleet here, but most of it is gone.
Some lingering ships, Including some of their fast fleet tankers...
...we find hiding in sheltered coves.
The vessels we are now strafing are other fleet auxiliary.
Rice boats, transports, ammunition ships.
With bursts of 50 callber Incendiaries and armor piercing slugs...
...we setthem on fire, rlp them open, often wide enough to slnk.
Strafing ships filled with TNT is not very healthy for pilots who dive too low.
But it's hard to tell who is carrying what, until the big bang comes.
Returning to the deck at 130 mlles per hour, with a flap shot away...
...all a pilot can hope to save is his own skln.
Here comes our new airgroup commander...
...he's had a bit of trouble.
His wind shield is blotted with blood and he has to feel hisway aboard.
Strafing at low altitude, he took a
40 mm anti aircraft burst, right in the face.
More than 200wounds... and his plane, a sieve.
But he will live to fly again.
But he will live to fly again.
Some planes will not return...
...but others come back and land some how, anyhow.
Considering the toughness of Truk, our losses are astonishingly light.
No time is lostgetting casualties below.
Its a long way from Truk to our secret rendezvous in the Marshall Islands...
...someday it can be told just where this is.
Actually, it is a magnificent fleet anchorage, an advanced Navall Base...
...which we have taken from the Japs and made secure.
Now for the first time, we, who have been operating a separate, relatively, small task forces...
...see assembled the enormous mass of Navall power.
Over 1 mlllion tons of American fighting steel.
New carries... new battleshlps...
New cruisers and fleet auxiliaries in an amount which Japan could never conceive.
Letal one produce.
That we are able to malntaln supply lines over the vast distances of the Pacific...
...is one of the mlracles of this war.
In the comforting presence of so much power, we relax...
...and refresh our battle stralned nerves.
Our ship's post office now does really big buslness.
Letters for us at last from home.
Letters from us to friends and famlly.
Our sensors know our collective mood.
Our central hopos and thoughts.
The stuff is really getting out here now
I can'ttell you much about it, butoooooh boy
And the more we get, well the sooner I will be seeing you.
All hands are called together.
Our old skipper Jocko has been promoted Admlral.
Our new ones name is Dixie.
Men, as soon as I finish talking, we are getting underway.
Our Fighting Lady is now partof what is designated task force 58.
As you know, our final destination is a place called, Tokyo.
We will have to fight hard to getthere, but when we drop our hook at Yokohama...
...I m going to throw a party.
All hands are cordially Invited.
Our task forces are bullt compactly now around carriers like ourselves...
...with speedy new battle wagons by ourside.
A carrier's skipper never leaves the bridge atsea...
...because carriers and their planes are first to strike the enemy...
...or to be struck by him.
Our aircraft pilots are constantly on call.
For despite the massive power spread out around us...
...these are still dangerous waters.
Our pilots knowthis all to well, but itdoesn'tworry them now...
...for they're seasoned.
They know how.
There are a lot of new aces among us, but these men too...
...have been in action.
At places like Hollandia, Mell, Jolllet,
Halau, Rabaul and Wake, Maloelap.
Our rear seat gunners and radio men are old hands now
Some of their faces are different too, because there have been replacements.
A lost of them have been made commissioned officers.
There s a saying in the Navy, that you never getto love a carrier, until she gets hurt.
Well perhaps we don't really love our Fighting Lady, but...
...we have become mighty fond of her.
And almost comfortable, almost at home.
Occasionally ourship board movies bring us that one thing we crave the mostl...
...one touch ofsomething uttorly American.
One deep breath of home.
Llke Jocko, our new skipper Dixie is an old hell diving Navy. pilot.
In our battle camps, he and Admlral Mitscher look like big league baseball managers.
Northwest we steam and never before
In history has...
...an ocean born the weight ofsuch Navall power.
Not at Jutlan, not at Japan's proud boast Tsushlma
...was there anywhere near the force which we now assert that this is our ocean.
This is our air. And we're seeking the Japanese battle fleet to prove it.
With our cruisers and our biggest new battle wagons present...
...we are strong enough to hope, really to hope...
...that we may proveke the Japanese fleet
Into accepting a fight.
We are joined by plotting coastguards and navy transports.
The Marines again.
So, another amphlbious assault is cooking.
Oh oh!
Our patrols have spotted an enemy search plane and are after her.
She's a big blrd.
A 20 ton four motor
Kawanishl sea plane.
The klnd we call Emlly's.
This Emlly is a tough old glrl.
Right now she's screaming for help and telling Tokyo by radio where we are.
Hellcats are closing in on it.
So long Emlly.
Now that the enemy knows where we are, and we know he knows.
Our brass hats get together for final arrangements for what may...
...turn Into another Midway.
Our objective, first of many in our drive through the Philippines and China...
...will be the Marianas.
In battles just a head of us, we are to make good use of...
...a multitude of weapons, special devices and techniques...
...which have been evolved through the 30 years since the U. S. Navy... first took to the air.
Not only did our Navall flyerrs create the aircraftcarrier itself,
...but it was they who devised the torpedo plane and Invented and perfected dive bombing.
Disposed abou tour flight decks, so that the planes can be quickly armed...
...are all manner of depth dealing objects.
500, 1000, and 2000 pound bombs.
We have torpedoes and Incendiaries.
And the klnd of anti personnel bombs we call Daisy Cuttors.
Some ofour bombs are amour piercing.
Some for fragmentation.
Others have delayed action fuses to prolong the effect o four bombardment...
...for hours after we have delivered it.
Here are the new rockets, that pack the same wallop as a 3 Inch shell.
They weigh little, and because there isn't much recoll...
...they can be fired from planes.
On the eve of battle, we are told to scrub up to lessen the danger of Infection...
...In case we are wounded.
Aswell as our bodies, mostof us prepare our souls.
Always on the eve of battle...
...divine services are held in relays.
So that every one ofour Fighting Lady's
3000 sons has a chance to attend.
As the eve before battle lengthens, there is the usual waiting.
Agaln we're remlnded that war is mostly waiting.
Because all cooks and bakers must soon be at their battle stations...
...they work all night long preparing a hearty. meal ofsteak,
...and eggs for our 3 a.m. battle breakfast.
We are being attacked.
We are being attacked by Japanese torpedo planes, sklmming In...
...after us, wing to water.
All they want is one hit on our flight deck.
We have nearly 90 planes fueled and loaded with bombs, ready forthe take off.
Each patch offlame, is a burning Jap.
In the surprise attack, 19 Japs are polished off by ourshlp's batteries.
Not a single carrier is hit.
We have been fortunate.
So now commences another moment
In The Fighting Lady's career.
Flight quarter sounds.
In this, modern war fare...
...the young plane captaln's are to their pilots whats qulres were to armored knights ofold.
In this operation, typical of many more to come...
...a lot of other Fighting Ladies will be Involved.
Nearly 2000 carrier bassed planes, all of them attacking in airgroups, like our own.
From now on we tighten our beits and steady our hands.
As our Navy. makes progressively bigger attacks...
...nearer and nearer the heart of Japan.
At his post and radio plot, tracking down enemy planes and cursing the luck that keeps him out of the air.
Smokey chafes at being grounded on a day like this.
Especially when targets are juicy ones.
All the Jap airbases and mllitary
Installations in the Marianas...
...and a speoial prize packagee Guam.
The island which we did not fortify, but the Japs did.
Now comes the word that the Japs have sent strong air relnforcements to TInian...
...which flanks Guam.
Agaln our synchronized cameras record,
...as no human eye and memory could record...
...just what our guns and bombs do to the enemy.
These pictures enable our air combat intelligent officers...
...to asses the damage, aswe swoop down on TInian.
Whlle our planes return for more fuel and ammunition...
...the surface vessels take over.
A navall barrage to prepare the beaches our assault forces are going to hit.
Not only our newest, but some ofour oldest and proudest battle ships are here.
The Colorado, The Tennesssee
...and the U. S. S. Pennsylvania, the flag ship of WW 1.
Winging home to the Fighting Lady, several ofour planes, crippled...
...make a game attempt to land.
Now is when the landing signal oficer must judge notonly the speed...
...but estimate the battle damage of planes like these.
And flightdeck emergency crews, fire fighters, rescue detalls...
...and medical foremen... exhlbital most Incredlble courage.
The pilot of a torpedo plane has been unable to release his Incendiaries,
Burning termite is spllling out an Incandescont heat.
In the planes tanks, remaln about
75 gallons of high octane gas.
The men who brave this danger to save pilotand crew...
...deserve every citation they get.
In the ready rooms, intelligent oficers question battle weary pilots.
What did you see?
Any Jap carriers in sight?
Are you sure they were carrier bassed planes?
Then from radio plot comes uncomfortable news...
...torpedo planes, and enemy dive bombers from enemy aircraftcarriers are approaching.
All hands, man your battle stations".
To our englne room go orders for flank speed... which is a few knots faster than full speed,
In case we need to take evasive action.
All bollers are lighted, to let
The Fighting Lady outdo herself if necessary
The englne room people turn on the heat...
...and the propeller shafts turn like fate in their alleys.
The Fighting Lady leaps through the sea on herguard.
Sklpper Dixie gears hlmself for action...
...and so does wise old Scrappy.
And now, here they come.
A Jap JIII, torpedo bomber, mlraculously keeps coming through our wall of flak.
He's approaching us fast, with a life that must be charmed.
Our gunners throw everything they've got, but still she comes.
If he ever releases that torpedo...
He missed us...
Either the pilot was aiready dead or his release gear jammed.
Smokey, the pride of Arkansas, hears about that one and he almost takes of.
Now our reconnaissance has spotted the Japanese task forces.
This is the momentwe've been fighting and praying for.
Every plane thatcan fly, and every qualified pilot is ordered Into the air.
At last Smokey gets his chance to fly again.
Pilots man your planes".
"Pilots man your planes".
Philippine trade wind is tearing down our flightdeck.
Our planes straln forward to rise Into it.
Our entire airgroup thunders out behind the group commander
Now our fighters run Into a swarm of Jap fighters...
...mostly Zeros, sent up to intercept our attack on the Japanese fleet.
A mad aerial scramble begins which the boys to this day...
...still call the Marianas turkey shoot.
369 Jap planes are shotdown
...In this single day...
...to our loss of 22.
Japanese plane makers have sacrificed strongth and fire power...
...for agllity and their planes is Integrate quickly when you hit them.
They have no amour plate, as ours have...
...norare their gas tanks selfsealing.
These little monkeys are fancy flyerrs.
They think aerobatics can win dog fights, where as we...
...believe in smooth flying and careful shooting.
And now, at last, through a late afternoon haze from high altitude...
...our aircombatgroup sights the Imperial Japanese battle fleet.
These are the first pictures ever taken of a great enemy navall formation like this.
There it is... an Imperial fleet.
Crawling around below us
In violent evasive action.
Us, looking down on them...
In the seas they think they own.
Some ofthese Japanese ships are scampering away at better than 40 knots.
When you bore straightdown on them, they twist and squlrm.
They engage a big destroyer at the bow, hoping to shoot out his bridge.
And he shoots back, plehty
Let's go down after that cruiser.
He answers us empathically from the forward turret.
Now a 25 thousand ton Jap carrier ofthe Hayataka class is going to get it.
Watch 5 o clock in the camera.
The lower right hand corner of the screen.
This big flat top gets it where the turkey gets the axe.
Will you touch of some of these babies.
Just watch this one.
And now we come home from the battle of the Philippine sea.
17 Jap warships have been sunk or severely damaged.
Several ofour returning planes have been badly shot up.
A dive bomber pulls in out of gas...
...he pulls offto starboard, but he knows its over because his wheels are down.
This pilot has 73 holes in his plane.
And his leg almost shot away.
To clear the deck for other planes, number 30, badly damaged, is jett is oned.
Given the deep six.
Watch carefully.
This man's controls are all but shot away.
He stops out of it, smlling.
And now it is time to palnt up the scores.
On this fine morning, justa year after being commissioned...
...The Fighting Lady is beginning to look like a stamp album.
She has done her share. Amassing
Task Force 58 is grand total of...
...757 Jap aircraft destroyed in a two week turkey shoot.
But there's another score to add up.
Our own casualties.
Quiet a few faces are no longer with us on The Fighting Lady.
Among them... Lt. Commander Upson, skipper of our torpedo squadron.
Lt. Pappy. Condit.
Lt. John Mean.
And that fighting gentlemen,
Lt. Smokey Stover
Yes, Smokey's missing too.
Salute them, under their country's flag.
Forthey were brave... they were gallant.
Others will come forward to take their places.
But the battleswe have fought on the seas and in the sky...
...are only the beginning.
Still hungry for battle, will steam our carrier...
...serene, powerful...
...unafraid.
She and her planes will come home again some day...
God grant.
But not until the bitter glorious end.
Forshe is, and we salute her...
...The Fighting Lady.
The End
BLOOD OF THE BEAST
AT THE DOORS OF PARIS
At the doors of Paris, the uncultivated lands, where young poor men play...
...they are seeded of unique relics of a wealth past.
Arranged and offered for the benefit...
...of peculiar, traveling poets and lovers...
...here, on the brink of madness the life of the city, between trucks and trains.
Im Lager von Vanves ist es das Schlachthaus "Vaugiraud".
In spite of the bullfighting statues,...
...the urban slaughter house is specialized in the slaughter of horses.
To Emile Decroix
Defender of the equine meat
The used tools vary based on the animal: the rush, or cane...
...the mallet...
...and the pistol of retained projectile, whose impact kills the animal right away.
After bleeding, the horse hangs itself to complete the drained one of blood.
Later one loosen to skin it.
Compressed air under the skin is pumped to make the task easier.
The legs are extracted to him.
The hooves will become installment,...
...and the vegetal coal bones...
...become articles of cosmetic.
The delicate task of skinning with one razor to shave sharpened...
...she is not free of danger.
Skinning a horse, Ernest Bruyet sectioned the femoral artery.
The right leg had to be amputated.
This black horse killed Alfred Macquart,...
...possessor of the prestigious "Better Working" diploma of France.
Auguste Macquart, his grandfather,...
...was one of the founders, that packed meat at the beginning of the last century.
To the doors of Paris,...
...the “Channel of l'Ourcq” and the “Wheels of the fortune”.
“Bearing of Pantin”, the market the "Villette”.
A bridge connects the slaughter house with the market...
...for the transfer of cattle.
To the deafening roar of the pneumatic freight elevators,...
...the butchers and the climbers work...
...under the heavy vapor given off by the blood of the beasts.
Maurice Griselle, french boxing ex-champion.
Andre Brunier, one of the best ones using the wooden hammer in the Villette
When inserting the cane in the channel of the medular,...
...it perforates and it destroys the spinal marrow, suppressing therefore the reflections of the animal.
The oppression, completes the drained one of the blood,...
...most of which, gathers in containers.
The channels gather the rest.
This one is gutted while the freight elevator rises.
The fatty surpluses will be gathered by nuns.
Henri Fournel can divide an ox in the time that the clock gives 12:00.
In order to conserve the white calf meat, he beheads the animal to drain all the blood.
The dead animal still shakes, but they are only concerned involuntary.
The heads are marked to identify and to count the cattle.
This is neither a chapel in honor to Babtist San Juan protection patron of the butchers,...
...nor to its tender lamb.
It is the zone of auctions of the slaughter house.
The mother sheeps are guided by the "Traitor".
It knows the way, and its life will be pardoned.
The others follow obediently, bleating...
...like condemned men who still sing knowing that its song is useless.
In order to skin them, the sheep perforate themselves.
During the years, this difficult task can cause a cyst in the wrist.
"I will strike you, without rage and hatred, like a butcher",
...wrote Baudelaire.
Without rage, without hatred,...
...with the placidness of the assassins who whistle or sing while they crack throats,
...because they must gain the bread of every day...
...with the pays of difficult and often a dangerous profession.
The sea that we were present at to dance...
...throughout the radiating bays.
The silver-plated sparkles of the sea,
...reflections alternating in the rain.
The sea...
in the summery sky,
...the plush clouds, sheep,
...they seem like angels back in the height.
The sea,
...shepherd of infinite blue color,
...it observes...
...next to the lagoon, the high and humid rushes;
...it observes...
...the white birds; the rusted houses.
The sea...
The day comes to an end.
In the fold, the sheep, still altered, will remain sleeping in silence.
They will not listen to the closing of the doors of its prison,...
...nor the train from Villette to Paris,...
...that starts off after the dusk...
...in order to gather the following victims.
Subtitles by explosiveskull
It was 1945.
The war was over.
Slowly, painfully, life came back to the ruins of Europe.
The war was over, but there was no peace.
Despair crouched over the continent.
Hopelessness circled
Europe like a bird of prey.
Why?
What were the forces?
What were the issues in a war that turned nations into rubble heaps and populations into beggars.
The people wanted the answers.
They wanted to know what happened and why.
In the Palace of
Justice in Nuremberg, the people of the world came together, for there sat the international military tribunal to judge the chief
Nazi war criminals.
Justice Robert H. Jackson, the chief American prosecutor makes the opening statement for the prosecution.
The privilege of opening the first trial in history.
The privilege of opening the first trial in history for crimes against the peace of the world imposes a grave responsibility.
The wrongs, which we seek to condemn and punish have been so calculated, so malignant and so devastating that civilization cannot tolerate their being ignored, because it cannot survive their being repeated.
That four great nations, flushed with victory and stung with injury, stay the hand of vengeance and voluntarily submit their captive enemies to the judgment of the law is one of the most significant tributes that power has ever paid to reason.
This inquest represents the practical effort of four of the most mighty of nations with the support of 15 more to utilize international law to meet the greatest menace of our times, aggressive war.
The common sense of mankind demands that law shall not stop with the punishment of petty crimes by little people.
It must also reach men who possess themselves of great power and who make deliberate and concerted use of it to set in motion evils, which leave no home in the world untouched.
In the prisoner's dock sit 20 odd broken men, reproached by the humiliation of those they have led, almost as bitterly as by the desolation of those they have attacked.
Their personal capacity for evil is forever past.
Merely as individuals, their fate is of little consequence to the world.
What makes this inquest significant is that these prisoners represent sinister influences that will lurk in the world long after their bodies have returned to dust.
They are living symbols of the arrogance and cruelty of power, of racial hatreds, of terrorism and violence.
They are symbols of fierce nationalisms, and of militarism, of intrigue and war-making, which have embroiled Europe generation after generation, crushing its manhood, destroying its homes and impoverishing its lives.
They have so identified themselves with the philosophies they conceived and with the forces they directed that any tenderness to them is a victory and an encouragement to all the evils which are attached to their names.
What these men stand for we will patiently and temperately disclose.
We will give you undeniable proof of incredible events.
The catalog of crimes will omit nothing.
It may be that these men of troubled conscience do not regard a trial as a favor, but they do have a fair opportunity to defend themselves, a favor which they rarely extended to their fellow countrymen.
We will not ask you to convict these men on the testimony of their foes.
There is no count of the indictment that cannot be proved by books and records.
And we will show you the defendants' own films.
You will see their own conduct and hear their own voices, as they re-enact for you, from the screen, some of the events in the course of the conspiracy.
The acts of the defendants have bathed the world in blood.
And set civilization back a century.
They have subjected their European neighbors to every spoliation and depravation.
They have brought the German people to the lowest ebb of wretchedness.
They have stirred hatreds and incited domestic violence on every continent.
These are the things that stand in the dock, shoulder to shoulder with these prisoners.
The real complaining party at your bar is civilization.
The United
States of America present count one of the indictment; that all the defendants participated as organizers or accomplices in a common plan or conspiracy to commit crimes against peace, war crimes and crimes against humanity.
The aims of this conspiracy were open and notorious.
The aims of this conspiracy were open and notorious.
It was far different from any other conspiracy ever unfolded before a court of justice.
Its history is the history of the Nazi party, which grew from the brawling streets of Munich in the 20s.
And from the beginning, Adolf
Hitler and his followers were committed to the use of any means, whether or not they were legal or honorable.
Their aim was the highest degree of control over the German community.
Their intentions were blatantly put forth in Mein Kampf and the party program.
And they preached their favorite doctrine up and down the land.
They said that persons of a so-called German blood were a master race entitled to subjugate or even exterminate other races.
They said that the
German should be ruled under the Fuhrer Principle or leadership principle by which each sub-leader owed unconditional obedience to his superior and so on right up to Adolf Hitler.
They said that war was a noble and necessary activity of Germans.
And they said that the Nazi Party alone had the right to rule
Germany and the right to destroy the party's enemies.
Their rise to power was based on fraud, deceit, intimidation and coercion, culminating finally in terror and flame.
Into that flame went the
Democratic constitution of the Weimar Republic and the freedom of the German people.
For the fire set by the Nazis extended to the very Reichstag.
Hans Gisevius, a witness who formerly held a high position in the Berlin Police
Administration, tells of his investigation of the Reichstag fire.
To speak briefly and to state the facts.
First of all, we ascertain that quite generally,
Hitler had stated the wish for a large scale propaganda campaign.
Goebbels took on the job of making the necessary proposals and it was Goebbels who first thought of setting the
Reichstag on fire.
A group of 10 reliable
S.A. men was made ready and now Goering was informed about every detail of the plan.
It was expected from Goering and he gave his assurances that he would do so, that the police would be instructed, while still suffering from shock, to take up a false trail.
Using the Reichstag fire as a pretext for seizing power, the Nazi conspirators lost no time in tearing
Germany away from a policy of peace.
Late in 1933, they led their nation out of the Disarmament
Conference, quit the League of
Nations and embarked on a course of secret rearmament.
By 1934, the new armaments program, designed by defendants
Goering, Schacht and Funk, was going full blast.
German industry was again turning out the tools of war.
The plants hummed and one year later Goering could announce:
From the strong foundation of the National Socialist
Ideology today rises once again the German Armed Forces.
A few days later, General von Blomberg announced the new law for compulsory military service.
The law was signed by defendants Goering, Hess, Frank,
Frick, Schacht and Von Neurath.
The training began.
Finally, in the spring of 1936, the Nazis sent their new troops marching into the Rhineland.
Mein Fuhrer, on March 7th, 1936, soldiers of the army, which was created by order of the Fuhrer, crossed the sacred river of German history and occupied their former garrisons.
They pledged the Fuhrer, whatever decisions he may make, unbreakable faith and obedience and they vow to follow him and to prove their sincerity, by their never ending love for Germany.
The columns grew longer.
The sound of boots grew louder on the streets of Nuremberg.
But Hitler said:
The German people is not a people, which welcomes a war today, tomorrow or the day after tomorrow.
That is not in the character of the Germans.
He is by nature not only peaceful and peace loving, but above all conciliatory.
He wants to work.
In our country are millions of peasants, they want to till their fields.
They want to bring in their harvests.
There are millions of workers, they want to perform their work.
But the
Nazi conspirators, in the name of Lebensraum, continued to plot new aggressions against peace.
In November 1937, Hitler called a special meeting with defendants Goering,
Von Neurath and Raeder and Generals von
Blomberg and von Frick.
The meeting was secret but
Lieutenant Colonel Hossbach,
Hitler's personal adjutant, faithfully recorded
Hitler's words:
The German question can be solved only by way of force.
For the improvement of our military-political position, it must be our first aim, in every case of entanglement by war, to conquer
Czechoslovakia and Austria simultaneously.
The annexation of the two states to Germany, militarily and politically, would constitute a considerable relief.
This meeting set the stage for Nazi expansion and Act One came only three months later at Berchtesgaden where a defendant von Papen finally engineered a meeting between Schuschnigg, the Austrian Chancellor, and Hitler and defendants
Keitel and von Ribbentrop.
Guido Schmidt, who was
Austrian Foreign Minister at the time, also attended the meeting.
And now he takes the witness stand.
Did Hitler demand that Seyss-Inquart be made Minister of Security?
That was one of the demands on that program.
Where there also demands made with regard to currency exchange and customs?
There were demands of an economic nature of every kind.
Hitler told you that you had until February 15th to accept his terms, didn't he?
And he told you that if you didn't do so he would use force.
The ultimatum as Hitler stated it was that he intended, as early as February, to march into Austria and that, for the last time, he was prepared to postpone it.
Faced by these threats, the Austrians carried out all Hitler's demands.
But the Nazi conspirators weren't satisfied.
A month later when Schuschnigg announced a plebiscite on Austrian Independence,
Hitler and defendant Goering demanded the plebiscite be canceled.
Another ultimatum demanded
Schuschnigg resign within three hours.
Fearing invasion,
Schuschnigg resigned and finally defendant
Seyss-Inquart was appointed the new Chancellor of Austria.
That same day Goering in Berlin called Keppler of the
German Embassy in Vienna.
The conversation was transcribed.
Kepler spoke first:
Well, we represent the government now.
Yes, that's it, you're the government.
Listen carefully, the following telegram should be sent here from Seyss-Inquart.
Take the notes.
The provisional
Austrian Government sends to the German
Government the urgent request for support in its task to help prevent bloodshed.
For this purpose, it asks the German Government to send German troops as soon as possible.
Well, SA and SS are marching through the streets.
Everything has collapsed with the professional groups.
Seyss-Inquart is the only one who still has power in Austria.
Yes, there are troops who have crossed the border today.
The act was written joining Austria to Germany and signed by defendant
Seyss-Inquart, Goering,
Frick, von Ribbentrop and Hess.
Hitler, of course, had said:
Germany neither intends no wishes to interfere in the internal affairs of
Austria, to annex Austria or to conclude an Anschluss.
21st of May 1935, Adolf Hitler.
The curtain fell on Act One, but already the Nazi conspirators prepared for Act Two with this 1938 memorandum from
Hitler to his High Command.
It is my unalterable decision to smash
Czechoslovakia by military action in the near future.
It is the job of the political leaders to bring about the politically and militarily suitable moment.
Konrad Henlein was designated political leader.
The plan was labeled
Operation Green and defendant Jodl issued another memorandum reading:
Operation Green will be set in motion by means of an incident in Czechoslovakia which will give Germany provocation for military intervention.
The fixing of the exact time for this incident is of the utmost importance.
A few months later, Germany signed the Munich Pact with
England, France and Italy.
This pact involved the transfer of the Sudetenland to Germany.
The conspirators called it their last territorial demand.
But before the ink was dry, they were making other plans for Hitler's goal was the complete absorption of Czechoslovakia.
And now the Czech president Hacha was called to a meeting with Hitler and defendants Goering von Ribbentrop and Keitel.
They gave him the ultimatum.
Bohemia and Moravia would be incorporated into Germany immediately or Czechoslovakia would be invaded and Prague destroyed from the air.
Hacha was helpless.
Defendants von Ribbentrop and Frick signed the decree making Bohemia and Moravia a German Protectorate.
Speaking some months before about the Sudetenland, however, Hitler had said:
I have promised and repeated here that there will be no more territorial problems for Germany in Europe.
I will be no longer interested in the Czech State and I will guarantee it.
26 September 1938, Adolf Hitler.
Now, according to more of his adjutants' notes,
Hitler reviewed the Nazi plan of violence and treachery from 1934 to 39.
The notes read:
First rearmament.
In 1935 the introduction of compulsory military service.
After that militarization of the Rhineland.
One year later Austria came.
It brought about a considerable reinforcement of the Reich.
The next step was
Bohemia and Moravia, then followed the erection of the Protectorate and with that the basis for action against Poland was laid.
Basically, I did not organize the Armed Forces and order not to strike.
The decision to strike was always in me.
In the name of the United Kingdom of Great Britain and
Northern Ireland,
Sir Hartley Shawcross presents count two, crimes against peace charging that all the defendants participated in the planning and waging of wars of aggression, was in violation of international treaties, agreements and assurances.
The first step was the Rhineland and the next step was Austria.
The
Rhineland is occupied.
Austria and Czechoslovakia are seized by Germany and now the Nazi conspirators turned to the next problem a conquest of Poland.
Again, an adjutant, lieutenant-colonel Schmundt transcribed Hitler's words.
The solution of the problem demands courage.
It is impossible without invasion of foreign States or attacks on foreign property.
There's, therefore, no question of sparing Poland and we are left with the decision to attack Poland at the first suitable opportunity.
We cannot expect the repetition of the Czech affair.
There will be war.
Meanwhile, according to their well-established practice, the conspirators stirred up the Danzig issue to furnish frontier incidents which could justify an attack on Poland.
Then on 23 August, the Nazis signed their non-aggression pact with Russia.
There Hitler told his High Command:
Now, Poland is in the position in which I want her.
I am only afraid that at the last moment some Schweinehund will make a proposal for mediation.
Appeals were made twice by the Pope and by President Roosevelt.
Finally, Mr
Roosevelt asks an assurance be given him that the German armed forces will not attack and, above all, not invade the territory or positions of the following independent nations.
He then names as those coming into question:
Finland, Letland,
Litauen, Estland, Norway,
Sweden, Denmark,
Netherlands, Belgium,
Grossbritannien, Ireland,
Frank Reich, Portugal, Spanien, die Schweiz, Liechtenstein,
Luxembourg, Poland.
On 1 September
1939, the Nazis sent the Wehrmacht smashing into
Poland and into a new world war, for France and England, faithful to their mutual assistance pact with Poland, immediately declared war on Germany.
The Luftwaffe opened mass attacks on Polish towns and cities.
And Hitler, according to
Schmundt's notes, said:
Destruction of
Poland in the foreground.
I shall give a propagandist cause for starting the war, never mind whether it be plausible or not.
Have no pity.
Take a brutal attitude.
But as usual, before the attack on Poland,
Hitler told the world:
During the troubled months of the past year, the friendship between
Poland and Germany has been one of the reassuring factors in the political life of Europe.
30th of January
1939, Adolf Hitler.
The path of destruction started in Poland but soon it led north and south across all Europe and each new aggression was based on Hitler's principle that, in war, victory not right is what matters.
Non-aggression treaty, it is firmly resolved to maintain peace between Denmark and Germany in all circumstances.
31st of May in 1939, Ribbentrop.
But on 9 April 1940,
German troops invaded Denmark.
The German Reich government is determined, in view of the friendly relations which exists between Norway and Germany, under no circumstances to prejudice the inviolability and integrity of the Norwegian state.
2nd of September 1939,
Das Deutsche Reich.
But on 9 April 1940,
German troops invaded Norway.
I assure the governments of Belgium, Holland and Luxembourg, that Germany will not violate their neutrality.
6th of October
1939, Adolf Hitler.
But on May 10th 1940,
German troops invaded Belgium,
Holland and Luxembourg.
The firmly established reliable relationship of Germany to Yugoslavia will represent an element of calm on a wrecked continent.
This peace is the goal of all who are disposed to perform really constructive work.
1st of June 1939, Adolf Hitler.
But on 6 April 1941,
German troops invaded Yugoslavia.
These criminal methods of the Nazi conspirators brought them early success and, by 1941, they had most of Europe under their heel.
Now, an evil ambition for power and more power drove them on.
But two of the world's mightiest nations, the United States and Soviet
Russia, remained to block the Nazi drive for world supremacy.
They had to be dealt with firmly, immediately, and now Germany asked for cooperation from her full partner in aggression to the east and from her junior partner to the south.
In Berlin, they drew up the
Axis Pact - the blueprint of the new order and parceled out the continents of the world for
Axis domination.
Italy was to get the
Mediterranean sphere.
Japan was to get the
Orient and, to Germany, would go the rest of the world.
In June 1941, in violation of their non-aggression pact, the Nazis sent the Wehrmacht deep into Soviet territory, according to military plans long made.
As usual, there was no declaration of war.
Hitler had said, today
Germany, tomorrow the world and this was tomorrow.
Planned warfare in the east, air warfare in the West, for now defendant Goering's
Luftwaffe was hurled with full force against the people and cities of Britain.
Hitler after all had told the Reichstag:
I will blot out their city.
And then on 7 December
1941, the Japanese, keeping their end of an infamous bargain, struck at the United States, also without declaration of war.
Japanese bombs rained on Pearl Harbor spreading war finally to the Pacific.
The new order was on the march.
World War II flamed around the globe.
In the name of the Union of Soviet Socialist
Republics, General Rudenko presents counts three and four charging that all the defendants committed war crimes in Germany and in all those countries occupied by Germany.
The Nazi conspirators committed crimes against enemy armies, against prisoners of war, against the civilians of occupied lands.
They believed in the barbaric doctrine of total war and considered themselves freed from the restraints of international law or the established customs of war.
Their ruthless policies were ordered in directives like this one from
General Reinecke of the Wehrmacht High Command.
The Bolsheviks soldier has lost all claim to treatment as an honorable opponent.
Active or passive resistance must be broken immediately by force of arms.
Prisoners of war attempting to escape are to be fired on without previous challenge.
No warning shot must be fired.
More proof of this savage Nazi policy comes from the affidavit of Kurt Lindow, former Gestapo officer.
There existed in the prisoner of war camps on the Eastern Front, small screening teams headed by lower ranking members of the Gestapo.
It was the duty of these teams to segregate the prisoners of war who were candidates for execution, according to the orders that had been given and to report them to the office of the Gestapo.
And a letter from defendant Rosenberg to defendant Keitel in
1942 stated clearly:
A large part of the Soviet prisoners of war has starved or died because of the hazards of the weather.
In many cases, prisoners of war could no longer keep up in the march because of hunger and exhaustion.
In numerous camps, no shelter for the prisoners was provided at all.
Even tools were not made available to dig holes or caves.
Yet when some objected that this treatment violated the Geneva
Convention, defendant Keitel answered with this memorandum:
We are concerned with the destruction of an ideology, therefore, I approve and back the measures.
This is proved by the testimony of General Lahousen who worked under Admiral Canaris in the Abwehr.
General Lahousen attended conferences where crimes against whole populations were plotted in advance by the
Nazi conspirators.
Will you please explain exactly what took place at this conference in the Fuhrer's train.
First of all,
Canaris had a short talk with von Ribbentrop, particularly as regards the Polish region.
Secondly, Canaris spoke vehemently against the measures that he, Canaris, had found out about to wit the projected shooting and extermination measures that were being directed against the Polish intelligentsia, nobility and clergy as well as all elements that could be regarded as embodiments of the national resistance movement.
Canaris said at the time, more or less verbatim, that the world will, at some time, make the Armed Forces under whose eye as these events have occurred also responsible for these events.
Defendant Frank,
Nazi governor of Poland, was another of the conspirators guilty of directing mass murder.
In his diary, he speaks of:
Taking advantage of the focus of attention on the Western Front by carrying out wholesale liquidation of thousands of Poles.
These atrocities were not restricted to the east.
Here is the proof in the village of Oradour-sur-Glane, France.
Here is the proof in the town of Bande, Belgium.
Here is the proof in the
San Callisto Caves, Italy where 350 hostages were carefully listed and systematically murdered.
And here is Lidice in Czechoslovakia.
In blind retaliation for the assassination of SS Man Heydrich, the Nazis murdered all Lidice's men and sent their women and children into slavery in Germany.
But this was not enough.
Boys of the Arbeiten were moved into the ruins of Lidice and ordered to level the village to the ground.
Lidice was to be the Nazi's example to all occupied peoples.
But more terrible still were the concentration camps which, from the beginning, had been the conspirators' chief weapon against opposition of every kind.
German anti-Nazis were the first victims, but with the war their numbers swelled to include citizens of all the nations of Europe.
Their fate is described by witness Rudolf Hoess.
I commanded Auschwitz until the 1st of December
1943 and estimate that at least two and a half million victims were executed and exterminated there by gassing and burning.
At least another half million succumbed to starvation and disease, making a total dead of about three million.
Included among the executed and burned were approximately 20,000
Russian prisoners of war, who were delivered at Auschwitz in Wehrmacht transports.
The remainder of the total number included about a hundred thousand German Jews and great numbers of citizens from Holland,
France, Belgium,
Poland, Hungary,
Czechoslovakia, Greece and other countries.
Medical experiments too were standard procedure at many concentration camps.
These included lowering the body temperature to 28 degrees centigrade, high-altitude tests and pressure chambers, experiments with poison bullets and contagious diseases and even sterilization experiments.
- This was genocide
- the premeditated destruction of entire peoples.
Genocide, the direct result of the Nazi's claim that they had the right to destroy the party's opposition.
Tomorrow the world, dead or alive.
In the name of the French Republic,
Monsieur de Menthon closes count three and four the final charges of the indictment.
All the defendants committed crimes against humanity including the murder and persecution of all people opposed to the
Nazi Party and the enslavement, exploitation and deportation of civilian populations.
The slave labor policy was the responsibility of defendant Sauckel who admitted in 1944:
Out of the five million workers who arrived in Germany not even 200,000 came voluntarily.
Forced labor often meant brutal and degrading treatment.
For Sauckel himself suggested:
All the men must be fed, sheltered, and treated in such a way as to exploit them to the highest possible extent at the lowest possible expenditure.
And defendant Bormann added:
The slaves are to work for us.
Insofar as we do not need them, they may die.
Slavery was only one aspect of Nazi exploitation.
Defendant Goering, in a talk with German occupation authorities in 1942, discussed another - plunder.
God knows you are not sent out to work for the welfare of the people in your charge but to get the utmost out of them so that the German people can live.
This everlasting concern about foreign people must cease now once and forever.
I have here before me reports on what you are expected to deliver.
It makes no difference to me in this case if you say that your people will starve.
But Nazi crimes against humanity were not limited to foreign peoples.
Defendant Frick, as
Minister of Interior, directed a program aimed at aged, insane or incurable Germans - the so-called useless eaters.
Thousands were committed to special institutions.
Few ever returned.
Evidence proves they were murdered because they were useless to the plans of the
Nazi conspirators.
But perhaps the greatest crime against humanity the Nazis committed against the Jews.
A campaign of hate and murder that goes to the heart of the Nazi movement.
German citizens are only those of German or related blood willing to serve the German Reich and people.
Marriages between Jews and citizens of German or related blood are prohibited.
SS
Brigadier General Stroop, in charge of the
Warsaw Ghetto in 1943, had learned his
Nazi lessons well.
In a secret report, he said:
The
Reichsfuehrer SS ordered on the 23rd of April
1943, the cleaning out of the ghetto with utter ruthlessness.
I, therefore, decided to destroy and burn down the entire ghetto.
Jews frequently left the hideouts, but occasionally remained in the burning buildings and jumped out the windows only when the heat became unbearable.
Life in the sewers was not pleasant after the first week.
Tear gas bombs were thrown into the manholes and the Jews were driven out and captured.
Countless numbers of Jews were liquidated in sewers and bunkers through blasting.
The longer the resistance continued, the tougher became the members of the Waffen SS, police and Wehrmacht who always discharged their duties in an exemplary manner.
Little by little, the Nazis were reaching what they called
The Final Solution the total extermination of the Jews of Europe.
Hess described the process well:
We had two SS doctors on duty at Auschwitz to examine the incoming transports of prisoners.
The prisoners would be marched past one of the doctors who would make spot decisions as they walked by.
Those who were fit for work were sent into the camp.
Others were sent immediately to the extermination plant.
Children of tender years were invariably exterminated since, by reasons of their youth, they were unable to work.
We endeavored to fool them into thinking they were to go through a delousing process.
It took from three to 15 minutes to kill the people in the death chamber depending upon climatic conditions.
We knew when the people were dead because their screaming stopped.
We usually waited about one half-hour before we opened the doors and removed the bodies.
After the bodies were removed, our special commandos took off the rings and extracted the gold from the teeth of the corpses.
Much of this loot was then transferred to secret vaults of the
Reichsbank at Frankfurt am Main the Reichsbank of defendant Funk.
Labor Chief Robert Ley knew that six million Jews died in the Nazi's
Final Solution.
In his will, he said:
In anti-Semitism, we violated a basic commandment of God's creation.
It is hard to admit mistakes but the whole existence of our people is in question.
We must have the courage to rid ourselves of anti-Semitism.
God has taught me that in my cell in Nuremberg.
And defendant Frank himself said before this Court:
We have fought against Jewry and we have allowed ourselves to make utterances which are terrible.
A thousand years will pass and this guilt of Germany will still not be erased.
The prosecution rests.
The defense begins.
They call 61 witnesses and introduce 38,000 affidavits on the defendants behalf.
They submit 136,000 more affidavits on behalf of the S.S.,
10,000 on behalf of the S.A.,
7,000 on behalf of the S.D.,
3,000 on behalf of the
General Staff and the O.K.W.,
2,000 on behalf of the Gestapo.
These attorneys were personally selected by the defendants.
Many are well known
German lawyers and each now rises to plead acquittal for his crimes.
Some make blanket denials of all guilt.
Some of the defendants had, without doubt, a great influence in those spheres which did not interest, Hitler.
They had no part whatsoever in the great decisions concerning war and peace, armistice and peace offers, et cetera.
Other attorneys lead their clients through a carefully prepared defense.
Here Streicher is examined.
I now continue.
It has also been stated by the prosecution that Himmler and Kaltenbrunner would have had no one to carry out their orders to kill if you hadn't made that propaganda and if you hadn't conducted the education of the German people in that sense.
I don't believe that those who had been given the order by the Fuehrer to carry out the killings or to pass an order to kill, that those people would have been made to do this by my periodical.
Hitler's book, Mein Kampf, existed and the contents of that book were the authority, the cause.
Next comes Kaultenbrunner.
You are accused of establishing Mauthausen, of inspecting and visiting this camp regularly.
The witness Herriger testified having seen you in this camp and further testified having seen you at the inspection of gas chambers and while these gas chambers were in operation.
The testimony is wrong.
Every concentration camp in the Reich, of which I know anything, was established by Himmler through Paul.
Later the prosecution is allowed to cross-examine the defendants.
Rosenberg is questioned.
Did your ministry force people to leave their homes, to go to Germany to work for the German state?
It is true that force was used and it is not denied that some terrible encroachments occurred.
Now
Raeder takes the stand.
On the 23rd of
May, in the Reich Chancellery,
Hitler said that he would give you an indoctrination on the political situation and he said, we are left with the decision to attack Poland at the first opportunity.
Did you still think that he had no aggressive intentions?
I believed that for a long time.
Just as General Jodl said, after Hitler had solved the Czech problem purely politically, it was to be hoped he would also be able to solve the Polish question without bloodshed.
I believed that until the last moment, until the 22nd of August.
Keitel is cross-examined.
Yesterday your counsel showed you this order dated
16th September, 1941.
It said that it is necessary to take immediate, cruel measures and that human life in the East is absolutely worthless.
You remember the basic idea of the order, that human life costs absolutely nothing?
Please answer the question.
You signed this order with this statement?
Ja!
Next Jodl.
Do you remember any other reason for such great mortality among Soviet prisoners of war?
I didn't know the reasons for this mass murder, but they seemed to be completely wrong, that I do know.
Now von Ribbentrop.
Are you telling the tribunal, on your oath, that you knew nothing about the effect of military pressure on Austria?
I wish to stress again that I knew nothing about military measures, and that if I had known something,
I wouldn't see any reason not to say so.
But it is a fact that during the days before and after the
Hitler-Schuschnigg meeting,
I was so busy taking over the foreign office that I could give only slight attention to the Austrian problem.
Then Goering is cross-examined.
At the end of the meeting you used the following words didn't you?
German Jewry must, as a penalty, forfeit one-billion marks, then the pigs won't commit any more crimes.
Do you still say that neither Hitler nor you knew of the policy to exterminate the Jews?
I already have said that not even approximately did I know to what degree this thing took place.
You did not know to what degree, but you knew there was a policy that aimed at the liquidation of the Jews.
No, not liquidation of the Jews.
I only knew that certain, perpetrations had taken place.
Speer takes the stand.
You were present on April 23, 1945, when Hitler received the telegram from Goering suggesting that he take over power.
What did Hitler say on that occasion?
Hitler was most excited about the contents of the telegram and he expressed himself in a very clear manner about Goering.
He said that he knew for some time that Goering had failed, that he was corrupt, that he was a drug addict.
It was typical of
Hitler's attitude toward the entire problem, however, that he followed the statement up by saying, but he can, nevertheless, negotiate the capitulation.
He stated in an offhand manner, it doesn't really matter who does it.
His disregard for the German nation was expressed in the way he said this.
After months of examination and cross-examination, several defendants make final statements to the tribunal.
Frank is first.
I myself, speaking from the very depth of my sentiments and from the experience of five months of this trial, want to say this.
Now, that I have gained the last insight into all that which has been committed in the way of dreadful atrocities, I feel a terrible guilt within me.
Funk declares.
When these measures of terror and violence against Jews were put up to me,
I suffered a nervous break down because at the moment it came to my mind with full clearness that, from here on, the catastrophe took its course all the way up to the terrible and atrocious things about which we have heard and about which I knew only in part at the time of my imprisonment.
I felt ashamed and guilty at that moment and I feel the same way today, but it's too late.
Now
Schirach speaks.
It is my guilt that I educated German youth for a man who committed murders million fold.
Schacht is next.
Everything he promised to the German people, and, thereby to himself, he did not afterwards keep.
He promised equal rights for all citizens and, without regard to their capabilities, his adherents got privileges before all other citizens.
He promised to fight against political lies and, together with his Minister
Goebbels and by himself, he never did anything but disseminate political lies and political fraud.
He released criminals and put them into his service.
He did everything in the way of not keeping his promises.
He deceived the world, Germany and me.
Speer once more.
The tremendous danger contained in this totalitarian system only became really clear the moment we were approaching the end.
Everything that has happened during this trial, everything you have seen in the way of orders which were carried out without any hesitation did, after all, turn out to be mistaken.
That is why this trial must contribute to the prevention of such distorted wars in the future and to the establishment of principles for human cooperation.
And Keitel again.
I erred, I was not able to prevent what should have been prevented.
That is my guilt.
I can only wish that out of a clear recognition of the causes of the disastrous methods and the terrible consequences of this war, there will arise for the
German people a new hope for a better future in the community of nations.
Now Frank.
We call on the German people, whose representatives we were, to abandon this way, which was doomed to failure in the will and justice of God and which is doomed for everyone who may try to follow it anywhere in the world.
The last defendant to speak is Fritzsche.
You of the prosecution did not expect anything good from
Hitler and you are amazed about the extent of what really happened.
But then try to understand the indignation of those who did expect something good from Hitler and were betrayed.
I am one of these betrayed.
Finally, both defense and prosecution sum up their arguments for the tribunal.
An aggressor can be branded only by the world's conscience.
That supreme organ of humanity must have not only real, but also moral authority.
Its impartial judgment must be looked upon with general confidence.
It must stand above the contesting parties.
In the name of the United States of America,
Justice Jackson delivers his summation.
According to the testimony of each defendant, these men saw no evil, spoke none, and none was uttered in their presence.
If we combine only the stories from the front bench, this is the ridiculous, composite picture of Hitler's government that emerges.
It was composed of a number two man who never suspected the
Jewish extermination program, although he signed over a score of anti-Semitic decrees.
A number three man who is merely an innocent middle-man transmitting Hitler's orders without even reading them like a postman or a delivery boy.
A Foreign Minister who knew little of foreign affairs and nothing of foreign policy.
A field marshal who issued orders to the armed forces but had no idea of the results they would have in practice.
A Security Chief who was of the impression that the policing functions of his Gestapo and S.D. were somewhat on the lines of directing traffic.
A party philosopher who had no idea of the violence which his philosophy was inciting in the 20th century.
A Governor-General of Poland who reigned, but did not rule.
A Gauleiter of Franconia whose occupation was to pour forth filthy writings about the Jews, but who had no idea that anybody would read them.
A Minister of the
Interior who knew not even what went on in his own office, much less the interior of his own department, and nothing at all about the interior of Germany.
A Reichsbank president who is totally ignorant of what went in and out of the vaults of his bank.
To say of these men that they are not guilty, it would be as true to say there has been no war, there are no slain, there has been no crime.
In the name of the United Kingdom of Great Britain and
Northern Ireland,
Sir Hartley Shawcross delivers his summation.
This trial must form a milestone in the history of civilization.
Not only marking that right shall in the end triumph over evil, but also that ordinary people of the world and, I make no distinction here between friend and foe, are now determined that the individual must transcend the state.
The state and law are made for man, that through them he may achieve a fuller life, a higher purpose and a greater dignity.
In the name of the Union of Soviet Socialist
Republics, General Rudenko delivers his summation.
And when we ask have the charges against the defendants been proved before the court, have the defendants been convicted of their guilt?
There is only one answer.
Their crimes have been proved.
Neither the statements of the defendants nor the arguments of the defense were able to refute our grave accusations.
It has been impossible to cast doubt on events which actually took place.
The truth cannot be challenged.
That is the real meaning of this trial.
That is the lasting result of our long and strenuous effort.
In the name of the French Republic,
Monsieur de Ribes delivers his summation.
When this international trial is closed and the principal war criminals sentenced, we shall go back to our own countries.
The fate of these men now lies entirely with your conscience.
This is beyond our competence.
Our task is finished.
Now it is for you, in the silence of your deliberations, to listen to innocent blood crying for justice.
Lord Justice
Lawrence, Great Britain.
Mr Frances Biddle,
United States.
Monsieur de Vabres, France.
And Major General
Nikitchenko, U.S.S.R. and their alternates prepare the verdict.
It will be based on the opinion of the majority.
On October 1st,
1946, the verdict is delivered by Lord Justice Lawrence, president of the tribunal.
Of the organizations, the S.S., S.D.,
Gestapo and leadership corps are found guilty.
The high command, S.A. and
Reich cabinet, not guilty.
As for the individual,
Wilhelm Hermann Goering: guilty of conspiracy, crimes against peace, war crimes and crimes against humanity.
Death by hanging.
Rudolph Hess: guilty of conspiracy and crimes against peace.
Life imprisonment.
Joachim Von Ribbentrop: guilty of conspiracy, crimes against peace, war crimes and crimes against humanity.
Death by hanging.
Wilhelm Keitel: guilty of conspiracy, crimes against peace, war crimes and crimes against humanity.
Death by hanging.
Ernst Kaltenbrunner: guilty of war crimes and crimes against humanity.
Death by hanging.
Alfred Rosenberg: guilty of conspiracy, crimes against peace, war crimes and crimes against humanity.
Death by hanging.
Hans Frank: guilty of war crimes and crimes against humanity.
Death by hanging.
Wilhelm Frick: guilty of crimes against peace, war crimes and crimes against humanity.
Death by hanging.
Julius Streicher: guilty of crimes against humanity.
Death by hanging.
Walter Funk: guilty of crimes against peace, war crimes and crimes against humanity.
Life imprisonment.
Hjalmar Schacht: not guilty on this indictment.
Released.
Karl Doenitz: guilty of crimes against peace and war crimes.
10 years imprisonment.
Erich Raeder: guilty of conspiracy, crimes against peace and war crimes.
Life imprisonment.
Baldur von Schirach: guilty of crimes against humanity.
20 years imprisonment.
Fritz Sauckel: guilty of war crimes and crimes against humanity.
Death by hanging.
Alfred Jodl: guilty of conspiracy, crimes against peace, war crimes and crimes against humanity.
Death by hanging.
Franz von Papen: not guilty on this indictment.
Released.
Albert Speer: guilty of war crimes and crimes against humanity.
20 years imprisonment.
Constantin von Neurath: guilty of conspiracy, crimes against peace, war crimes and crimes against humanity.
15 years imprisonment.
Artur Seyss-Inquart: guilty of crimes against peace, war crimes and crimes against humanity.
Death by hanging.
Hanz Fritzsche: not guilty on this indictment.
Released.
Martin Bormann, tried in absentia: guilty of war crimes and crimes against humanity.
Death by hanging.
The trial is over.
Seven begin their prison sentences.
Goering chooses to die by his own hand.
The other 10 wait for the gallows.
In Nuremberg, the people of the world found out and why.
But Nuremberg is more than an answer to a question.
As Justice Jackson said, this trial is part of the great effort to make the peace more secure.
It constitutes juridical action of a kind to ensure that those who start a war will pay for it personally.
Nuremberg stands as a warning to all those who plan and wage aggressive war.
Subtitles by explosiveskull
WHY WE FIGHT
A series of seven information films
WAR COMES TO AMERICA
Information Film #7
Produced by the:
WAR DEPARTMENT ARMY PICTORIAL SERVICE
For: INFORMATION AND EDUCATION DIVISION
Music by: The Army Air Force Orchestra
I pledge alliance to the flag, of
The United States of America,
...and to the Republic for which it stands one nation under God...
...indivisible with justice and liberty for all...
...in the jungles of New Guinea,
...on the barren shores of the Aleutians...
...in the tropic heat of the Pacific Islands,
...in the sub-zero cold over the skies of Germany,
...in Burma and Iceland,
...the Philippines and Iran,
...France,
...in China and Italy,
Americans, fighting.
Fighting over an area extending seven-eights of the way around the world.
Men from the green hills of New England,
...the sun-baked plains of the Middle West, the cotton fields of the South,
...the close-packed street of Manattan,
Chicago...
...the teaming factories of Detroit,
Los Angeles...
...the endless stretching distances of the Southwest...
...men from the hills and from the plains, men from the villages and the cities...
...Bookkeepers, soda jerks, mechanics,
...college student, rich man, poor man,
...beggar man, thief, doctor, lawyer, merchant, chief, now veteran fighting men.
Yet two years ago, many had never fired a gun,
Seen the ocean, or been of the ground.
Americans. Fighting for their country while half a world away from it.
Fighting for their country and more than their country.
Fighting for an idea.
An idea bigger than the country.
Without the idea, the country might only have remained a willingness.
Without the country, the idea might have remained only a dream.
Over this ocean,
1607, Jamestown...
1620, Plymouth Rock...
Here was America.
The sea, the sky, the virgin continent.
We came in search of freedom, facing
Unknown dangers rather than bend...
...the knew of bow to tyranny.
Out of the native oak and pine, we built a house, a church, a watchtower.
We cleared a field and there grew up a colony of free citizens.
We carved new states out of the green wilderness.
Virginia, Massachusetts,
Rhode Island, Carolina.
Then came the first test in the defense of that liberty.
1775, Lexington
Our leader spoke our deepest needs.
Colonists are by the law of nature free-born, as indeed all men are!"- James Otis
It is the right of the people to alter or abolish and to institute new government."- Thomas Jefferson
These are the times that try mers souls."
- Thomas Paine
...but as for me, give me liberty or give me death."- Patrick Henry
In the midst of battle it happened.
The idea grew. The idea took form.
Something new was expressed by men.
A new and revolutionary doctrine.
The greatest created force in human relations.
All men are created equal."
All men are entitled to the blessings life, liberty and the pursuit of happiness."
That's the goal we had set for ourselves.
If it meant hanging, victory meant a world in which Americans rule themselves.
1777, Valley Forge
We fought and froze, suffered and died.
For what? For the future freedom of all Americans.
A few of us doubted and despaired, most of us prayed and endured it all.
1781, Yorktown
Now we were a free-independent nation...
...the new idea had won its first test.
Now to pass it on to future Americans.
The Constitution. The sacred charter of
"We the people..."
The blood and sweat of "We the people..."
The life, liberty, and happiness of
"We the people..."
The people were to rule. Not some of the people,
Not the best people or the worst,
...not the rich people or the poor, but "We the people..."
All the people.
Proclaim liberty throughout all the land, unto all the inabitants thereof"
In this brotherhood America was born.
One nation, indivisible, with liberty and justice for all.
It began as 13 states along the Atlantic seaboard.
We pushed along the Allegiances, the Ohio River,
...the Mississippi, the last far range of the distant Rockies.
We carried freedom with us.
No aristocratic classes here.
No King, no Nobel, or Prince.
No State Church, no courts, no parasites.
No divine right of man to rule man.
Here humanity was making a clean fresh start from scratch.
Behind we left new states. Chips of the old block, woven together by freedom.
Until finally we were one nation.
A land of hope and opportunity that had risen out of a skeptical world.
A light was shining.
Freedom's light.
From every country and every climb, men saw that light and tuned their faces towards it."
Give me your tired, your poor, your huddled masses yearning to breathe free...
...the wretched refuge of your teeming shore.
Send these, the homeless, tempest-toots to me.
I lift my lamp beside the golden door"
As stranger to one another we came, and built a country.
And the country built us into Americans.
The sweat of man from all nations, was poured out to build a new.
The sweat of our first Shepard, the English, the Scots,
...the Dutch, building the workshop of New England.
And the Italian in the sulfur mines of Louisiana.
Of the Frenchmen and the Swiss in the vineyards of California and New York state.
Of the Dane, the Norwegian, the Swede.
Seeding the good earth to make the mid-west bloom with grain.
Of the Pole and the Welsh.
Of the Negro harvesting cotton in the hot southern sun.
Of the Spaniard, the first to roam the great southwest...
...of the Mexican in the oil fields of Texas.
And on the ranches of New Mexico.
Of the Greek and the Portuguese harvesting the crop the ocean yielded.
Of the German with his technical skills.
Of the Hungarian and the Russian.
Of the Irish, the Slav and the Chinese working side by side.
The sweat of Americans, and a great nation was built.
Yes, the sweat of all nations built
America and the blood.
For the blood of Americans has been freely shed.
Five times in our history, have we withstood
The challenge to the idea that made our nation.
The idea for all men of life, liberty and the pursuit happiness.
The idea that made us, the people we are.
Let's take a look at ourselves, before we went into this war.
Well, first of all, we're a working people, on the land, at a workbench, at a desk.
And we're an inventive people.
The lightening rod,
...the cotton gin, the telegraph,
...the blessed anaesthesia of ether,
...the rotary printing press, the telephone,
...electric welding, the incandescent lamp,
...submarine, steam turbine, the motor driven airplane, the x-ray tube, the gyroscope compass, the sewing machine,
...and television. All these, and countless more bear witness to our invent ness.
And this intentness and enterprise, plus our hard-won democratic ideals for the greatest good for the greatest number,
...created for the average man the highest standard of living in the world.
32 and a half million registered automobiles,
Two-thirds of all the automobiles there are in the world.
We demand the highest standards in sanitation,
...purity of food, medical care.
Our hospitals are marvels for the world to copy.
We want the best for the average man, woman and child.
Particularly child. We have reduced the hazard of being born,
From then on we protect, foster and generally spoil the majority of our children.
But it doesn't seem to hurt them much.
They go to school,
...all kinds of schools.
To kindergarten,
...public schools, private schools, trade schools,
...high schools, to 25,000 high schools,
...and to college.
In the last war, 20% of all the men in the armed forces had been to high school or college.
In this war, 63%.
We're a great two-weeks vacation people.
We hunt and we fish, up north and down south,
...back east, out west. When the season opens, we hunt and fish.
We're a sports-loving people.
And we're probably the travel ingest nation in all history...
...we love to go places.
We have the cars, we have the roads, we have the scenery.
We don't need passports, but sometimes we need alibis.
We sleep by the road, we eat by the road.
The foreigner is enchanted and amazed at what we like to put on our stomach's.
And we're a great joining people, we join clubs.
Fraternities, unions, federations.
Shove a blank at us, we'll sign up.
Radios, we have on in the living room,
...the dining room,
...the bedroom,
...the bathroom, in our cars,
...in our hands and up our sleeves.
Music. We couldn't be without it.
The Press? Yes, it's the biggest.
But most important, it's the freest on earth.
Over 12,000 newspapers, with all shades of opinions.
Books on ever-conceivable subject.
And more than 6000 different magazines.
Not counting the comics.
Churches?
We have every denomination on earth.
60 million of us, regularly attend.
And no one dares tell us, which one to go to.
We elect our own neighbors to govern us.
We believe in individual enterprise and opportunities, for men and women alike.
We make mistakes, we see the results.
We correct the mistakes.
We skyrocket into false prosperities,
...and then plummet down into false needless depressions.
But in spite of everything, we never lose our faith in the future.
We believe in the future, we build for the future.
Yes, we build for the future and the future always catches up with us.
Before we're done building, we've developed something new, and have to start rebuilding.
That's roughly the kind of people we are.
Boasting, easy-going, sentimental, but underneath,
...passionately dedicated to the ideals our forefathers passed on to us.
The liberty and dignity of man.
We've made great material progress, but
Spiritually we're still in the frontier days.
Yet deep down in us, there is a yearning for peace and good-will toward men.
Somehow we feel, that if men thru their minds towards the fields of peace,
...as they have towards the fields of transportation,
...communication or aviation,
...wars would soon be old-fashioned as the horse and buggy days.
We hate war. We know that in war, it is the common man who does the paying.
The suffering, the dying. We bend over backwards to avoid it.
But let our freedoms be endanger, and we'll pay and suffer and fight to the last man.
That is the American. That is the way of living, For which we fight today.
Why?
Is that fight necessary?
Did we want war?
In 1917, before most of you fighting men were born, our fathers fought the first World War to make the world safe for democracies, for the common man.
They fought a good fight and won it.
There was to be no more war in their time, and their childrers time.
Faithful to our treaty obligations, we destroyed much of our naval tonnage.
Our army went on a reducing diet, until it became little more than a skeleton.
For us, war was to be outlawed.
For us, Europe was far away.
And as for Asia, well that was really out of this world.
Where everything looked like it was torn from the National Geographic.
Where everything looked like it was torn from the National Geographic.
Yet in this remote spot in Asia, in 1931,
...while most of you were playing ball in the sand lots,
...this war started.
Without warning, Japan invaded Manchuria.
Once again, men who where peaceful, became slaves of the men who where violent.
In Washington D.C. Our Secretary of State, made a most vigorous protest.
The American Government, does not intend to recognize any situation
...treaty or agreement, which may be brought about by means of aggression.
But we the people, hadrt much time to think about Manchuria,
...we were wrestling with the worst depression in our history.
Some of us were out of jobs.
Some of us stood in bread lines.
Some of us suffered homemade aggression.
Some of us were choked with dust.
Some of us had no place to go.
Two years later, in 1933, while most of you
Were graduating from High School,
...we read that a funny little man called Hitler, had come into power in Germany.
We heard that a thing called the Nazi Party had taken over.
Today we rule Germany, tomorrow, the world!"
Today we rule Germany, tomorrow, the world!"
What kind of talk was that?
It must only be hot air.
In 1935, about the time you had your first date,
We read that strutting Mussolini had attacked far of Ethiopia.
The disease seemed to be spreading, so Congress assembled, to insulate us against the growing friction of war.
"We want no war. We'll have no war, say in defense of our own people for our own honor."
Toward this end, our chosen representatives
Passed the Neutrality Act.
No nation at war, could buy manufactured arms or munitions from the United States.
In 1936, when you were running around in jalopies,
...we were disturbed by news from Spain.
In our news reels we saw German and
Italian air forces and armies...
...fighting in Spain and wondered what they were doing there.
For the first time we saw great cities squashed flat.
Civilians bombed and killed.
In November of 1936, the American
Institute of Public Opinion,
...known as the gallop poll,
...asked a representative of a cross-section of the American people,
If another war develops in Europe,
...should America take part again?"
NO! 95%
We the people had spoken. Nineteen out of twenty had said, "Include us out!"
...to further insulate ourselves, we added a cash and carry amendment to the Neutrality Act.
Not only wouldn't we sell munitions, we wouldn't sell anything at all.
Not even a spool of thread, unless warring powers sent their own ships and paid cash on the line.
In 1937 the Press services received a flash from Asia...
...launch all out China war... intensive.
Yes, the Japs were turning Asia into a slaughterhouse.
But for us, Asia was still far away.
In September of 1937, the gallop poll asked us,
In the present fight between Japs and China, are your...
...sympathies with either side?"
With China 43%, with Japan 2%
Undecided 55%.
We hadrt made up our minds about China.
Our Neutrality Act, barred sales of armaments only to nations at war.
The Japanese had not declared war, so we went right on selling scrap iron and gasoline to Japan.
In March of 1938, Hitler had not declared war either.
But his goose-stepping army suddenly smashed in and occupied all the soil of Austria.
Six months later, Hitler and his stooge met the anxious democracy at Munich.
Hitler promised peace in our time, if Britain
And France would give him that part of
Czechoslovakia know as the Sudetenland.
Britain and France gave him that part of
Czechoslovakia hoping...
...to avert war.
Now we had his word. Peace in our time.
At home we began to hear strange headlines.
Extra! Extra! F.B.I. Captures Nazi spy ring!
We sat in our theatres unbelieving, as motion pictures exposed Nazi espionage in America.
Dear Gentlemen, we know that if America is to be free,
...we must destroy the chain that ties the whole misery...
...of American politics together. And that is the United States Constitution.
Could these things really be?
Yes these subversive acts, were happening in real life, everyday.
German-American bands organized for the purpose of destroying us,
...marched under our very noses.
I pledge undivided allegiance to the flag of The United States of America.
As a republic for which it stand, under one nation indivisible, with liberty and justice for all.
In our Press we read the news from abroad, that
Nazis were spending millions...
...arming Germany to the teeth.
We read that the Tokyo diet was
Appropriating tremendous sums,
...converting Japan into one vast munitions plant.
We watched these supposedly poor, have-not nations, spend huge sums for armament,
...and we wondered why.
Arrogantly, they told us why.
They had declared war on us long before the shooting had started.
We have actually been at war since the day when we lifted the flag of our revolution against the democratic world!"
...- Mussolini
The Germans are a noble and unique race to whom the earth was given by the Grace of God." Hitler
The world must come to look up to our emperor as the great ruler of all nations." Lord Hotta
When the people of these three nations, elected
To follow their leaders, death incorporated...
They organized to smash personal freedom,
...equality of man,
...freedom of speech,
...freedom of religion.
Organized to smash the very principals that made us the people we are.
So in December 1938, when the gallop poll asked us,
Should the United Sates increase the strength of its Army, Navy and Air Force?"
We answered YES 85%
It was time to look to our defense.
Gentlemen this is the Military Affairs
Committee House of Representatives,
...meeting for the purpose of considering
...national defense.
The Navy is asking for an increase of 25%,
...in authorized Naval tonnage, in view of the grave international situation.
Congress, reflecting the voice of the people,
...appropriated the largest sum for military use, ever voted during peace in American history.
We didn't dream that a few years later it would look like peanuts.
On March 14, 1939, Adolf Hitler broke the pledge he made at Munich.
He took over all the rest of Czechoslovakia.
There would be no more peace in our time.
April 7, 1939. As we here in America observe Good Friday.
Extra paper, extra paper!
Italy attacks Albania!"
The picture was becoming clear.
The conquering forces of violence were...
...being set loose in the world.
In a last desperate effort to avert a World War,
President Roosevelt sent messages to Hitler and Mussolini
...asking their promise to respect the independence of 33 countries.
To Adolf Hitler, this message was a huge joke, as he repeated the names.
This was the only answer that the President received.
On September 1, 1939, the Nazi army smashed into Poland.
Warsaw
England and France had a treaty with Poland.
Would they act now?
At home, we listened:
Adolf Hitler's all out attack on Poland,
...makes the long-dreaded European war a certainty."
Prime Minister Chamberlain of Great Britain gave the Nazi leader...
...a zero hour for withdrawing his troops from Poland."
That zero hour ends now. At this time we transfer you to London...
...for an important announcement by the British Prime Minister."
Up to the very last, it would have been quite possible to have arranged a...
...peaceable and honorable settlement, between Germany and Poland."
But Hitler would not have it."
In a situation, in which no word given by...
...Germany's ruler could be trusted,
...and no people or its country could feel itself safe, had become intolerable."
Now may God bless you all,
...and may he defend the right. For it is evil things we should be fighting against, and against them I am certain, that the right will prevail."
Six hours after Great Britain declared war on Nazi Germany,
...the Republic of France followed. All
France is in a mail-storm of activity.
The Maginot Line has already opened fire on the Germans.
World War Two has begun.
At home we were asked:
What country do you consider responsible for causing this war?
Germany 82%
We Americans had no doubt who started it,
Also we began to fear that this warm...
...was going concern us.
President Roosevelt, called a special session of Congress to reconsider the embargo against selling munitions.
"I have asked the Congress to reassemble in extraordinary session,
...in order that it may consider and act on,
...changes in our Neutrality Law."
The men of Congress wrestled with their beliefs and our future.
They debated and they argued.
"The arms embargo is far too great a security,
...to American peace, to permit its surrender...
...without a last-ditch fight."
The embargo act, as it now stands, is one-sided and works entirely to the advantage of one side.
Therefore the embargo act should be modified."
Therefore the embargo act should be modified."
We the people also argued and debated, whether we should sell arms and munitions.
When the question was put to us, we had an answer.
Should we change the neutrality act so we can sell war supplies?
YES 57%
Shortly after, our Representatives changed the Neutrality Act.
ARMS EMBARGO REPEALED
Arms for sale, but come and get them
We lifted the embargo on arms and munitions.
Now we would sell, if purchasers would pay and take the stuff away in their own ships.
American ships were still barred from combat zones.
Meanwhile on the other side of the globe.
Japan was busy trying to bomb, shoot and
Terrorize the Chinese into submission.
We began to realize that if Japan conquered 400 million Chinese,
...she might become so strong as to run us right out of the Pacific.
You will remember that two years earlier in September 1937,
...when we were asked: In the present fight between Japan and China,
...are your sympathies with either side?
Only 43% were with China, most of us were undecided.
In June 1939, when we were asked the same question:
74% said we were with China.
Now our minds were made up.
When we loaded our scrap-iron on
Japanese ships, our citizens protested.
Let Mr. Acheson, Assistant Secretary of State, tell us the inside of the story.
So until the middle of 1940, the restriction of exports to Japan,
...took the form of moral embargos of air-planes and direct munitions."
Then Congress passed the Export Control Act."
And increasing cut offs of scrap iron, aviation
Gasoline and other strategic items followed."
Exports were curtailed to the limit, which those responsible for our defense were willing to risk."
It was a fearful responsibility."
On one side was the possibility, in fact the probability...
...that one day these materials might be used against us."
On the other side was the possibility, in fact the probability,
...to cut them off, would provoke an attack which we were not then prepared to resist."
Finally in the summer of 1941,
...as it was becoming clear, that Japan was turning its back on every possibility of reconciliation and adjustment, and was determined on her great gamble of conquest.
...all exports ceased.
April 9, 1940, the leaders of Nazi Germany
Shifted their war machine into high gear.
They overran into Denmark, they smashed into Norway.
On May 10, 1940, they blitzed into Holland and Belgium.
The Nazis are marching ahead at the fastest speed a conquering army has moved in all history.
All roads in France are choked with slow-moving masses of refugees.
Nazi dive-bombers are bombing countless of thousands of defenseless woman and children.
Good-evening everybody. Tonight it seems clearly apparent that...
...the first great phase of the war in the west has been won by Germany.
The army of French and British has made a valiant battle in its effort to...
...retreat to Dunkerque where there is some slight chance that...
...some part of it can be evacuated."
Adolf Hitler's mechanized forces are racing towards Paris...
...as French resistance collapses."
On this tenth day of June, of nineteen hundred and forty
...the hand that held the dagger, has struck it into the back of its neighbor."
This is William L. Shivers, speaking from the forest of Campaign,
...where Adolf Hitler today is handing his Armistice terms to France.
It is 3: 15 p. M. Adolf Hitler strides slowly to the little clearing.
I can see his face. It is grave, solemn, yet brimming with revenge.
Off to one side, is a large statue of Marshall Foch.
Hitler does not appear to see it.
Now we see the French walking down the avenue,
Lead by General Huntziger.
Hitler and the other German leaders rise, as the French enter.
General Keitel reads the preamble to the German Armistice's Terms.
This whole ceremony is over in a quarter of an hour.
Conquering armies now stood on the shores of the Atlantic.
Fire!"
The danger was suddenly close.
Countries conquered by...
...the Nazis had possession outside of Europe.
Some of these possessions were in America.
Would the Nazi demand the French
Naval units at Martinique?
Would the Nazis move into the
Dutch oil fields of Curacao?
Would the Nazis seize the French Naval base
At Dakar for invasion of South America?
Already in Brazil, there were over
1 million Germans who lived exactly...
...as they did in Germany.
Twelve hundred German schools, with Nazi textbooks and Nazi teachers.
Nazi newspapers. Gliding clubs had been established.
Also in Brazil, there were 260 thousand
Japanese taking orders from Japan.
In Ecuador, within easy bombing range of the Panama Canal,
German airlines had been established. German pilots were reserve officers of the Luftwaffe.
The German transport planes, had bomb racks already built in.
In Argentina, German athletic clubs, similar to the Hitler Youth Movement,
...had been organized exclusively for Germans.
Here was a Fifth Column ready to take over.
Havana Conference for the defense of The Americas. July 22, 1940.
Havana, we met with 20 other
American Republics.
There must not be a shadow of a doubt anywhere,
...as to the determination of the American nations,
...not to permit the invasion of their hemisphere of the armed forces...
...of any power or any possible combination of powers."
Twenty American nations stood firm.
The Americans would not let any European colony in this hemisphere...
...to be transferred to a non-American power.
We said KEEP OUT. We meant it.
We must increase production facilities for everything needed...
...for the Army and Navy for National Defense.
I believe that this nation should plan at this time,
...that will provide us with
50 thousand military and naval planes.
To protect our shores, we authorized construction of a two-ocean Navy.
The greatest the world has ever known.
At least it would be the greatest Navy,
...when completed in 1944.
But then, in 1940 it was only a paper Navy.
Our fighting forces at that time, consisted of an army of 187 thousand men,
...a navy of 120 thousand, and this dot was the air corps 22,387 strong.
All told, 330,000 men.
We had makeshift equipment.
Stove pipes for canons.
Bags of flour for bombs.
Trucks were labeled Tanks.
Our infantry had exactly 488 machine guns.
We possessed 235 pieces of field artillery.
Ten light and eighteen medium tanks.
That was the army of The United States in May in 1940,
...the month in which the Nazis overran France.
...so we called on the minute-men.
The National Guard of the 48th State.
And placed them into Federal Service.
And most important, Congress passed the Selective Service Act.
For the first time in our history, we began
Mobilizing an army while still at peace.
"The first number is serial number 158."
"The second number which has just been drawn is 192."
It wasrt too soon. Time was running out.
The Nazis had begun their shattering blitz on Britain.
"Hello America. This is Edward Morella speaking from London."
There were more German planes over the coast of
Britain today, then at anytime since the war began."
Anti air-craft guns were in action along the south-east coast today,
...back on Main Street U. S.A."
Daily we followed Britairs life-struggle.
For if Britain died,
...we would be in grave peril.
Our first line of defense in the Atlantic, the British Fleet,
...might go to Nazi Germany.
We would be unprotected. Our shores, our people, our homes, in danger.
Britain must not fall!
In our harbors idle and rotting lay ancient destroyers.
They had been built for WW I, but this was WW II.
And this gave us an idea. Fifty tired, over-aged destroyers were re-vitalized,
...transferred to Great Britain.
In return, we acquired further protection of our shores,
...we received a chain of bases stretching from Newfoundland to British Guiana.
...these bases threw a steel wall around the Caribbean.
These bases gave new safety to the Panama Canal.
It was now clear to the aggressors that we were conscience...
...of the threat they represented to our country.
Mr. Berle, Assistant Secretary of State, will tell us how they got together and tried to scare us of.
From 1936 on, it became increasingly clear to the world,
...that Germany, Italy and Japan, were pursuing a common...
...pattern of aggression, both in Europe and in the Far East."
On September 27, 1940,
...these three powers signed the so-called Pact of Berlin."
Or Tripartite Pact."
A treaty of far-reaching alliance.
By that treaty, it was provided that the three countries would assist one another with,
...all political, economic and military means...
...when one of the powers were attacked, note particularly the use of the word "attacked"...
...by a power not then involved in the European war, or in the Chinese/Japanese conflict."
The last of these provisions were aimed directly at the United States."
Tokyo celebrates.
Rome cheered.
Berlin heiled itself hoarse.
It was clear now that the 3 axis's countries stood against us.
More anxious than ever, we watched the life and death struggle for the possession...
...of the skies over Britain.
Despite the propaganda and confusion in the recent months,
...it is now obvious that England is losing the war.
England will not only survive,
England will win!
So, when we were asked:
Should we keep out of war or aid Britain even at the risk of war?
Aid Britain even at the risk of war 68%
Thus the march of conquest at the self-termed Master Racists
...changed our national attitude from 1936
...when only one out of twenty Americans thought we would be involved in war.
To 1941, when 14 out of 20 Americans were will to risk war, if war was necessary...
...to insure axis defeat.
I ask this Congress for authority and funds,
...sufficient to manufacture additional munitions and war supplied of many kinds,
...to be turned over to those nations who are now in actual war,
...with aggressor nations."
Our useful and immediate role is to act as an arsenal...
...for them as well as for ourselves."
We shall send in ever-increasing
Numbers of ships,
...planes, tanks, guns. That is our purpose, and our pledge."
By an overwhelming majority,
Congress passed Lend-lease.
Bill number 1776. Another
Declaration of independence,
...independence from tyranny, 1941 style.
On April 6, 1941, the Nazi juggernaut overran into Yugoslavia and Greece.
On June 22, 1941 the success-crazed Nazis took their longest step toward world conquest.
Without any declaration of war, they blitzed into Russia.
We were determined not to let down any nations defending themselves...
...against unprovoked attack.
So we extend land-lease to these new victims.
Now the land-lease products of our factories were being unloaded...
...in the bombed ports of Great Britain,
...at the Red Sea Ports for the British in Africa.
Lend-lease was being hauled over the Burma road to China.
Lend-lease was piling up in Murmansk and Iran for Russia.
Why did we supply war materials to the countries defending themselves from against axis aggression?
Was it for our natural sympathies for people unwilling to lose their freedoms?
Was it our ancient antagonism to conquerors imposing their rule on others by force?
Yes partly. But principally it was because the American people,
...had become certain, that they were on the list of free nations to be conquered.
"Two worlds are in conflict - two philosophies of life. One of these two worlds must break asunder"
And we were the leading example of that free world that Hitler was committed to breaking asunder.
What would have been our defensive position if the aggressors had succeeded in...
...conquering Britain, Russia, and China?
German conquests of Europe and Africa,
...would bring all their raw-materials, plus their entire industrial development...
...under one control.
Of the 2 Billion people in the world, the Nazis would rule roughly one-quarter
The 500 million people of Europe and Africa, forced into slavery to labor for Germany.
German conquest of Russia, would add the vast raw materials...
...and the production facilities of another of the worlds industrial areas.
And of the world's people, another 2 hundred million would be added to the Nazi labor pile.
Japanese conquest of the Orient.
Would pour into their factories the almost unlimited resources of that area.
And of the people's of the earth, a thousand million...
...would come under their rule.
Slaves for their industrial machines.
We in North and South America would be left with the raw material of three-tenths of the earth's surface.
Against the axis with the resources of seven-tenths.
We would have one industrial region, against their three industrial regions.
We would have one-eighth of the world's
Population against their seven-eighths.
If we, together with the nations of
North and South America,
...could mobilize 30 millions fully equipped men,
...the axis could mobilize 200 million.
Thus an Axis victory in Europe and Asia would leave us alone and virtually surrounded.
Facing enemies ten times stronger than ourselves.
These are the reasons that lead us, the American people to change the Neutrality Act.
To send aid to Britain, to Russia, to China,
...to make ourselves the arsenal of democracy.
These are the reasons why now, the first American troops...
...set forth into the Atlantic.
To occupy new bases in Greenland and Iceland.
With the consent of their local governments.
In our hands, bases of defense, in Nazis hands, bases of death.
The Germans opened unrestricted submarine warfare.
If today, the Navy should make secure the seas,
...for the delivery of our munitions to Great Britain,
...it will render as great a service to our country,
...and to the preservation of American freedom,
...as it has ever rendered in all its glorious history."
"We want those cargoes protected."
An aroused Congress repealed the entire
Neutrality Act.
We armed our merchants. And for the first time they steamed into combat zones to deliver land-lease.
While this was going on in the Atlantic, the Japs, by so-called agreement...
...with the proper government of defeated France, moved into Indo China.
There were now only two threats to their plan for their conquest of greater East Asia.
First was their northern neighbor, Russia.
The only military power within striking distance of Japan.
The Nazis were taking care of Russia.
The second threat to Japanese conquest was us.
Japanese southward expansion was too dangerous to attempt with our bases still standing in the
Philippines and our supply lines open to Wake, to Midway and Hawaii.
We were in their way, we had to be removed, but the Japanese way.
Off to Washington went
Special Ambassador Kuruso.
And on what the Japs said was a mission of peace.
But carefully synchronized with his departure, was a departure of a Jap task force.
Under sealed orders, not on a mission of peace.
On November 14th, Mr. Kuruso arrived in San Francisco, smiling his...
...toothy smile as he sang the old song of Japanese friendship.
The Japanese were peace-loving people.
Their whole policy was devoted to...
...the establishment of permanent peace in Asia.
Our aid to China, was delaying the establishment of that peace.
Our refusal to sell them oil and scrap was interfering with the establishment of that peace.
Our objections to them taking over the East Indies, greater East Asia was...
...an interruption in the establishment of that peace. All they wanted was peace.
On November 17, Mr. Kuruso and Japanese...
...Ambassador Namura were received by the President, in the presence of...
...The Secretary of State Cordell Hull.
It very quickly became clear, that the
Japanese had brought no new proposals...
...and that the Japanese intended to continue their campaign to conquer China...
...and all East Asia.
On November 26th, our Secretary of State presented the Japanese with the bases of peaceful agreement...
...between the two nations.
The proposal was forwarded to Tokyo.
The Japs had to stall for time.
But only a short time. A task force was nearing its goal.
Sunday, December 7, 1941
One p. M., eastern standard time,
...the Japanese Ambassadors are expected at the State Department to keep a one o'clock appointment that they had requested in order to present their...
...answers to our proposals.
One O five p. M. The Japanese planes are approaching Hawaii.
One ten p. M. The Japanese emissaries telephone to postpone their appointment until 1:45.
1:20 p. M.
2:00 p. M. The Japanese envoys smiling and correct, arrive at the State Department.
2:20 p. M.
Japanese planes had been sowing death and destruction for an hour on...
...American outposts in the Pacific, when the Japanese envoy presented a memorandum to Mr.
Hull.
"Here is the memorandum presented to me."
As you can see, it is quite a lengthy document."
I read it horridly, discovering it contained a recycled...
...macho accusations against the United States."
Charging it among other things with quote:
Scheming for the extension of the war."
Preparing to attack Germany and Italy."
Trying to establish a new order in Europe."
And ignoring Japars sacrifices in the China Affair."
Menacing the Empire's existence itself."
And disparaging its honor and prestige."
After reading the note, I said to the Japan Ambassadors...
...I have never seen a document so crowded with infamous falsehoods and distortion...
...on a scale so huge, that I never would have imagined...
...that any government on this planet was capable of uttering them."
I ask that Congress declare, that since the unprovoked...
...and dastardly attack by Japan...
...on Sunday, December 7, 1941...
...a state of war has existed between the Untied States and the Japanese Empire."
Victory of the democracies can only be complete with the utter defeat of...
...the war machines of Germany and Japan."
C. G. Marshall.
I am a Canadian.
I have been listening to Britain.
I have heard the sound of her life by day and by night.
Many years ago, a great American, speaking of Britain, said that in the storm of battle and conflict she had a secret vigour and a pulse like a cannon.
In the great sound picture that is here presented, you, too, will hear that heart beating.
For blended together in one great symphony is the music of Britain at war.
The evening hymn of the lark.
The roar of Spitfires.
The dancers in the Great Ballroom at Blackpool.
The clank of machinery and shunting trains.
Soldiers of Canada holding in memory, in proud memory, their home on the range.
The BBC sending truth on its journey around the world.
The trumpet call of freedom.
The war song of a great people.
The first sure notes of the march of victory, as you and I listen to Britain.
This is the BBC
Home & Forces Programmes.
Here is the news, and this is Joseph McLeod reading it.
- No!
- Is that you?
- It's such an old one!
- Oh, let me see, come on!
♪ Roll out the barrel
♪ We'll have a barrel of fun
♪ Roll out the barrel
♪ We've got the blues on the run
♪ Zing, boom, tararrel
♪ Ring out a song of good cheer
♪ Now's the time to roll the barrel
♪ For the gang's all here ♪
♪ ...give me a home where the buffalo roam...
...at night, the RSM with a... big electric lamp.
♪ ...where seldom is heard a discouraging word...
And remember Tommy and the Branden babe?
- Oh, yes, do I? A great night!
- Took him all day to ditch her.
♪ Home, home on the range
♪ Where the deer and the antelope play
This is London calling.
London calling at the beginning of tonight's broadcast
in the African service.
London is calling you...
This is the Pacific service from London,
sending you all greetings and wishing the best of luck
to those of you listening who are serving in our armed forces
on sea, land or in the air, and in the Merchant Navy.
♪ The right, press, left, press again
♪ Right and press... ♪
Look well up!
♪ Lift your tess when you press, there, now turn, press again
♪ And a twist and a press...swing! ♪
Press and stop.
Drop your arms and look to the front.
Calling all workers!
Music while you work this morning on Rhythmic Records.
♪ ...I shall see old pals again round the back of the arches
♪ Down in Sunnyside Lane
♪ I'm a guy who's never going to roam again
♪ Once I'm in the old home town
♪ By and by,
I'll see my little home again
♪ Then I'm going to settle down
♪ Round the back of the arches
♪ Down in Sunnyside Lane
♪ Where the black of the arches never seems to remain
♪ That's where I used to be as happy as a multi-millionaire
♪ Everybody there a jolly good pal
♪ Round the back of the grey skies
♪ There's a lining of blue...
♪ And when the storm clouds all roll over
♪ I'll shall see old pals again
♪ Round the back of the arches
♪ Down in Sunnyside Lane ♪
♪ Rule Britannia
♪ Britannia rule the waves
♪ Britons never never never shall be slaves
♪ Rule Britannia
♪ Britannia rule the waves
♪ Britons never never never shall be slaves ♪
National Socialism Will reshape the
World Adolf Hitler the symbols and the leaders change, but Germany's Will on others...
..continue from generation to generation.
In the last 75 years, this magnum has cost the World...
..more than 20 million killed, more than 60 million Wounded...
..more than 200 million made homeless. this does not include the untold millions that died of disease...
..resulting from War.
Or the billions upon billions of dollars Worth of property destroyed.
Nor does this include the grief...
..the anguish...
..the misery......the terror that the World has sufered.
Due to the German's insane passion to enforce their rule upon their neighbors. this passion for conquest, reached its histerical climax...
..When Adolf Hitler enthroned himself as God and the German Führer
What fantastic dreams Was this humorless man dreaming
..as he stood at Nürnberg and looked doWn on his fanatic folloWers.
In the MiddleAges, a plague of slavery descended on the World.
Out of the Wilds of Mongolia, came a mighty army of fierce horsemen...
..Ied by Djengis Khan.
Burning, looting, pillaging. the Barbarian horde sWept across
Asia and Eastern Europe.
Djengis Khan conquered most of the World of the 13th century
Adolf Hitler Was determined to outdo him...
..and conquer all of the World of the 20th.
Set up at Munich Was an institute devoted to the little knoWn...
..science of geo politics.
Vaguely defined as the military control of space.
Germany's leading geo-politician a former General...
..Karl Haushofer, Was head man.
Here Was gathered together more information about your home toWn...
..than you yourself know to the German geo-politician the World is not made up of....
..men, and Women and children Who live and love and dream of better things.
It is made up of only two elements labor and raW materials.
It is made up of only two elements labor and raW materials. the geo-politicians job Was to transform Hitler's ambition to control...
..these elements into cold hard reality.
On their map, our planet is neatly divided into land and Water.
Water forms 3/4 of the earth's surface, land only 1/4.
And in that 1/4 of the earth's surface, lies the World's Wealth.
All its natural resources.
And the World's manpoWer.
Control the land and you control the World. that Was Hitler's theory. this all important land, the geo- politicians noW break up into two areas.
One the Western hemisphere, Which together With Australia and all the....
..islands of the World including Japan, comprises 1/3 of the land area. the other area, Which consists of
Europe, Asia and Africa...
..makes up the other 2/3. this Super Continent Which they call the World lsland....
..is not only twice as large as the rest of the World....
..but also includes 7/8 of the World's population. the heart of his World lsland, comprises eastern Europe and most ofAsia. this they call the Heart Land.
Which just about coincides With the old Empire of Djengis Khan.
Hitler's step by step plan for World conquest can be summarized this Way
Conquer eastern Europe...
..and you dominate the Heart Land.
Conquer the Heart Land...
..and you dominate the World lsland.
Conquer the World lsland...
..and you dominate the World. that Was the dream in Hitler's mind, as he stood at Nürnberg.
With page and pageantry the district leaders from all over Germany....
..sWore personal allegiance to him, hypnotized by the belief.....
..that they Were members of a master race. this film Will deal With act one of the Nazi bid for World poWer. the most fantastic play in all recorded history.
Hitler had seen Hirohito grab off
Manchuria and other...
..territories from the Chinese.
He had Watched Mussolini get aWay
With the rape of Ethiopians.
He had seen the democratic World look the other Way, While...
..these illegal aggressions
Were going on.
And he smiled.
For collective acts of peace, the only Weapon he had to fear...
..had broken doWn.
It Was time noW for the Nazis to start crossing borders.
It Was time for Hitler to put his plan into action.
And What Was he Waiting for?.
He Was Waiting to soften up his victims, keep them from uniting.
Demoralize the enemy from Within by surprise, terror, sabotage...
..assassination. that is the War of the future. --Hitler
For his softening up process, he sent his agents all over the World...
..disguised as tourists, students and commercial travelers.
Pay-off men like Ribbentrop came too.
Pay-off men like Ribbentrop came too. to buy, threaten and form local fascist parties.
Such as Degrelle and his
Rexist Party in Belgium.
Hagelin in Czechoslovakia.
Seyss-lnquart for the National
Socialists in Austria.
In Britain, Sir OsWald Mosley offered himself to the people as a Hitler...
..With a mocks of accents.
In other Words, I'm told that
Hitler is mad.
Well, I've got another theory myself.
Until the day When they Would make easy, Hitler's actual invasion....
..these subversive fascist organizations provoked riots...
.and rebellions creating scenes like these in France.
Scenes like these in Belgium.
And Where do you think this is?.
Right in Madison Square Garden,
U.S.A.
And this is Fritz Kuhn.
Leader of a German/American Bund...
..hiding behind the American flag but taking his orders from Berlin...
..and copying the methods of Berlin. that Was the softening up process outside Germany.
But, inside Germany it Was a different story.
Here, in up-most secrecy, the hardening up process.
Building up Hitler'sArmy and his industry tell the World We have no raW materials...
..and never let them see What goes on.
Day after day, night after night, month after month, year after year.
We must have the World's most poWerful club.
Forget hours, forget hoW to think.
Forge the club of blood and iron.
And let the Democracies talk about freedom. No freedom here.
No labor unions. No overtime. the Führer tells you Where to Work.
When to Work. HoW long to Work.
HoW much your Work is Worth.
Forge the club of blood and iron.
We have a sacred mission. today We rule Germany...
..tomorroW the World.
For those Who don't like it you don't eat.
Or you disappear into a concentration camp.
Or you get this.
And this is the man
Who gives it to you.
And What of the Army?.
Before Hitler came into poWer, the German Army, by treaty...
..Was limited to 100 thousand men.
But treaties to the Germans, have alWays been something to ignore. these 100 thousand men Were, in reality, 100 thousand...
..highly trained officers. the men Who lead the
Nazi regiments today.
But Hitler didn't merely ignore the treaty, he tore it up.
And in 1935, ordered National
Conscription.
Simultaneously, he ordered German youth to become air-minded. toy gliders filled the air.
As the youth greW bigger, so did the gliders.
Soon these same youths Were trained pilots, flying neW planes...
..the factories Were producing. the Luftwaffe Was being assembled. the only thing old about this neW army Was the goosestep.
And even Hitler couldn't improve on that ancient form of German torture...
..designed to make man stop thinking and blindly obey
Goosestep them until they become an insensible as Weapons.
Everything else Was neW. tanks, motorized equipment and one of our oWn inventions. the dive bomber.
All this rearmament Was strictly illegal to the Versailles treaty.
And the next illegal step Hitler took...
..Was to march his troops into the Rhineland.
A strip of land between Germany and France, demilitarized...
..after the last War as a precaution against future German aggression.
But Hitler's plan of eastern conquest, demanded a barrier against...
..democratic action in the West.
So Hitler demilitarized the Rhineland and began building the...
..formidable Siegfried Line.
A chain of forts and defenses
450 miles long and in some places...
..30 miles Wide.
Germany had fought one, two-front
War and didn't Want another
As many as 1/2 a million men
Worked at least 20 hours a day...
..to build 22 thousand fortified positions on land...
..Where, by treaty, no German soldier Was suppose to set foot.
Hitler had his Siegfried Line, he had his equipment...
..he had his army.
NoW to unveil the German might, and terrorize his intended victims...
..into submission.
General staffs all over the World, anxiously aWaited the report...
..of their military attaches.
A Would-be peaceful World learned that a vast military poWer had...
..materialized out of noWhere.
A poWer controlled by one man,
Who tore up treaties...
..as We tear up tickertape.
I am Willing to sign anything.
I Will do anything to facilitate...
..the success of my policy.
Hitler lntervieW October, 1933
Satisfied that they had created the right sense of fear in the World...
..the Nazis got ready to strike, the hour had come.
It Was time to start conquering eastern Europe...
..according to the plan of
Hitler's geo-politicians.
It Was time to Win the domination of the Heart Land.
Who Was the first victim to be?.
Naturally, the softest, Austria.
Bite off just enough...
..not to set the World against you.
On March the 12th, 1938,
Without Warning,
..the German armies marched over the Austrian border.
It Was merely only a full-scale invasion test and Hitler rode in triumph...
..into Vienna.
Even the very name of Austria disappeared from the map...
..though Hitler had promised earlier to the World: the assertion that it is the intention of the German Reich to coerce...
..theAustrian State is absurd
Adolph Hitler, January 30, 1934
Why Was Austria important to Hitler?.
It put him on the southern flank of
Czechoslovakia...
..and Czechoslovakia Was the key to the control of eastern Europe. the German Chancellor Bismarck explained that years ago When he said...
..He Who Would conquer Europe, must first toll the bastions of Bohemia.
And Bohemia Was noW part of
Czechoslovakia.
But Czechoslovakia Was tough.
It had a good army.
It had good equipment.
It had one of the finest ammunition plants in the World...
..the Skoda Works, Which Hitler
Wanted very badly.
It had incorrupt able President Benes.
It had a military alliance With France and France had a military...
..alliance With Britain.
Find excuses to take Czechoslovakia one piece at a time.
He found his excuse in the
Sudetenland. the portion of Czechoslovakia bordering Germany.
Here lived some people of German origin, although they had never been...
..a part of Germany itself. that Was Hitler's cue.
Completely ignoring the fact that most people Who left Germany..
..had done so to get aWay from things like Hitler.
He sprang his pet theory, that every person of German blood...
..no matter Where he lives, belongs to the Nazi Reich.
Germans or descendants of Germans.
Often With no more than a drop...
..of German blood in their veins, suddenly learned they Were God-like.
Not subject to the land in
Which they live or...
..to Which they oWe their allegiance...
..Whether it be Czechoslovakia....
Norway.
SWeden.
China. the United States ortimbuktu.
According to the Nazis the German Was a special creature Who Would remain...
..forever German of the 6th and 7th generation and must take his...
..orders from Berlin.
Some people We knoW of German decent think this is a lot of hogWash.
Lieutenant General Walter Krueger
Senator Robert Wagner
Wendell Willkie
Henry J. Kaiser
Including 15%% of any group like this.
But in the Sudetenland he found some stooges Who fell for this bunk.
Conrad Hemline Was their bush-league Führer the people of the Sudetenland Were told they should be liberated. they Were told Hitler Was their liberator. the Nazi smuggled over their standard softening-up equipment, blackjacks.
And When the Czechs Were beaten up trying to combat his 5th Columnists...
..Hitler screamed the Germans Were being persecuted and threatened...
..War, unless he got the Sudetenland.
It is the last territorial claim
I have to make in Europe.
I have assured Mr. Chamberlain, and I repeat it here...
..that When this problem is solved, there is for Germany no further...
..territorial problem in Europe.
We Want no Czechs. to the League of Nations,
Foreign Minister Maxim Litvinov...
..announced that Russia Was ready to back...
..considered action against Germany.
But once again, there Was no considered action. the Czechs mobilized and closed their borders. the leaders of France and Britain desperately stride to avoid War...
..fleW to meet the jubilant
Axis leaders at Munich.
On September 29, in return for
Hitler's guarantee of World peace...
..Chamberlain and Daladier prevailed upon Czechoslovakia to give up....
..the Sudetenland Without a fight.
In Czechoslovakia the Munich Pact
Was greeted by riots of protest.
But Daladier returned to France to be greeted by cheers...
..from a relieved French people.
And in Britain, a happy Chamberlain came back declaring he had...
..achieved peace, peace in our time.
One of the most tragic and ironic scenes in all history. this morning, I had another talk...
..With the German Chancellor Herr
Hitler, and here is the paper...
..Which bears his name upon it as Well as mine. the agreement Was signed last night...
..and theAnglo-German Naval
Agreement as symbolic...
..of the desire of our two peoples never to go to War With one another again.
PEACE lN OUR tlME
-Chamberlain
Peace....it Wasn't peace. the Nazis hadn't nearly dropped
3 million more souls...
..under the German flag.
By taking the Sudetenland, they had made Czechoslovakia defenseless.
For in this territory lay the natural defenses. the mountain ranges and a defensive line of forts...
..considered even stronger than the Maginot Line.
Without these fortified cautions,
Czechoslovakia Was disarmed.
A ripe plum ready to fall into Hitler's lap.
Within 6 months of declaring that he
Wanted no more territory anyWhere.
Hitler violated the Munich agreement, marched in...
..and took the Whole of the Czech State. though he had specifically promised:
I have no further interest in the
Czechoslovakian State, that is...
..guaranteed. We Want no Czechs
Adolph Hitler September 26, 1938
..guaranteed. We Want no Czechs
Adolph Hitler September 26, 1938
Austria and Czechoslovakia
Were gone Without a fight.
And Hitler Was getting his control of eastern Europe.
Poland Was next on the map. the tired old men of Munich, noW kneW, that there could be no peace...
..in our time.
If an attack Were made...
..to change the situation by force...
.. in such a Way dares to threaten Polish independence...
..Why then, that Would inevitably start a general congregation...
..in Which this country Would be involved."
But after his success in Munich,
Hitler Was sure...
..that France and Britain Would not fight.
Here is What one of his spokesman said:
Democracy has no convictions for
Which people Would be Willing... to stake their lives."
Dr. Ernst Hanftstaengl
But What about the Russians?. the lights began to burn all night in MoscoW.
British and French military missions arrived to confer...
..With the Soviet government.
So did a German representative.
And on August 21, 1939, the World Was set on its heels by the announcement...
..of a treaty between the Russians and the Germans in Which they..
..agreed not to fight each other
Here Were the admitted arch-enemies in a state of apparent friendship.
It Was too fantastic to make any sense....it didn't. the Germans hoped they could lull
Russia into a false sense of security.
And the Russians needed to prepare for the fight they kneW Was coming. they'd read Hitler's book
"Mein Kampf" too.....
..and kneW he had his eyes on the rich Russian land. the acquisition of neW soil Was to be obtained only in the East." Mein Kampf
Confident that Russia Was safely pigeon-holed, and that the...
..democracies Would not fight. the Nazis started singing their...
..favorite theme song, that all people of German blood belong to them.
And picked Danzig as their excuse for the gobbling up of Poland.
Danzig a free city, self-governing under the League of Nations...
..Was an important seaport at the head of the Polish corridor.
Poland's access to the sea. the same old softening process had gone on here.
Local stooges, armed by Germany, began to terrorize the city.
Hitler demanded Danzig in the Polish corridor or else...
..Poles Will Fight for Danzig the people of Poland prepared for the inevitable.
Although they kneW that Britain and
France had guaranteed their borders...
..they also kneW those countries
Were a long Way off.
Germany's theft of Czechoslovakia had make Poland's strategic position...
..even Worse.
Carpathian Mountains, Poland is relatively flat and loW-lying. the Vistula is the Mississippi of
Poland.
It is broad, muddy and unafordable for most of its length.
It tributaries are formidable streams during certain seasons.
But there Was a drought, and the streams Were so loW during the...
..campaign that they could be forded at almost any point, by men...
..trucks and tanks.
Militarily the Vistula offered the best line of defense.
HoWever making a stand here
Would have meant surrendering...
..WarsaW, the richest part of the country. the alternative Was to accept battle on the border. that Was the Polish decision. the Nazi plan Was an enormous pincher movement...
..aimed at encircling the mass of the Polish army.
Secondary pincher movement Were to encircle any Polish groups...
..Which escaped the main trap. the last two Weeks in August, the German armies moved... toWard the Polish border, Where they assembled 70 Divisions....
..many of them armor.
From a military standpoint, the
Poles Were hopelessly outclassed...
..by their predatory neighbor they managed to mobilize barely
30 Divisions, made up of...
..infantry or horse cavalry.
In two important respects, the difference Was staggering. the Nazis 5000 modern tanks,
Poland 600 non descript tanks. the German Luftwaffe, 6000 modern planes...
..the PolishAir Force, less than
1000 of inferior types. the German Army secretly made ready. the Way of living for the next thousand years Was to be decided. the fire that had begun in Manchuria...
..and spread through China and
Ethiopia...
..and Spain Would noW blaze around the World. this man made that decision.
War!
Precisely at daWn on
September 1, Without Warning...
..the German Wehrmacht rolled over the Polish borders.
Before the invasion Was 30 minutes old, the planes of the Luftwafe...
..Were over Poland, Wiping out the Polish Air Force...
..most of it caught flat-footed on the ground.
Most planes that did not get of, faced overwhelming odds...
..and Were shot out of the sky
Fire-flying Nazi squadrons ranged deep into Poland...
..destroying communications, radio stations, poWer plants...
.. highWays, bridges, railroads. the Polish Army Was disorganized by the loss of itsAir Force...
..and the destruction of communications. the mass ground unties of the Nazi
Army continued their advance.
Occasionally they unveiled a neW technique on the arrival of equipment.
For example, advanced units of the
German 4th Army crossed the...
..Vistula in a neW type of storm boat. the Polish retreat developed alarming tendencies...
..the poWerful German 10thArmy,
Which Was to form the southern claw..
..of the great Nazi pinchers, Was advancing With its five armored...
..divisions on either flank.
On September 6th, the opposing Poles began splitting into two groups....
..the southern one falling back toWard the Vistula... the armored Divisions on the
German right raced ahead....
..circling Radome and cutting of this group, Which finally surrendered.
MeanWhile further north, the main Polish mass...
..began drifting toWard Lodz. the German Command, receiving that this opened a gate toWard WarsaW... sent the northern Nazi armored units racing through the gap...
..to the Polish capital. the infantry advanced in forced marches of 35 miles a day...
..and two days later relieved the Panzers above WarsaW. the city Was noW cut off.
West of WarsaW, the main Polish
Armies Were encircled.
Under terrific pressure on the ground, and pounded coarsely from the air..
..they began to disintegrate. they fought on With high personal courage...
..but Without airplanes, Without communications, cut off from...
..their general staff, the isolated
Polish groups Were forced to surrender...
..one by one.
But WarsaW still resisted. the heroic strains of the Polonaise, told an incredulous World...
..that the people of WarsaW, led by
Mayor Kaczynski, had erected...
..a Wall of courage around their city defying Hitler's dam nest.
Stopped cold by the city's desperate resistance...
..the Nazis Were forced to send for heavier artillery. the only source of such artillery
Was Germany's Western front.
With great secrecy, the giant 240 mm haubitzers....
..Were toWed at high speed across the highWays, Which Hitler had built...
..for just such purposes and set into position around WarsaW. the huge guns subjected the city to a bombardment of incredible fury their fire concentrated on the densely populated residential areas.
For 20 days of death and horror...
..every man, Woman and child fought to save his city.
But Without food or Water, human endurance fails.
On September the 27th, the strange but colonialism died on the WarsaW radio...
..and the Polish capital
Was forced to capitulate.
NoW all Polish resistance Was at an end, except here... the Westerplatte port, opposite
Danzig. this small island of stubborn defiance, had stood up under the fire of...
..German Warships from the first day
Its guns silenced, its ports shattered, it still refused to surrender
Even under point blank fire at 800 yards range.
It Was an exhibition of Polish valor that Will go doWn in history
But militarily it could not avail.
On October 1, the garrison at last surrendered.
Surrendered to face the fate of these men.
Polish prisoners being marched of to massive prison camps.
And eventual extermination.
For the Nazi master race theory calls for the complete Wiping out of the...
..so-called inferior races.
And in village after village, local
Judas's point out loyal Polish neighbors
Himmler. these things the Poles can never forget.
Including another one of Hitler's famous promises:
Germany has concluded a Non- aggression Pact With Poland.
We shall adhere to it unconditionally"
-Adolph Hitler, May 21, 1935 the World noW kneW, that a non- aggression pact With Hitler...
..Was the kiss of death.
Poland Was completely destroyed.
Completely?.
Not quite. During the last days of the campaign, the RussianArmy entered...
..eastern Poland and took up positions along the Bug River. the two strongest armies in Europe meet and Hitler could decide now..
..Whether to keep on heading east or call it quits.
He called it quits. Why did Hitler quit here?.
He had to! to continue a drive to the east, Would leave Germany facing the threat...
..he'd alWays sWorn to avoid.
A two-front War.
HoW he met that threat, you Will see in the next film...
..for Hitler thought impossible,
Was anything but. the day after Hitler crossed the Polish border...
France called up her reserves.
Within 24 hours, British planes had bombed German Warships...
..in the Kiel Canal.
Britain, not merely the British government...
..but the British people had declared War
War on Hitler and everything he stood for. the Democracies did have convictions for Which people Were Willing...
..to stake their lives.
Unprepared?. Yes.
But that didn't matter
For they finally realized that
What Was being threatened...
Wasn't just the integrity of Poland, but the integrity of free men...
..everyWhere in the World.
What tragedies, What horror,
What crime...
..has Hitler and all that
Hitler stands for...
..brought to Europe and the World?"
He did upon this foundation...
..that Hitler pretends to build out of hatred...
..a neW order for Europe."
But nothing is more certain...
..than that every trace of Hitler's footsteps...
..every stain of his infected and corroding fingers...
..Will be sponged and purged and if need be blasted...
..from the surface of the earth."
Lift up your hearts.
All Will come right."
Out of the depths of sorroW and sacrifice...
..Will befall again the glory of mankind."
No compromise is possible and the victory of the democracies can only...
..be complete With the utter defeat of the
War machines of Germany and Japan."
G.C. Marshall
Chief of Staff
